On that occasion it occurs to the forest-dwelling bull elephant: ‘In the past I dwelled hemmed in by other elephants … and when I came out from the pool, the female elephants went by brushing against my body.
On that occasion Sīha the general, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, was sitting in that assembly.
On that occasion the bhikkhus dwell in a divine abode, that is, in the liberation of mind through altruistic joy.
On that occasion the bhikkhus dwell in a divine abode, that is, in the liberation of mind through altruistic joy.
On that occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s Park.
On that occasion the Venerable Dhammika was the resident monk in his native district, in all the seven monasteries in his native district.
On that occasion, I myself was the chariotmaker.
On that occasion, King Pasenadi of Kosala’s bull elephant named “Seta” was coming out through the eastern gate to the accompaniment of instrumental music and drumming.
On that occasion, when he had attained arahantship, the Venerable Anuruddha spoke these verses:
On the uposatha day, they enjoin their disciples thus: ‘Come, good man, having laid aside all clothes, recite: ‘I am not anywhere the belonging of anyone, nor is there anywhere anything in any place that is mine.’
However, his parents know: ‘This is our son.’
And he knows: ‘These are my parents.’
His wife and children know: ‘He is our supporter.’
And he knows: ‘These are my wife and children.’
His slaves, workers, and servants know: ‘He is our master.’
And he knows: ‘These are my slaves, workers, and servants.’
Thus on an occasion when they should be enjoined in truthfulness, enjoin them in false speech.
On these five grounds a bhikkhu is suspected and distrusted as ‘an evil bhikkhu’ though he be of unshakable character.”
On these ten grounds they do not withdraw and go apart.
On these ten grounds they withdraw and go apart.
On these ten grounds they withdraw and go apart.
On these ten grounds, they do not withdraw and go apart.
On this basis a bhikkhu possessing psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind might focus on it as air.
On this basis a bhikkhu possessing psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind might focus on it as earth.
On this basis a bhikkhu possessing psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind might focus on that block of wood as unattractive.”
One abstains from false speech, from divisive speech, from harsh speech, and from idle chatter.
One abstains from the destruction of life oneself and encourages others to abstain from the destruction of life … … one holds right view oneself and encourages others in right view.
One abstains from the destruction of life oneself, encourages others to abstain from the destruction of life, and approves of abstaining from the destruction of life.
One abstains from the destruction of life oneself, encourages others to abstain from the destruction of life, approves of abstaining from the destruction of life, and speaks in praise of abstaining from the destruction of life … … one holds right view oneself, encourages others in right view, approves of right view, and speaks in praise of right view.
One abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech, abstains from divisive speech, abstains from harsh speech, abstains from idle chatter, is without longing, is of good will, and holds right view.
One abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech, abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
One abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech; one has few desires, and one holds right view.
One abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech; one is without greed and without impudence.
One abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, and from false speech.
One accomplished in conduct knows and sees things as they are.
One accomplished in true knowledge and conduct,having gained accomplishment of mind,performs action that is accomplishedand accomplishes the good.
One accomplished in view has abandoned these six things.”
One accomplished in view is incapable of considering any conditioned phenomenon as permanent; incapable of considering any conditioned phenomenon as pleasurable; incapable of considering any phenomenon as a self; incapable of doing a grave act that brings immediate result; incapable of resorting to that purity comes about through superstitious and auspicious acts; incapable of seeking a person worthy of offerings outside here.
One accomplished in view is incapable of depriving his mother of life; incapable of depriving his father of life; incapable of depriving an arahant of life; incapable of shedding the Tathāgata’s blood with a mind of hatred; incapable of creating a schism in the Saṅgha; incapable of acknowledging another teacher.
One accomplished in view is incapable of dwelling without reverence and deference toward the Teacher; incapable of dwelling without reverence and deference toward the Dhamma; incapable of dwelling without reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha; incapable of dwelling without reverence and deference toward the training; incapable of resorting to anything that should not be relied upon; incapable of undergoing an eighth existence.
One accomplished in view is incapable of giving rise to these six things.”
One accomplished in view is incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are made by oneself; incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are made by another; incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are both made by oneself and made by another; incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are not made by oneself but have arisen fortuitously; incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are not made by another but have arisen fortuitously; incapable of resorting to pleasure and pain are made neither by oneself nor by another but have arisen fortuitously.
One achieves what one has not yet achieved; one does not fall away from what one has already achieved; one is confident about the portion that one has achieved; one does not contract a severe illness; and one has friends.
One acquires a bad reputation.
One acquires a bad reputation.
One acquires a good reputation.
One acquires a good reputation.
One acquires a good reputation.
One asks another person a question because of one’s dullness and stupidity; one with evil desires, motivated by desire, asks another person a question;  one asks another person a question as a way of reviling; one asks another person a question because one wishes to learn; or one asks another person a question with the thought: ‘If, when he is asked a question by me, he answers correctly, that is good; but if he does not answer correctly, I will give him a correct explanation.’
Friends, whoever asks another person a question does so for these five reasons or for a particular one among them.
One becomes capable of journeys; one becomes capable of striving; one becomes healthy; what one has eaten, drunk, consumed, and tasted is properly digested; the concentration attained through walking meditation is long lasting.
One becomes established in a bad Dhamma.
One becomes established in the good Dhamma.
One becomes infatuated with one’s own intonation.
One becomes miserly with dwelling places, miserly with families, miserly with gains, miserly with praise, and miserly with the Dhamma.
One blames oneself.
One blames oneself.
One blames oneself; the wise, having investigated, censure one; one acquires a bad reputation; one dies confused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
One comes to own and accumulate many goods; one comes to own and accumulate many medicines; one takes on many tasks and duties and becomes competent in the various things to be done; one forms bonds with householders and monastics in an unsuitable way typical of laypeople; and when one departs from that monastery, one departs full of concern.
One commits the offense of sitting on a concealed seat.
One commits the offense of sitting privately.
One commits the offense of teaching the Dhamma to a woman in more than five or six sentences.
One considers that this deed should not be done on both grounds.
One considers that this deed should not be done on both grounds: because it is disagreeable to do and because it will prove harmful.
One declares final knowledge because of one’s dullness and stupidity; one declares final knowledge because one has evil desires and is motivated by desire; one declares final knowledge because one is mad and mentally deranged; one declares final knowledge because one overrates oneself; and one correctly declares final knowledge.
One deity then said to me: ‘Bhante, these bhikkhunīs are liberated.’
And the other said: ‘Bhante, these bhikkhunīs are well liberated without residue remaining.’
This is what those deities said, after which they paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
One deity then said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, these bhikkhunīs are liberated.”
One deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
One departs from a bad Dhamma.
One departs from the good Dhamma.
One deprives one’s mother of life; one deprives one’s father of life; one deprives an arahant of life; with a mind of hatred one sheds the Tathāgata’s blood; one creates a schism in the Saṅgha.
One destroys life oneself and encourages others to destroy life … one holds wrong view oneself and encourages others in wrong view.
One destroys life oneself, encourages others to destroy life, and approves of the destruction of life … one holds wrong view oneself, encourages others in wrong view, and approves of wrong view.
One destroys life oneself, encourages others to destroy life, and approves of the destruction of life.
One destroys life oneself, encourages others to destroy life, approves of the destruction of life, and speaks in praise of the destruction of life … … one holds wrong view oneself, encourages others in wrong view, approves of wrong view, and speaks in praise of wrong view.
One destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, and speaks falsely.
One destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, and speaks falsely; one is greedy and impudent.
One destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsely, and indulges in liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
One destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsely, has evil desires, and holds wrong view.
One destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsely, speaks divisively, speaks harshly, indulges in idle chatter, is full of longing, has a mind of ill will, and holds wrong view.
One dies confused.
One dies unconfused.
One disparages the talk; one disparages the speaker; one disparages oneself; one is unwise, stupid, obtuse; one imagines that one has understood what one has not understood.
One disparages the talk; one disparages the speaker; one disparages oneself; one listens to the Dhamma with a distracted and scattered mind; one attends to it carelessly.
One does not achieve what one has not yet achieved; one falls away from what one has already achieved; one is timid about some things one has achieved; one contracts a severe illness; and one has no friends.
One does not become miserly with dwelling places, miserly with families, miserly with gains, miserly with praise, and miserly with the Dhamma.
One does not blame oneself.
One does not blame oneself; the wise, having investigated, praise one; one acquires a good reputation; one dies unconfused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
One does not censure oneself.
One does not come to own and accumulate many goods; one does not come to own and accumulate many medicines; one does not take on many tasks and duties and become competent in the various things to be done; one does not form bonds with householders and monastics in an unsuitable way typical of laypeople; and when one departs from that monastery, one departs without concern.
One does not disparage the talk; one does not disparage the speaker; one does not disparage oneself; one is wise, intelligent, astute; one does not imagine that one has understood what one has not understood.
One does not disparage the talk; one does not disparage the speaker; one does not disparage oneself; one listens to the Dhamma with an undistracted and one-pointed mind; one attends to it carefully.
One does not hear what one has not heard; one does not clarify what one has heard; one is not confident about the portion that one has heard; one contracts a severe illness; and one has no friends.
One does not listen to the Dhamma as a denigrator obsessed with denigration; one listens to the Dhamma without any intention of criticizing it, not as one who seeks faults; one is not ill disposed toward the teacher and intent on attacking him; one is wise, intelligent, astute; one does not imagine that one has understood what one has not understood.
One does not take a wrong course because of desire … … These are the four ways of taking a wrong course.”
One does not take a wrong course because of desire, because of hatred, because of delusion, or because of fear.
One does what is beneficial; one observes moderation in what is beneficial; one has good digestion; one is virtuous; one has good friends.
One does what is beneficial; one observes moderation in what is beneficial; one has good digestion; one walks at the proper time; one is celibate.
One does what is harmful; one does not observe moderation in what is beneficial; one has poor digestion; one is immoral; one has bad friends.
One does what is harmful; one does not observe moderation in what is beneficial; one has poor digestion; one walks at an improper time; one is not celibate.
One endowed with faith, one with a sense of moral shame, one with moral dread, one who is learned, one who is energetic, one who is mindful, and one who is wise.
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, or the good of both.
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
One excited by lust, overcome by lust, with mind obsessed by it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
One excited by sensual lust, bound by desire and lust, is not freed from the peril pertaining to this present life or from the peril pertaining to future lives; therefore ‘peril’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
One excited by sensual lust, bound by desire and lust, is not freed from the perils pertaining to the present life or from the perils pertaining to future lives; therefore ‘peril’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
One excited by sensual lust, bound by desire and lust, is not freed from the swamps pertaining to the present life or from the swamps pertaining to future lives; therefore ‘swamp’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.”
One excited by sensual lust, bound by desire and lust, is not freed from the womb pertaining to this present life or from the womb pertaining to future lives; therefore ‘a womb’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.”
One first presents the newly harvested crops and fruits to the virtuous ones.
One full of hate who harbors hatred and one endowed with faith because of his misunderstanding.
One full of ill will has good will as the means to avoid it.
One full of longing has non-longing as the means to avoid it.
One generates desire to abandon those qualities that are unwholesome and reckoned as unwholesome; those that are blamable and reckoned as blamable; those that are dark and reckoned as dark; those that should not be cultivated and are reckoned as not to be cultivated; those that are unworthy of the noble ones and reckoned as unworthy of the noble ones.
One generates desire to obtain all those qualities that are wholesome and reckoned as wholesome; those that are blameless and reckoned as blameless; those that are bright and reckoned as bright; those that should be cultivated and are reckoned as to be cultivated; those that are worthy of the noble ones and reckoned as worthy of the noble ones.
One gets to hear what one has not heard; one clarifies what one has heard; one is confident about some things one has heard; one does not contract a severe illness; and one has friends.
One gives a gift during a famine.
One gives a gift from delusion.
One gives a gift from desire.
One gives a gift from fear.
One gives a gift from fear.
One gives a gift from hatred.
One gives a gift to a patient.
One gives a gift to a visitor.
One gives a gift to one setting out on a journey.
One gives a gift,: ‘Giving was practiced before by my father and forefathers; I should not abandon this ancient family custom.’
One gives a gift,: ‘Having given this gift, with the breakup of the body, after death, I will be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’
One gives a gift,: ‘When I am giving this gift my mind becomes placid, and elation and joy arise.’
One gives a gift for the purpose of ornamenting the mind, equipping the mind.
One gives a gift,: ‘He gave to me.’
One gives a gift,: ‘He will give to me.’
One gives a gift,: ‘Giving is good.’
One gives a gift,: ‘I cook; these people do not cook.
One gives life, beauty, happiness, strength, and discernment.
One grows in noble virtuous behavior; one grows in noble concentration; one grows in noble wisdom; and one grows in noble liberation.
One has clearly seen and explored with wisdom those qualities that are unwholesome and reckoned as unwholesome; those that are wholesome and reckoned as wholesome; those that are blamable and reckoned as blamable; those that are blameless and reckoned as blameless; those that are dark and reckoned as dark; those that are bright and reckoned as bright; those that should not be cultivated and are reckoned as not to be cultivated; those that should be cultivated and are reckoned as to be cultivated; those that are unworthy of the noble ones and reckoned as unworthy of the noble ones; those that are worthy of the noble ones and reckoned as worthy of the noble ones.
One has deprived one’s mother of life; one has deprived one’s father of life; one has deprived an arahant of life; with a mind of hatred one has shed the Tathāgata’s blood; one has created a schism in the Saṅgha; one is unwise, stupid, obtuse.
One hears what one has not heard; one clarifies what has been heard; one emerges from perplexity; one straightens out one’s view; one’s mind becomes placid.
One here who has failed to obtainthe fixed course of the good Dhamma,will come to regret it for a long timelike a merchant who has missed a profit.
One immersed in ignorance produces a corresponding individual existence, which may be the consequence either of merit or demerit.
One is dear and agreeable to many people.
One is desirous of training.
One is devoid of faith, immoral, lazy, and unwise.
One is displeasing and disagreeable to many people; one has an abundance of enmity; one has an abundance of faults; one dies confused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
One is displeasing and disagreeable to many people; one is violent; one is remorseful; one dies confused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
One is endowed with faith, virtuous, energetic, and wise.
One is energetic.
One is envious and has not abandoned the stain of envy.
One is fixed in the good Dhamma; one is incapable of decline; one’s suffering is delimited; one comes to possess knowledge not shared by others; one has clearly seen causation; one has clearly seen causally arisen phenomena.
One is focused only on ‘beautiful.’
With the complete surmounting of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, ‘space is infinite,’ one enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space.
One is immoral and has not abandoned the stain of immorality.
One is infested by sensual thoughts.
One is miserly and has not abandoned the stain of miserliness.
One is not deficient in the layperson’s duties.
One is not envious and has abandoned the stain of envy.
One is not miserly and has abandoned the stain of miserliness.
One is not obstructed by kamma; one is not obstructed by defilement; one is not obstructed by the result; one is endowed with faith; one has desire; and one is wise.
One is obstructed by kamma; one is obstructed by defilement; one is obstructed by the result; one is without faith; one is without desire; and one is unwise.Possessing these six qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
One is pleasing and agreeable to many people; one does not have an abundance of enmity; one does not have an abundance of faults; one dies unconfused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
One is pleasing and agreeable to many people; one is not violent; one is without remorse; one dies unconfused; with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
One is to train in these three trainings.
One is virtuous and has abandoned the stain of immorality.
One is without longing, without ill will, and without arrogance.
One kind is given a categorical answer,another is answered after making a distinction;to the third, one should raise a counter-question,but the fourth should be set aside.
One kindling the sacrificial fire and raising the sacrificial post, even before the sacrifice, raises this first knife, the mental one, which is unwholesome and has suffering as its outcome and result.
One kindling the sacrificial fire and raising the sacrificial post, even before the sacrifice, raises this second knife, the verbal one, which is unwholesome and has suffering as its outcome and result.
One kindling the sacrificial fire and raising the sacrificial post, even before the sacrifice, raises this third knife, the bodily one, which is unwholesome and has suffering as its outcome and result.
One life in the nirabbuda hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the abbuda hell; one life in the ababa hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the nirabbuda hell; one life in the ahaha hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the ababa hell; one life in the aṭaṭa hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the ahaha hell; one life in the water-lily hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the aṭaṭa hell; one life in the sweet-fragrance hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the water-lily hell; one life in the blue-lotus hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the sweet-fragrance hell; one life in the white-lotus hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the blue-lotus hell; and one life in the red-lotus hell is the equivalent of twenty lives in the white-lotus hell.
One like a killer, one like a thief, one like a tyrant, one like a mother, one like a sister, one like a friend, and one like a slave.
One listens to the Dhamma as a denigrator obsessed with denigration; one listens to the Dhamma with the intention of criticizing it, seeking faults;  one is ill disposed toward the teacher, intent on attacking him; one is unwise, stupid, obtuse; one imagines that one has understood what one has not understood.
One lives the spiritual life dissatisfied and has doubt about the teachings.
One lives the spiritual life joyfully and has no doubt about the teachings.
One makes an effort, arouses energy, applies one’s mind, and strives for this.
One makes an effort, arouses energy, applies one’s mind, and strives for this.
One might talk with a murderous foe,one might talk with an evil spirit,one might even approach a viperwhose bite means certain death;but with a woman, one to one,one should never talk.
One not percipient of form internally sees forms externally.
One of good will, ever mindful,inwardly well concentrated,training to remove longing,is said to be heedful.
One of little learning who is not intent on what he has learned; one of little learning who is intent on what he has learned; one of much learning who is not intent on what he has learned; and one of much learning who is intent on what he has learned.
One percipient of forms internally sees forms externally, limited, beautiful or ugly.
One person perceives the earth kasiṇa above, below, across, nondual, measureless.
One person perceives the earth kasiṇa above, below, across, undivided, measureless.
One person perceives the water kasiṇa … the fire kasiṇa … the air kasiṇa … the blue kasiṇa … the yellow kasiṇa … the red kasiṇa … the white kasiṇa … the space kasiṇa … the consciousness kasiṇa above, below, across, nondual, measureless.
One person perceives the water kasiṇa … the fire kasiṇa … the air kasiṇa … the blue kasiṇa … the yellow kasiṇa … the red kasiṇa … the white kasiṇa … the space kasiṇa … the consciousness kasiṇa above, below, across, undivided, measureless.
One person perceives what is limited; another perceives what is exalted; another perceives what is measureless; and still another, ‘There is nothing,’ perceives the base of nothingness.
One possessing form sees forms.
One possessing these five qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these five qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these five qualities may be appointed an assigner of meals.”
One possessing these five qualities should not be appointed an assigner of meals.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these four qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.
One possessing these three qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these three qualities is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
One possessing these three qualities is deposited in hell as if brought there.”
One produces an individual existence that corresponds with whatever one desires and which may be the consequence either of merit or demerit.
One produces an individual existence that corresponds with whatever one experiences and which may be the consequence either of merit or demerit.
One scrutinizes those teachings with wisdom in just the way that I have taught them to my disciples for the utterly complete destruction of suffering.
One should apply the idea of the ownership of kamma to the person one resents, thus: ‘This venerable one is the owner of his kamma, the heir of his kamma; he has kamma as his origin, kamma as his relative, kamma as his resort; he will be the heir of any kamma he does, good or bad.’
In this way one should remove the resentment toward that person.
One should associate with a friend who possesses these seven factors.”
One should associate with a friend who possesses these three factors.”
One should associate with a person who possesses these ten qualities.”
One should associate with a person who possesses these ten qualities.”
One should avoid from afarthe blind one and the one-eyed person,but should befriend the one with two eyes,the best kind of person.
One should be content with one’s own wives,and should refrain from the wives of others.A person should not drink wine and liquor,which cause mental confusion.
One should develop compassion for the person one resents; in this way one should remove the resentment toward that person.
One should develop equanimity toward the person one resents; in this way one should remove the resentment toward that person.
One should develop loving-kindness for the person one resents; in this way one should remove the resentment toward that person.
One should do what is wholesome and lead the spiritual life; for none who are born can escape death.
One should do what is wholesome and lead the spiritual life; for none who are born can escape death.
One should do what is wholesome and lead the spiritual life; for none who are born can escape death.’
One should do what is wholesome and lead the spiritual life; for none who are born can escape death.’
For today one who lives long lives for a hundred years or a little more.
One should dwell free from longingwith a heart of good will.One should be mindful and one-pointed in mind,internally well concentrated.
One should not associate with a person who possesses these ten qualities.
One should not associate with a person who possesses these ten qualities.
One should not attack a holy personone who has abandoned viewpoints.This one is called the seventh personof the Saṅgha of noble ones,one not devoid of lust for sensual pleasures,whose five faculties are weak:faith, mindfulness, energy,serenity, and insight.
One should not continue to follow him.
One should not continue to follow him.
One should not depart from him even if one is dismissed.
One should not depart from him.
One should not kill living beings or take what is not given; one should not speak falsehood or drink intoxicants; one should refrain from sexual activity, from unchastity; one should not eat at night or at an improper time.
One should not kill living beings or take what is not given;one should not speak falsehood or drink intoxicants; one should refrain from sexual activity, from unchastity;one should not eat at night or at an improper time.
One should not take as a friend a bhikkhu who possesses these five qualities.
One should not wear garlands or apply scents;one should sleep on a bed or a mat on the ground;this, they say, is the eight-factored uposathaproclaimed by the Buddha,who reached the end of suffering.
One should not wear garlands or apply scents;one should sleep on a bed or a mat on the ground;this, they say, is the eight-factored uposathaproclaimed by the Buddha,who reached the end of suffering.
One should recollect the Buddhaand ponder on the Dhamma.One should develop a benevolent mind,which leads to the world of the devas.
One should serve them with food and drink,with clothes and bedding,by massaging and bathing them,and by washing their feet.
One should take as a friend a bhikkhu who possesses these five qualities.”
One should wisely understand this.
One should wisely understand this.
One should wisely understand this.
One should wisely understand this.
One speaks falsely, speaks divisively, speaks harshly, and indulges in idle chatter.
One takes a wrong course because of desire … … These are the four ways of taking a wrong course.
One takes a wrong course because of desire, because of hatred, because of delusion, or because of fear.
One takes up this training fundamental to the spiritual life in just the way that I have prescribed it to my disciples for the utterly complete destruction of suffering, keeping it unbroken, flawless, unblemished, and unblotched.
One takes up this training pertaining to proper conduct in just the way that I have prescribed it to my disciples, keeping it unbroken, flawless, unblemished, and unblotched, so that those without confidence gain confidence and those with confidence increase.
One thinks about and mentally examines things in the future that are the basis for desire and lust.
One thinks about and mentally examines things in the past that are the basis for desire and lust.
One thinks about and mentally examines things presently existing that are the basis for desire and lust.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One tranquil in body feels pleasure.
One understands the future result of things in the future that are the basis for desire and lust.
One understands the future result of things in the past that are the basis for desire and lust.
One understands the future result of things presently existing that are the basis for desire and lust.
One values anger, not the good Dhamma; one values denigration, not the good Dhamma; one values gain, not the good Dhamma; one values honor, not the good Dhamma.
One values the good Dhamma, not anger; one values the good Dhamma, not denigration; one values the good Dhamma, not gain; one values the good Dhamma, not honor.
One who abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness, does not create such peril and enmity pertaining to the present life or such peril and enmity pertaining to future lives nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness, does not create such peril and enmity pertaining to the present life or such peril and enmity pertaining to future lives, nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness, does not engender peril and enmity pertaining to the present life and the future life, nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who abstains from the destruction of life does not create such peril and enmity pertaining to the present life or such peril and enmity pertaining to future lives nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who abstains from the destruction of life does not create such peril and enmity pertaining to the present life or such peril and enmity pertaining to future lives, nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who abstains from the destruction of life does not engender peril and enmity pertaining to the present life and the future life, nor does he experience mental pain and dejection.
One who amasses what he gains and one who squanders what he gains.
One who associates with an inferior person declines;one who associates with an equal does not decline;attending on a superior person one develops quickly;therefore you should follow one superior to yourself.
One who becomes a forest dweller because of his dullness and stupidity; one who becomes a forest dweller because he has evil desires, because he is driven by desire; one who becomes a forest dweller because he is mad and mentally deranged; one who becomes a forest dweller,: ‘It is praised by the Buddhas and the Buddhas’ disciples’; and one who becomes a forest dweller for the sake of fewness of desires, for the sake of contentment, for the sake of eliminating, for the sake of solitude, for the sake of simplicity.
One who becomes a forest dweller for the sake of fewness of desires, for the sake of contentment, for the sake of eliminating, for the sake of solitude, for the sake of simplicity, is the foremost, the best, the preeminent, the supreme, and the finest of these five kinds of forest dwellers.
One who can teach the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by a Tathāgata is rare in the world.
One who causes schism in the Saṅgha is bound for misery, bound for hell, to abide there for an eon.
One who desires to see the virtuous ones,who wishes to hear the good Dhamma,who has removed the stain of miserliness,is called a person endowed with faith.
One who does not amass what he gains and one who does not squander what he gains.
One who does not feel remorse for a matter over which one need not feel remorse and one who feels remorse for a matter over which one should feel remorse.
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation … might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation … might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation … might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation, bliss of solitude, bliss of peace, bliss of enlightenment that I gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.”
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation, bliss of solitude, bliss of peace, bliss of enlightenment that I gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.”
One who does not gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, this bliss of renunciation, bliss of solitude, bliss of peace, bliss of enlightenment that I gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, might accept that vile pleasure, that slothful pleasure, the pleasure of gain, honor, and praise.”
One who does not kill or enjoin killing,who does not conquer or enjoin conquest,one who has loving-kindness toward all beingsharbors no enmity toward anyone.
One who does not know the insideand does not see the outside,a fool obstructed on all sides,is carried away by speech.
One who does not know the insideyet who clearly sees the outside,seeing the fruit externally,is also carried away by speech.
One who does not lend an ear does not have a supporting condition; one who lends an ear has a supporting condition.
One who does not possess noble concentration … One who does not possess noble wisdom … One who does not possess noble liberation is said to have fallen from this Dhamma and discipline.
One who does not possess noble virtuous behavior is said to have fallen from this Dhamma and discipline.
One who does not possess these four things is said to have fallen from this Dhamma and discipline.
One who does not see his transgression as a transgression and one who does not, in accordance with the Dhamma, accept the transgression of one who is confessing.
One who does not tremble when he arrivesat an assembly with fierce debaters;who does not omit wordsor conceal his message;who speaks without hesitation,and does not waver when asked a question;a bhikkhu like this is worthyof going on a mission.
One who dwells contemplating disenchantment in things that can fetter abandons lust, hatred, and delusion.
One who dwells contemplating gratification in things that can fetter does not abandon lust, hatred, and delusion.
One who engages in sexual misconduct has abstention from sexual misconduct as the means to avoid it.
One who explains a discourse whose meaning requires interpretation as a discourse whose meaning is explicit, and one who explains a discourse whose meaning is explicit as a discourse whose meaning requires interpretation.
One who explains a discourse whose meaning requires interpretation as a discourse whose meaning requires interpretation, and one who explains a discourse whose meaning is explicit as a discourse whose meaning is explicit.
One who explains what has not been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as having been stated and uttered by him, and one who explains what has been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as not having been stated and uttered by him.
One who explains what has not been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as not having been stated and uttered by him, and one who explains what has been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as having been stated and uttered by him.
One who feels remorse about a matter over which one need not feel remorse and one who does not feel remorse about a matter over which one should feel remorse.
One who grows here in wealth and grain,in children, wives, and livestock,is wealthy and famous, honoredby relatives, friends, and royalty.
One who has a mind bent on criticism is incapable of abandoning muddle-mindedness, lack of clear comprehension, and mental distraction.
One who has a supporting condition directly knows one thing, fully understands one thing, abandons one thing, and realizes one thing.
One who has abandoned five defilements,a fulfilled trainee, unable to retrogress,attained to mind’s mastery, his faculties composed:this person is called “one inwardly firm.”
One who has an undistracted mind is capable of abandoning careless attention, following a wrong path, and mental sluggishness.
One who has an unsluggish mind is capable of abandoning personal-existence view, doubt, and wrong grasp of behavior and observances.
One who has bad friends is incapable of abandoning lack of faith, uncharitableness, and laziness.
One who has committed a pārājika is sitting in that assembly; a discussion about one who has committed a pārājika is underway; one not fully ordained is sitting in that assembly;  a discussion about one not fully ordained is underway; one who has given up the training is sitting in that assembly; a discussion about one who has given up the training is underway; a eunuch is sitting in that assembly; a discussion about a eunuch is underway; a seducer of a bhikkhunī is sitting in that assembly; a discussion about a seducer of a bhikkhunī is underway.
One who has comprehended things high and low,burnt them up, so they’re gone and exist no more:that sage who has lived the spiritual life,reached the world’s end, is called“one who has gone beyond.”
One who has doubt is incapable of abandoning lust, hatred, and delusion.
One who has gone on retreat by body but not gone on retreat by mind; one who has not gone on retreat by body but has gone on retreat by mind; one who has not gone on retreat either by body or by mind; and one who has gone on retreat both by body and by mind.
One who has good friends is capable of abandoning lack of faith, uncharitableness, and laziness.
One who holds wrong view has right view as the means to avoid it.
One who indulges in idle chatter has abstention from idle chatter as the means to avoid it.
One who is competent and self-confident,learned, an expert on the Dhamma,practicing in accord with the Dhamma,is called an adornment of the Saṅgha.
One who is concentrated succeeds, not one who is unconcentrated.
One who is concentrated succeeds, not one who is unconcentrated.
One who is deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, does not understand as it really is his own good, the good of others, or the good of both.
One who is deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
One who is deluded, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
One who is energetic is capable of abandoning restlessness, non-restraint, and immorality.
One who is heedful is capable of abandoning disrespect, being difficult to speak to, and bad friendship.
One who is heedless is incapable of abandoning disrespect, being difficult to correct, and bad friendship.
One who is immoral is incapable of abandoning lack of desire to see the noble ones, lack of desire to hear the noble Dhamma, and a mind bent on criticism.
One who is lazy is incapable of abandoning restlessness, non-restraint, and immorality.
One who is mentally distracted is incapable of abandoning careless attention, following a wrong path, and mental sluggishness.
One who is mentally sluggish is incapable of abandoning personal-existence view, doubt, and wrong grasp of behavior and observances.
One who is poor, with little property and wealth.
One who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others; one who is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare; one who is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others; and one who is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.
One who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others; one who is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare; one who is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others; and one who is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.
One who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others; one who is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare; one who is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others; and one who is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.
One who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others; one who is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare; one who is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others; and one who is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.
One who is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others; one who is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare; one who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others; and one who is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.
One who is rich, with a lot of money and wealth, a king or royal minister.
One who is satisfied and one who provides satisfaction.
One who is virtuous is capable of abandoning lack of desire to see the noble ones, lack of desire to hear the noble Dhamma, and a mind bent on criticism.
One who is wise succeeds, not one who is unwise.
One who is wise succeeds, not one who is unwise.
One who judges on the basis of austerity, whose confidence is based on austerity.
One who judges on the basis of form, whose confidence is based on form.
One who judges on the basis of speech, whose confidence is based on speech.
One who judges on the basis of the Dhamma, whose confidence is based on the Dhamma.
One who lives off the fruit of his effort but not off the fruit of his kamma; one who lives off the fruit of his kamma but not off the fruit of his effort; one who lives off the fruit of both his effort and his kamma; and one who lives off the fruit of neither his effort nor his kamma.
One who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl because of his dullness and stupidity; one who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl because he has evil desires, because he is driven by desire; one who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl because he is mad and mentally deranged; one who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl,: ‘It is praised by the Buddhas and Buddhas’ disciples’; and one who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl for the sake of fewness of desires, for the sake of contentment, for the sake of eliminating, for the sake of solitude, for the sake of simplicity.
One who observes the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl for the sake of fewness of desires … for the sake of simplicity, is the foremost, the best, the preeminent, the supreme, and the finest of these five who observe the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl.
One who perceives non-self eradicates the conceit ‘I am,’ nibbāna in this very life.”
One who perceives non-self eradicates the conceit ‘I am,’ nibbāna in this very life.”
One who perceives what is non-Dhamma as Dhamma and one who perceives what is Dhamma as non-Dhamma.
One who perceives what is non-Dhamma as Dhamma and one who perceives what is Dhamma as non-Dhamma.
One who perceives what is non-Dhamma as non-Dhamma and one who perceives what is Dhamma as Dhamma.
One who perceives what is non-Dhamma as non-Dhamma and one who perceives what is Dhamma as Dhamma.
One who perceives what is non-discipline as discipline and one who perceives what is discipline as non-discipline.
One who perceives what is non-discipline as discipline and one who perceives what is discipline as non-discipline.
One who perceives what is non-discipline as non-discipline and one who perceives what is discipline as discipline.
One who perceives what is non-discipline as non-discipline and one who perceives what is discipline as discipline.
One who perceives what is not an offense as an offense and one who perceives what is an offense as no offense.
One who perceives what is not an offense as an offense and one who perceives what is an offense as no offense.
One who perceives what is not an offense as no offense and one who perceives what is an offense as an offense.
One who perceives what is not an offense as no offense and one who perceives what is an offense as an offense.
One who perceives what is unallowable as allowable and one who perceives what is allowable as unallowable.
One who perceives what is unallowable as allowable and one who perceives what is allowable as unallowable.
One who perceives what is unallowable as unallowable and one who perceives what is allowable as allowable.
One who perceives what is unallowable as unallowable and one who perceives what is allowable as allowable.
One who possesses noble concentration … One who possesses noble wisdom … One who possesses noble liberation is said to be secure in this Dhamma and discipline.
One who possesses noble virtuous behavior is said to be secure in this Dhamma and discipline.
One who possesses these five qualities may be appointed a supervisor of novices.”
One who possesses these five qualities should not be appointed a supervisor of novices.
One who possesses these five qualities, if appointed a supervisor of novices, should be sent.”
One who possesses these five qualities, if appointed a supervisor of novices, should not be sent.
One who possesses these five qualities, if appointed an assigner of meals, should be sent.”
One who possesses these four qualities is cast into hell as if brought there.”
One who possesses these four things is said to be secure in this Dhamma and discipline.”
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a fool.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses these three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who possesses three qualities should be known as a wise person.
One who prevents another from giving alms creates an obstruction and stumbling block for these three people.
One who prevents another from giving alms creates an obstruction and stumbling block for three people.
One who respectfully gives timely foodto those self-controlled ones who eat what others give,provides them with four things:life, beauty, happiness, and strength.
One who sees his transgression as a transgression and one who, in accordance with the Dhamma, accepts the transgression of one who is confessing.
One who speaks divisively has abstention from divisive speech as the means to avoid it.
One who speaks falsely has abstention from false speech as the means to avoid it.
One who speaks harshly has abstention from harsh speech as the means to avoid it.
One who takes responsibility for what befalls him and one who does not take responsibility for what does not befall him.
One who takes responsibility for what does not befall him and one who does not take responsibility for what befalls him.
One who takes the initiative in helping others and one who is grateful and thankful.
One who takes what is not given has abstention from taking what is not given as the means to avoid it.
One who teaches the Dhamma to others should first set up five qualities internally.
One who teaches the Dhamma to others should first set up these five qualities internally.”
One who understands quickly; one who understands through elaboration; one who needs to be guided; and one for whom the word is the maximum.
One who values anger, not the good Dhamma; one who values denigration, not the good Dhamma; one who values gain, not the good Dhamma; and one who values honor, not the good Dhamma.
One who values the good Dhamma, not anger; one who values the good Dhamma, not denigration; one who values the good Dhamma, not gain; one who values the good Dhamma, not honor.
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds are rotten will not have a good death.
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds become rotten will not have a good death.
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds do not become rotten will have a good death.
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds do not become rotten will have a good death.”
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds fail will not have a good death.
One whose bodily, verbal, and mental deeds have failed will not have a good death.
One whose deeds of body, speech, and mind do not fail will have a good death.
One whose deeds of body, speech, and mind do not fail will have a good death.”
One whose discernment is incisive but not free-flowing; one whose discernment is free-flowing but not incisive; one whose discernment is both incisive and free-flowing; and one whose discernment is neither incisive nor free-flowing.
One whose mind is like an open sore, one whose mind is like lightning, and one whose mind is like a diamond.
One whose mind is not bent on criticism is capable of abandoning muddle-mindedness, lack of clear comprehension, and mental distraction.
One with mindfulness established succeeds, not one who is muddle-minded.
One with mindfulness established succeeds, not one who is muddle-minded.
One with two eyes is said to bethe best kind of person.His wealth is acquired by his own exertion,with goods righteously gained.
One without a protector lives in suffering.
One without a protector lives in suffering.
One without a protector lives in suffering.
One without a protector lives in suffering.
One without doubt is capable of abandoning lust, hatred, and delusion.
One without faith, one without a sense of moral shame, one without moral dread, one of little learning, one who is lazy, one who is muddle-minded, and one who is unwise.
One would think it was fishermen at a haul of fish.”
One would think it was fishermen at a haul of fish.”
One would think it was fishermen at a haul of fish.”
One would think it was fishermen at a haul of fish.”
One-pointedness of mind equipped with these seven factors is called noble right concentration ‘with its supports’ and ‘with its accessories.’” 
Oneself as one’s authority, the world as one’s authority, and the Dhamma as one’s authority.
One’s children, wife, slaves, servants, and workers are called the householder’s fire.
One’s mindfulness is well established internally thus: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill the training pertaining to good conduct that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects the training pertaining to good conduct that I have fulfilled.’
And one’s mindfulness is well established internally thus: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill the training pertaining to the fundamentals of the spiritual life that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects the training pertaining to the fundamentals of the spiritual life that I have fulfilled.’
And one’s mindfulness is well established internally thus: ‘In just such a way I will scrutinize with wisdom the teachings that I have not yet scrutinized or assist with wisdom in various respects the teachings that I have scrutinized.’
And one’s mindfulness is well established internally thus: ‘In just such a way I will experience through liberation the Dhamma that I have not yet experienced or assist with wisdom in various respects the Dhamma that I have experienced.’
It is in this way that mindfulness is its authority.
One’s mother and father are called the fire of those worthy of gifts.
One’s mother and father.
One’s past abodes are to be realized by memory.
Only what is given to me is very fruitful, not what is given to others; only what is given to my disciples is very fruitful, not what is given to the disciples of others.”’ Do those who speak thus state what has been said by Master Gotama and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
Only what is given to me is very fruitful, not what is given to others; only what is given to my disciples is very fruitful, not what is given to the disciples of others.”’ Yet the Blessed One encourages me to give to the Nigaṇṭhas, too.
Or did deities report this matter to him?”
Or else, overcome by suffering, with a mind obsessed by it, he embarks upon a search outside, saying: ‘Who knows one or two words for putting an end to this suffering?’
Suffering, I say, results either in confusion or in a search.
Or he will do work for us.
Others become infatuated with one’s intonation.
Others say thus of him: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
I also say thus: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
Others say thus of him: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
I also say thus: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
Others say thus of him: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
I also say thus: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
Others say thus of him: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’
I also say thus: ‘He, too, is included in the world; he, too, is not yet released from the world.’ 
Others treat that person in a way that is desirable, lovable, and agreeable.
Others treat that person in a way that is desirable, lovable, and agreeable.
Others treat that person in a way that is undesirable, unlovable, and disagreeable.
Others treat that person in a way that is undesirable, unlovable, and disagreeable.
Our family lineage will be extended.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of abandoning.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of cessation.’
It is in such a way that you should you train yourselves.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of danger.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of dispassion.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of impermanence.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of non-self.
Our minds will be strengthened in the perception of unattractiveness.
Our teacher, who is highly skilled in our teachings, is present.
Our teacher, who is highly skilled in our teachings, is present.
Our teacher, who is highly skilled in our teachings, is present.
Our teacher, who is highly skilled in our teachings, is present.” 
Pain and dejection connected with sensuality do not occur in him.
Pain and dejection connected with the unwholesome do not occur in him.
Pain and dejection connected with the wholesome do not occur in him.
Parents are of great help to their children; they bring them up, feed them, and show them the world.
Passing away from there, he is a non-returner, one who does not return to this state of being.
Passing away from there, he is a non-returner, one who does not return to this state of being.
Passing away from there, he is a returner, one who returns to this state of being.
Peaceful, fumeless, untroubled, wishless,he has, I say, crossed over birth and old age.”
People are found who can claim to enjoy bodily health for one, two, three, four, and five years; for ten, twenty, thirty, forty, and fifty years; and even for a hundred years and more.
People engage in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
People saw him and said: “The king’s bull elephant is handsome!
Perceiving permanence in the impermanent,perceiving pleasure in what is suffering,perceiving a self in what is non-self,and perceiving attractiveness in what is unattractive,beings resort to wrong views,their minds deranged, their perception twisted.
Perception and feeling are a thorn to the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling.
Perhaps an ending of this entire mass of suffering can be attained.’
Then, after he has thus gone forth, his fellow monks exhort and instruct him: ‘You may consume this but not that; you may eat this but not that; you may taste this but not that; you may drink this but not that.
Perhaps an ending of this entire mass of suffering can be attained.’
Then, after he has thus gone forth, his fellow monks exhort and instruct him: ‘You should go forward in this way, return in this way; look ahead in this way, look aside in this way; draw in your limbs in this way, extend them in this way; you should wear your robes and carry your outer robe and bowl in this way.’
He thinks: ‘Formerly, when I was a layman, I exhorted and instructed others.
Perhaps an ending of this entire mass of suffering can be attained.’
Then, after he has thus gone forth, in the morning he dresses, takes his bowl and robe, and enters a village or town for alms, with body, speech, and mind unguarded, without having established mindfulness, his sense faculties unrestrained.
Perhaps an ending of this entire mass of suffering can be attained.’
Then, after he has thus gone forth, in the morning he dresses, takes his bowl and robe, and enters a village or town for alms, with body, speech, and mind unguarded, without having established mindfulness, his sense faculties unrestrained.
Perhaps an ending of this entire mass of suffering can be discerned.”
As one who has gone forth from the household life into homelessness, it would not be proper for me to seek out sensual pleasures similar to or worse than those that I have discarded.’
He then reflects thus: ‘Energy will be aroused in me without slackening; mindfulness will be established without confusion; my body will be tranquil without disturbance; my mind will be concentrated and one-pointed.’
Having taken himself as his authority, he abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome; he abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless; he maintains himself in purity.
Perhaps I can understand the meaning of the Blessed One’s statement; perhaps I can become an heir of the Blessed One’s statement.”
Perhaps I might come to understand the meaning of the Blessed One’s statement; perhaps I might become an heir of the Blessed One’s statement.”
Perhaps if he finds that our assembly is quiet, he will think to approach us.”
Then those wanderers of other sects became silent.
Perhaps then you might get to hear a Dhamma talk from the Blessed One.”
Perhaps, when you hear the Venerable Nārada’s Dhamma, you would abandon the dart of sorrow.” “Well then, friend Piyaka, inform the Venerable Nārada.
Peril, suffering, and disease,a boil, a dart, and a tie,a swamp and a womb:these describe the sensual pleasuresto which the worldling is attached.Being immersed in what is enjoyable,he again goes to the womb.
Peril, suffering, and disease,a boil, a tie, and a swamp:these describe the sensual pleasuresto which the worldling is attached.
Personal-existence view is broken; doubt is broken; wrong grasp of behavior and observances is broken; lust is broken; hatred is broken; delusion is broken; conceit is broken.
Personal-existence view is remote; doubt is remote; wrong grasp of behavior and observances is remote; lust is remote; hatred is remote; delusion is remote; conceit is remote.
Personal-existence view … delusion leading to the plane of misery.
Personal-existence view, doubt, and wrong grasp of behavior and observances.
Personal-existence view, doubt, and wrong grasp of behavior and observances.
Personal-existence view, doubt, wrong grasp of behavior and observances, lust leading to the plane of misery, hatred leading to the plane of misery, and delusion leading to the plane of misery.
Personal-existence view, doubt, wrong grasp of behavior and observances, lust leading to the plane of misery, hatred leading to the plane of misery, and delusion leading to the plane of misery.
Personal-existence view, doubt, wrong grasp of behavior and observances, lust leading to the plane of misery, hatred leading to the plane of misery, and delusion leading to the plane of misery.
Personal-existence view, doubt, wrong grasp of behavior and observances, sensual desire, and ill will.
Personal-existence view, doubt, wrong grasp of behavior and observances, sensual desire, and ill will.
Persons too, I say, are twofold: those to be associated with and those not to be associated with.
Place confidence in Sāriputta and Moggallāna, Kokālika.
Place confidence in Sāriputta and Moggallāna, Kokālika.
Pleasant is concord in the Saṅgha,and the mutual help of those who live in concord.Delighting in concord, established in Dhamma,one does not fall away from security from bondage.Having brought concord to the Saṅgha,one rejoices in heaven for an eon.
Please abandon the taints born of violation and dispel the taints born of remorse; then develop your mind and wisdom.
Please abandon the taints born of violation, and then develop your mind and wisdom.
Please clear up this matter yourself.”
Please develop your mind and wisdom.
Please dispel the taints born of remorse, and then develop your mind and wisdom.
Please let Master Gotama teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might understand the meaning in detail.”
Please let the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might understand in detail the meaning of this statement spoken in brief.”
Please let the Blessed One visit him out of compassion.”
The Blessed One consented by silence.
Please teach me the Dhamma for abandoning doubt.’
The esteemed bhikkhu then teaches him the Dhamma for abandoning doubt.
Please teach me the Dhamma for abandoning sensual lust.’
The esteemed bhikkhu then teaches him the Dhamma for abandoning sensual lust.
Please teach me the Dhamma for the destruction of the taints.’
The esteemed bhikkhu then teaches him the Dhamma for the destruction of the taints.
Pleasurable happiness and the happiness of equanimity.
Pleasure and joy connected with sensuality do not occur in him.
Pleasure and joy connected with the unwholesome do not occur in him.
Pleasure does not obsess his mind, and pain does not obsess his mind.
Pleasure obsesses his mind, and pain obsesses his mind.
Possessing right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, beings are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Possessing the above four qualities, a bhikkhu is able himself but not others.
Possessing the above four qualities, a bhikkhu is able others but not himself.
Possessing the above three qualities, a bhikkhu is able himself but not others.
Possessing the above three qualities, a bhikkhu is able others but not himself.
Possessing the above two qualities, a bhikkhu is able himself but not others.
Possessing the above two qualities, a bhikkhu is able others but not himself.”
Possessing the power of persuasion and the power of deliberation, willing to relinquish their opinion, they do not wrongly grasp that disciplinary issue even more tightly, nor, adhering to their position, do they declare: ‘This alone is true; anything else is wrong.’
This is called the assembly that speaks Dhamma.
Possessing these eight factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these eight factors, a master thief does not quickly get into trouble and lasts long.” 
Possessing these eight factors, a master thief quickly gets into trouble and does not last long.
Possessing these eight qualities, a bhikkhu is displeasing and disagreeable to his fellow monks and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these eight qualities, a bhikkhu is displeasing and disagreeable to his fellow monks and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these eight qualities, a bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these eight qualities, a bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these eight qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of going on a mission.
Possessing these eight qualities, Sāriputta is worthy of going on a mission.”
Possessing these eleven factors, a cowherd is capable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
Possessing these eleven factors, a cowherd is capable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
Possessing these eleven factors, a cowherd is incapable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
Possessing these eleven factors, a cowherd is incapable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
Possessing these five factors, a bhikkhu is a consumer of food, an occupant of space … yet still is reckoned as a bhikkhu.”
Possessing these five factors, a king’s bull elephant is a consumer of food … yet still is reckoned as a king’s bull elephant.
Possessing these five factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is … reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these five factors, a wheel-turning monarch sets the wheel in motion solely through the Dhamma, a wheel that cannot be turned back by any hostile creature in human form.
Possessing these five factors, speech is well spoken, not badly spoken; it is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise.”
Possessing these five factors, the eldest son of a wheel-turning monarch continues, solely through the Dhamma, to turn the wheel set in motion by his father, a wheel that cannot be turned back by any hostile creature in human form.
Possessing these five qualities inclusive of fame, he dwells in his own realm in whatever quarter he might dwell.
Possessing these five qualities inclusive of liberation, in whatever quarter he might dwell, he dwells liberated in mind.
Possessing these five qualities … and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities … and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities … and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities … and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities … and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities … nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities … nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities … nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities … nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu does not fall away but is established in the good Dhamma.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu dwells happily in this very life—without distress, anguish, and fever—and with the breakup of the body, after death, a good destination can be expected for him.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu dwells in suffering in this very life—with distress, anguish, and fever—and with the breakup of the body, after death, he can expect a bad destination.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu falls away and is not established in the good Dhamma.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is able both himself and others.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is at home in the four quarters.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of entering and dwelling in right concentration.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is fit to live apart from the Saṅgha.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is fit to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of entering and dwelling in right concentration.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is not fit to live apart from the Saṅgha.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is overcome by timidity.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is practicing for the welfare of others but not for his own welfare.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is practicing neither for his own welfare nor for the welfare of others.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is self-confident.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts … an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.” 
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu may be attended upon by a novice.” 
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu may give dependence.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu may give full ordination.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu who is a visitor of families is displeasing and disagreeable to them and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhu who is a visitor of families is pleasing and agreeable to them and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī … a female probationer … a male novice … a female novice is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a bhikkhunī … a female probationer … a male novice … a female novice is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a devadhammika is deposited in hell as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower dwells self-confident at home.”
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower dwells without self-confidence at home.
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is a caṇḍāla of a lay follower, a stain of a lay follower, the last among lay followers.
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is a gem of a lay follower, a red lotus of a lay follower, a white lotus of a lay follower.”
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is overcome by timidity.
Possessing these five qualities, a lay follower is self-confident.”
Possessing these five qualities, a male lay follower … a female lay follower is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a male lay follower … a female lay follower is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a patient is difficult to take care of.
Possessing these five qualities, a patient is easy to take care of.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu beautifies a monastery.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in heaven as if brought there.” 
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is not to be esteemed.
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is to be esteemed.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu is very helpful to a monastery.”
Possessing these five qualities, a resident bhikkhu shows compassion to laypeople.”
Possessing these five qualities, a reverential and deferential bhikkhu does not fall away but is established in the good Dhamma.”
Possessing these five qualities, a reverential and deferential bhikkhu is capable of achieving growth, progress, and maturity in this Dhamma and discipline.”
Possessing these five qualities, an attendant is not qualified to take care of a patient.
Possessing these five qualities, an attendant is qualified to take care of a patient.”
Possessing these five qualities, an elder bhikkhu is displeasing and disagreeable to his fellow monks and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these five qualities, an elder bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these five qualities, an elder is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.” 
Possessing these five qualities, an irreverent and undeferential bhikkhu is not capable of achieving growth, progress, and maturity in this Dhamma and discipline.
Possessing these five qualities, an irreverent and undeferential bhikkhu is not established in the good Dhamma.
Possessing these five qualities, an Ājīvaka is deposited in hell as if brought there.”
Possessing these five qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
Possessing these five qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
Possessing these five qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
Possessing these five qualities, someone may be taken along as an attendant monk.”
Possessing these five qualities, someone should not be taken along as an attendant monk.
Possessing these five qualities, Sāriputta continues, solely through the Dhamma, to turn the unsurpassed wheel of the Dhamma set in motion by the Tathāgata, a wheel that cannot be turned back by any ascetic, brahmin, deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or by anyone in the world.”
Possessing these five qualities, the Tathāgata … sets in motion the unsurpassed wheel of the Dhamma solely through the Dhamma, a wheel that cannot be turned back … by anyone in the world.”
Possessing these five qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.”
Possessing these five qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.”
Possessing these five qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.”
Possessing these five things, a bhikkhu cultivating mindfulness of breathing in no long time penetrates to the unshakable.”
Possessing these five things, a bhikkhu developing mindfulness of breathing in no long time penetrates to the unshakable.”
Possessing these five things, a bhikkhu in no long time penetrates to the unshakable.”
Possessing these five things, a bhikkhu pursuing mindfulness of breathing in no long time penetrates to the unshakable.”
Possessing these forty qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these forty qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these four factors, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these four factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is … reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these four factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is … reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these four factors, a warrior is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned a factor of kingship.
Possessing these four qualities a bhikkhu is fit to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.”
Possessing these four qualities a bhikkhu is not fit to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
Possessing these four qualities one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these four qualities one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much demerit.
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much demerit.
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much demerit.
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much demerit.
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much merit.”
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much merit.”
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much merit.”
Possessing these four qualities … he generates much merit.” 
Possessing these four qualities, the foolish, incompetent, bad person maintains himself in a maimed and injured condition; he is blameworthy and subject to reproach by the wise; and he generates much demerit.
Possessing these four qualities, the wise, competent, good person preserves himself unmaimed and uninjured; he is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise; and he generates much merit.”
Possessing these nine factors, a family that has not yet been approached is not worth approaching, and one that has been approached is not worth sitting with.
Possessing these nine factors, a family that has not yet been approached is worth approaching, and one that has been approached is worth sitting with.”
Possessing these seven factors, a family that has not yet been approached is not worth approaching, or one that has been approached is not worth sitting with.
Possessing these seven factors, a family that has not yet been approached is worth approaching, or one that has been approached is worth sitting with.”
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu can before long, with the destruction of the taints, realize for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, can dwell in it.”
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu exercises mastery over his mind, and is not a servant of his mind.”
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu is displeasing and disagreeable to his fellow monks and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu is displeasing and disagreeable to his fellow monks and is neither respected nor esteemed by them.
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
Possessing these seven qualities, a bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.” 
Possessing these seven qualities, Sāriputta exercises mastery over his mind and is not a servant of his mind.”
Possessing these six factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these six factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these six factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu abounds in happiness and joy in this very life, and he has laid the foundation for the destruction of the taints.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu in no long time attains to greatness and vastness in qualities.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is able both himself and others.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of achieving a wholesome quality that he has not yet achieved and of strengthening a wholesome quality that has already been achieved.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of attaining strength in concentration.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of realizing a particular state, there being a suitable basis.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of realizing arahantship, the foremost state.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is capable of realizing the unsurpassed coolness.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of achieving a wholesome quality that he has not yet achieved or of strengthening a wholesome quality that has already been achieved.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of attaining strength in concentration.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of realizing a particular state, there is a suitable basis.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of realizing arahantship, the foremost state.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is incapable of realizing the unsurpassed coolness.
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
Possessing these six qualities, a bhikkhu might split the Himalayas, the king of mountains, how much more then vile ignorance!”
Possessing these six qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
Possessing these six qualities, even while listening to the good Dhamma one is incapable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.
Possessing these six qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these six qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.” 
Possessing these six qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these six qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these six qualities, the householder Sāragga has reached certainty about the Tathāgata and become a seer of the deathless, one who lives having realized the deathless.”
Possessing these six qualities, the householder Tapussa has reached certainty about the Tathāgata and become a seer of the deathless, one who lives having realized the deathless.”
Possessing these six qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.”
Possessing these six qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.”
Possessing these six qualities, while listening to the good Dhamma one is capable of entering upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities.” 
Possessing these six things, a bhikkhu dwells happily in this very life—without distress, anguish, and fever—and with the breakup of the body, after death, a good destination can be expected for him.” 
Possessing these six things, a bhikkhu dwells in suffering in this very life—with distress, anguish, and fever—and with the breakup of the body, after death, a bad destination can be expected for him.
Possessing these ten qualities, a female lay follower dwells self-confident at home.”
Possessing these ten qualities, a female lay follower dwells without self-confidence at home.
Possessing these ten qualities, a female lay follower is deposited in heaven as if brought there.” 
Possessing these ten qualities, a female lay follower is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these ten qualities, an elder bhikkhu dwells at ease in whatever quarter he lives.”
Possessing these ten qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these ten qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these ten qualities, women are deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these ten qualities, women are deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these thirty qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these thirty qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three factors, a bhikkhu is capable of achieving a wholesome state not yet attained and of increasing a wholesome state already attained.”
Possessing these three factors, a bhikkhu is incapable of achieving a wholesome state not yet attained or of increasing a wholesome state already attained.
Possessing these three factors, a king’s excellent thoroughbred horse is … reckoned as a factor of kingship.
Possessing these three factors, a shopkeeper is capable of acquiring wealth not yet acquired and of increasing wealth already acquired.
Possessing these three factors, a shopkeeper is incapable of acquiring wealth not yet acquired or of increasing wealth already acquired.
Possessing these three factors, a warrior is worthy of a king, an accessory of a king, and reckoned a factor of kingship.
Possessing these three qualities and having abandoned these three stains, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.” 
Possessing these three qualities and without having abandoned these three stains, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three qualities … he generates much demerit.
Possessing these three qualities … he generates much merit.”
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans … and gained the ultimate consummation.”
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans … and gained the ultimate consummation.”
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans … and gained the ultimate consummation.”
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans: one who has … gained the ultimate consummation.
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans: one who has … gained the ultimate consummation.
Possessing these three qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans: one who has … gained the ultimate consummation.
Possessing these three qualities, a well-known bhikkhu is acting for the harm of many people, for the unhappiness of many people, for the ruin, harm, and suffering of many people, of devas and human beings.
Possessing these three qualities, a well-known bhikkhu is acting for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, for the good, welfare, and happiness of many people, of devas and human beings.”
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.” 
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these three qualities, the foolish, incompetent, bad person maintains himself in a maimed and injured condition; he is blameworthy and subject to reproach by the wise; and he generates much demerit.
Possessing these three qualities, the wise, competent, good person preserves himself unmaimed and uninjured; he is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise; and he generates much merit.”
Possessing these three qualities, the wise, competent, good person preserves himself unmaimed and uninjured; he is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise; and he generates much merit.”
Possessing these twenty qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these twenty qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.
Possessing these two qualities, a bhikkhu is best among devas and humans: one who has reached the ultimate conclusion, won ultimate security from bondage, lived the ultimate spiritual life, and gained the ultimate consummation.
Possessing these two qualities, one dwells happily.”
Possessing these two qualities, one dwells in suffering.”
Possessing these two qualities, one is deposited in heaven as if brought there.”
Possessing these two qualities, one is deposited in hell as if brought there.” 
Possessing these two qualities, the foolish, incompetent, bad person maintains himself in a maimed and injured condition; he is blameworthy and subject to reproach by the wise; and he generates much demerit.
Possessing these two qualities, the foolish, incompetent, bad person maintains himself in a maimed and injured condition; he is blameworthy and subject to reproach by the wise; and he generates much demerit.
Possessing these two qualities, the wise, competent, good person preserves himself unmaimed and uninjured; he is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise; and he generates much merit.”
Possessing these two qualities, the wise, competent, good person preserves himself unmaimed and uninjured; he is blameless and beyond reproach by the wise; and he generates much merit.”
Possessing these two qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, someone here is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Possessing these two qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, someone here is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.”
Possessing this aggregate of noble virtuous behavior, he experiences blameless bliss within himself.
Possessing this aggregate of noble virtuous behavior, he experiences blameless bliss within himself.
Possessing this noble restraint of the faculties, he experiences unsullied bliss within himself.
Possessing this noble restraint of the faculties, he experiences unsullied bliss within himself.
Possessing those five qualities, an elder is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.
Possessing wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, beings are reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.”
Poverty is called suffering in the world;so too is getting into debt.A poor person who becomes indebtedis troubled while enjoying himself.
Practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge; practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge; practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge; and practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
Practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge; practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge; practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge; and practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
Practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge; practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge; practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge; and practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
Practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge; practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge; practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge; and practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
Practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge; practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge; practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge; and practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
Practicing in accordance with it, I have realized for myself with direct knowledge the unsurpassed culmination of the spiritual life and make it known to others.
Practicing in accordance with it, you too will realize for yourselves with direct knowledge the unsurpassed culmination of the spiritual life and dwell in it.’
Thus the teacher teaches this Dhamma and others practice accordingly.
Praised by those who are praised, Master Gotama is best among devas and humans!”
Princess Cundī then said to the Blessed One:
Princess Sumanā then said to the Blessed One:
Prior to giving one is joyful;while giving one settles the mind in trust;after giving one is elated:this is success in the act of offering.
Pure bodily action, pure verbal action, and pure mental action.
Pure in body, pure in speech,pure in mind, without taints:they call the pure one, accomplished in purity,“one who has washed away evil.”
Purity by mind is threefold.
Purity by speech is fourfold.
Pursuit of an attractive object is a thorn to one intent on meditation on the mark of the unattractive.
Put limits on your speech.’
Putrid urine is a trifle among medicines, easily gained and blameless.
Rapture is a thorn to the third jhāna.
Rather, a relative or family member of his has fallen ill or died.
Rather, Devadatta teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus thus: ‘When, friends, a bhikkhu’s mind is well consolidated by mind, it is fitting for him to declare: “I understand: Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.”’
Rather, Devadatta teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus thus: ‘When, friends, a bhikkhu’s mind is well consolidated by mind, it is fitting for him to declare: “I understand: Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.”’”
Rather, dig there.’
He digs there as well but doesn’t find anything.
Rather, dig there.’
He digs there as well but doesn’t find anything.
Rather, he himself is stricken by bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable, sapping one’s vitality.
Rather, I describe one who possesses four qualities as a great man with great wisdom.
Rather, it was right here that those deities developed their minds in such a way that ten … and even sixty in number stand in an area even as small as the tip of an awl yet do not encroach upon one another.
Rather, when he thinks, he thinks only of his own welfare, the welfare of others, the welfare of both, and the welfare of the whole world.
Rather, you were the one who did that bad kamma, and you yourself will have to experience its result.’
Rather, you were the one who did that bad kamma, and you yourself will have to experience its result.’
Rather, you were the one who did that bad kamma, and you yourself will have to experience its result.’
Rebirth in the sphere of the noble ones is rare in the world.
Recitation is a nutriment for learning.
Recollecting this, a mortalremains firm in the noble Dhamma.They praise him here in this life,and after death he rejoices in heaven.
Recollecting this, a mortalremains firm in the noble Dhamma.They praise him here in this life,and after death he rejoices in heaven.
Recollection of generosity….
Recollection of peace.
Recollection of the Buddha, recollection of the Dhamma, recollection of the Saṅgha, recollection of virtuous behavior, recollection of generosity, and recollection of the deities.
Recollection of the Buddha, recollection of the Dhamma, recollection of the Saṅgha, recollection of virtuous behavior, recollection of generosity, and recollection of the deities.
Recollection of the Buddha.
Recollection of the devas….
Recollection of the Dhamma….
Recollection of the Saṅgha….
Recollection of virtuous behavior….
Rectitude and gentleness … Patience and mildness … Softness of speech and hospitality … Harmlessness and purity … Not guarding the doors of the sense faculties and immoderation in eating … Guarding the doors of the sense faculties and moderation in eating … The power of reflection and the power of development … The power of mindfulness and the power of concentration … … Serenity and insight … Failure in virtuous behavior and failure in view … Accomplishment of virtuous behavior and accomplishment of view … Purity of virtuous behavior and purity of view … Purity of view and striving in accordance with one’s view … Non-contentment in regard to wholesome qualities and indefatigability in striving … Muddle-mindedness and lack of clear comprehension … Mindfulness and clear comprehension.
Rectitude, speed, gentleness, patience, and mildness.
Rectitude, speed, gentleness, patience, and mildness.
Rectitude, speed, patience, and mildness.
Rectitude, speed, patience, and mildness.
Referring to the past, one would say: ‘So it was in the past.’
Referring to the future, one would say: ‘So it will be in the future.’
Referring to the present, one would say: ‘So it is now, at present.’
Reflecting carefully, he avoids sitting in unsuitable seats, and wandering in unsuitable alms resorts, and associating with bad friends, such that his wise fellow monks might suspect him of evil deeds.
Reflecting carefully, he develops the enlightenment factor of discrimination of phenomena … the enlightenment factor of energy … the enlightenment factor of rapture … the enlightenment factor of tranquility … the enlightenment factor of concentration … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Reflecting carefully, he does not tolerate an arisen thought of ill will … an arisen thought of harming … bad unwholesome states whenever they arise; he abandons them, dispels them, terminates them, and obliterates them.
Reflecting carefully, he uses almsfood neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the support and maintenance of this body, for avoiding harm, and for assisting the spiritual life, considering: ‘Thus I shall terminate the old feeling and not arouse a new feeling, and I shall be healthy and blameless and dwell at ease.’
Reflecting carefully, he uses a lodging only for warding off cold; for warding off heat; for warding off contact with flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and serpents; and only for protection from rough weather and for enjoying seclusion.
Reflecting carefully, he uses medicines and provisions for the sick only for warding off arisen oppressive feelings and to sustain his health.
Rejoicing in heedfulness,prudent, restrained by virtue,in time they realizewhere it is that suffering ceases.
Remember me, brahmin, as a Buddha.
Renunciation seems like a precipice to us.
Renunciation, Bhante, is the dividing line between the multitude and the bhikkhus in this Dhamma and discipline.’”
Renunciation, Bhante, is the dividing line between the multitude and the bhikkhus in this Dhamma and discipline.” 
Resolute, he realizes the supreme truth with the body and, having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees it.
Resolute, he realizes the supreme truth with the body and, having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees it.
Resolute, he realizes the supreme truth with the body and, having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees it.
Resolute, he realizes the supreme truth with the body and, having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees it.
Resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.’
Respectful toward the Teacher,respectful toward the Dhamma,deeply revering the Saṅgha,endowed with moral shame and moral dread:one who is deferential and reverentialcannot fall away, but is close to nibbāna.
Respectful toward the Teacher,respectful toward the Dhamma,deeply revering the Saṅgha,respectful toward concentration, ardent,deeply respectful toward the training;cultivating good friends,being easy to correct,deferential and reverential:such a one cannot fall awaybut is close to nibbāna.
Respectful toward the Teacher,respectful toward the Dhamma,deeply revering the Saṅgha,respectful toward concentration, ardent,deeply respectful toward the training;endowed with moral shame and moral dread,deferential and reverential:such a one cannot fall awaybut is close to nibbāna.
Respectful toward the Teacher,respectful toward the Dhamma,deeply revering the Saṅgha,respectful toward concentration, ardent,deeply respectful toward the training;respectful toward heedfulness,holding hospitality in reverence:this bhikkhu cannot fall away,but is close to nibbāna.
Respectful toward the Teacher,respectful toward the Dhamma,deeply revering the Saṅgha,respectful toward heedfulness,revering hospitality: this bhikkhucannot fall away, but is close to nibbāna.
Restlessness, non-restraint, and heedlessness.
Restlessness, non-restraint, and immorality.
Restlessness, non-restraint, and immorality.
Restraint and abandonment,development and protection:by means of these four strivingstaught by the Kinsman of the Suna bhikkhu who is ardent herecan attain the destruction of suffering.
Restraint and abandonment,development and protection:these four strivings were taughtby the Kinsman of the Sun.By these means an ardent bhikkhu herecan attain the destruction of suffering.
Restraint is to be developed for abandoning non-restraint.
Restraint of the sense faculties is a nutriment for celibacy.
Restraint of the sense faculties, becoming full, fills up the three kinds of good conduct.
Restraint of the sense faculties, too, I say, has a nutriment; it is not without nutriment.
Reverence for the Teacher … and good friendship.
Reverence for the Teacher … and reverence for hospitality.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, being easy to correct, and good friendship.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for a sense of moral shame, and reverence for moral dread.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for concentration, being easy to correct, and good friendship.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for concentration, being easy to correct, and good friendship.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for concentration, reverence for a sense of moral shame, and reverence for moral dread.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for concentration, reverence for heedfulness, and reverence for hospitality.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for heedfulness, and reverence for hospitality.
Reverence for the Teacher, reverence for the Dhamma, reverence for the Saṅgha, reverence for the training, reverence for heedfulness, and reverence for hospitality.
Rich in faith, possessed of virtue,charitable and devoid of miserliness,she constantly purifies the paththat leads to safety in the future life.
Right practice is a nutriment for the heavens.
Right there I went for refuge to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and undertook the training rules with celibacy as the fifth.
Right view is to be developed for abandoning wrong view.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view … and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, and right mindfulness.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration: this is called kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Right view, right knowledge, and right liberation.
Righteous bodily action, righteous verbal action, and righteous mental action.
Robes, too, should be understood to be twofold: those to be used and those not to be used.
Rāhu is the foremost of those with bodies,Mandhātā, of those enjoying sense pleasures;Māra is the foremost of rulers,blazing with power and glory.
Sakka approached this deity and said: ‘Why, deity, do you stand to one side, sad and miserable, weeping with a tearful face?’ – ‘It is, sir, because a violent rainstorm came and twisted and uprooted my dwelling.’ – ‘But, deity, were you following the duty of a tree when the violent rainstorm came and twisted and uprooted your dwelling?’ – ‘But how, sir, does a tree follow the duty of a tree?’ – ‘Here, deity, those who need roots take its roots; those who need bark take its bark; those who need leaves take its leaves; those who need flowers take its flowers; and those who need fruit take its fruit.
Say: ‘Bhante, King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Magadha pays homage to the Blessed One with his head at your feet.
Saying that one has not seen what one has not seen, saying that one has not heard what one has not heard, saying that one has not sensed what one has not sensed, saying that one has not cognized what one has not cognized.
Saying that one has not seen what one has not seen; saying that one has not heard what one has not heard; saying that one has not sensed what one has not sensed; saying that one has not cognized what one has not cognized; saying that one has seen what one has actually seen; saying that one has heard what one has actually heard; saying that one has sensed what one has actually sensed; saying that one has cognized what one has actually cognized.
Saying that one has not seen what one has seen, saying that one has not heard what one has heard, saying that one has not sensed what one has sensed, saying that one has not cognized what one has cognized.
Saying that one has seen what one has not seen, saying that one has heard what one has not heard, saying that one has sensed what one has not sensed, saying that one has cognized what one has not cognized.
Saying that one has seen what one has not seen; saying that one has heard what one has not heard; saying that one has sensed what one has not sensed; saying that one has cognized what one has not cognized; saying that one has not seen what one has actually seen; saying that one has not heard what one has actually heard; saying that one has not sensed what one has actually sensed; saying that one has not cognized what one has actually cognized.
Saying that one has seen what one has seen, saying that one has heard what one has heard, saying that one has sensed what one has sensed, saying that one has cognized what one has cognized.
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement.
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement.
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement.
Saying, “Yes, noble lady,” those lay followers of Kajaṅgalā delighted and rejoiced in the statement of the bhikkhunī of Kajaṅgalā.
Secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered and dwelled in the first jhāna, which consists of rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by thought and examination.
See how much wrong you have done.”
Seeing these three advantages, it is enough to teach others the Dhamma.”
Seeing these two advantages, I resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.”
Seeing this thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeing this thus, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with it; being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate toward the foremost, not to speak of what is inferior.
Seeking for material goods and seeking for the Dhamma.
Seeking for sense pleasures,seeking for existence,seeking for a spiritual life;the tight grasp “Such is the truth,”viewpoints swellings: for one entirely detached from lust,liberated by the destruction of craving,such seeking has been relinquished,and viewpoints are uprooted.
Sense-sphere existence, form-sphere existence, and formless-sphere existence: these are the three kinds of existence to be abandoned.
Sensual craving, craving for existence, and craving for extermination: these are the three kinds of craving that are to be abandoned.
Sensual desire for forms is one thing, sensual desire for sounds is another, sensual desire for odors still another, sensual desire for tastes still another, and sensual desire for tactile objects still another.
Sensual desire is an obstruction, a hindrance, an encumbrance of the mind, a state that weakens wisdom.
Sensual desire … one has clearly seen with correct wisdom, as it really is, the danger in sensual pleasures.
Sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
Sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
Sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, doubt; and one has not clearly seen with correct wisdom, as it really is, the danger in sensual pleasures.
Sensual happiness and the happiness of renunciation.
Sensual perception, perception of ill will, and perception of harming.
Sensual pleasures, whether of this or that kind, can be obtained by a youth.
Sensual thought … perception of harming.
Sensual thought, the thought of ill will, the thought of harming, sensual perception, perception of ill will, and perception of harming.
Sensual thought, the thought of ill will, the thought of harming, sensual perception, perception of ill will, and perception of harming.
Sensual thought, thought of ill will, and thought of harming.
Sensual thoughts, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of harming.
Sensual thoughts, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of harming.
Serenity and insight.
Serenity and insight.
Serenity and insight.
Serenity and insight.
Serenity and insight.
Serenity is to be developed for abandoning restlessness.
Sexual intercourse and giving birth.
Sexual misconduct is non-Dhamma; abstention from sexual misconduct is the Dhamma….
Sexual misconduct is the near shore, abstention from sexual misconduct the far shore.
Sexual misconduct, I say, is also threefold: caused by greed, caused by hatred, and caused by delusion.
Sharing material goods and sharing the Dhamma.
She abstains from the destruction of life … and holds right view.
She abstains from the destruction of life … and holds right view.
She abstains from the destruction of life … from liquor, wine, and intoxicants….
She abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech, abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
She becomes excited by these and takes delight in them.
She becomes excited by these and takes delight in them.
She destroys life … and holds wrong view.
She destroys life … and holds wrong view.
She destroys life … and indulges in liquor, wine, and intoxicants….
She destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsely, and indulges in liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
She does not become excited by these or take delight in them.
She does not become excited by these or take delight in them.
She does not despise her husband,the man who constantly supports her,who ardently and eagerlyalways brings her whatever she wants.
She does not despise her husband,the man who constantly supports her,who ardently and eagerlyalways brings her whatever she wants.
She does not give things to ascetics or brahmins: food and drink; clothing and vehicles; garlands, scents, and unguents; bedding, dwellings, and lighting.
She does not squander gifts given out of faith.
She does not squander gifts given out of faith.
She does not squander gifts given out of faith.
She doesn’t even honor, respect, esteem, and venerate the Blessed One.”
She doesn’t obey her father-in-law, her mother-in-law, or her husband.
She gives life, beauty, happiness, and strength.
She grows in faith, virtuous behavior, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
She holds right view and has right intentions.
She holds wrong view and has wrong intentions.
She is envious and miserly.
She is free from envy and from miserliness.
She is miserly with dwellings, families, gains, praise, and the Dhamma.
She is not miserly with dwellings, families, gains, praise, and the Dhamma.
She is one of my white-robed female lay disciples who have attained a foothold, a firm stand, assurance in this Dhamma and discipline, who have crossed over doubt, gotten rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s teaching.
She is one of my white-robed female lay disciples who obtain internal serenity of mind.
She pays homage to Master Ānanda with her head at his feet.’
Then say: ‘It would be good, Bhante, if, out of compassion, Master Ānanda would come to visit that bhikkhunī in the bhikkhunīs’ quarters.’”
She places faith in the enlightenment of the Tathāgata thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed trainer of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
It is in this way that a woman is accomplished in faith.
She rises early, works diligently,manages the domestic help;she treats her husband in agreeable waysand safeguards the wealth he earns.
She rises early, works diligently,manages the domestic help;she treats her husband in agreeable waysand safeguards the wealth he earns.
She squanders gifts given out of faith.
She squanders gifts given out of faith.
She squanders gifts given out of faith.
She then paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
She went to the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
She who grows in faith and virtuous behavior,in wisdom, generosity, and learning—such a virtuous female lay followerabsorbs for herself the essence of this life.
She would go to a region where she had never gone before, eat grass that she had never eaten before, drink water that she had never drunk before; and she would return safely to the region where she was staying when it occurred to her: ‘I should go to a region where I have never gone before, eat grass that I have never eaten before, drink water that I have never drunk before.’
For what reason?
She would not go to a region where she had never gone before, eat grass that she had never eaten before, drink water that she had never drunk before; and she would not return safely to the region where she was staying when it occurred to her: ‘I should go to a region where I have never gone before, eat grass that I have never eaten before, drink water that I have never drunk before.’
For what reason?
Should the first among those chicks to pierce its shell with the points of its claws or beak and safely hatch be called the eldest or the youngest?”
Shouldn’t you, and Sāriputta and Moggallāna, settle any disciplinary issues that arise?
Shrouded in darkness,slaves of craving, led along,they take renewed existenceand fill the terrible charnel ground.
Since a bhikkhu has aroused energy … not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu has aroused energy … … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu has good friends … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu has good friends, good companions, good comrades, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu has learned much … and penetrated well by view, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu has learned much … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is content with any kind of robe … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is content with any kind of … provisions for the sick, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu is easy to correct … and receives instruction respectfully, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu is easy to correct … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is mindful … and recollects what was done and said long ago, this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu is mindful … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent … this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu is virtuous … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces to cohesiveness, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is virtuous … trains in them, this is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu is wise … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu is wise … this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma … this is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces … to unity.
Since a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma … this, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
Since he does as he speaks and speaks as he does, therefore he is called the Tathāgata.
Since he does not associate with other bhikkhus, he does not get to hear the good Dhamma.
Since he does not associate with other bhikkhus, he does not get to hear the good Dhamma.
Since he does not get to hear the good Dhamma, he falls away from the good Dhamma.
Since he does not get to hear the good Dhamma, he falls away from the good Dhamma.
Since he does not get to hear the good Dhamma, he falls away from the good Dhamma.
Since he does not stop at the boundary of the ancient brahmins but violates it, he is called a brahmin who has crossed the boundary.
Since he has lost much of his confidence in them, he does not associate with other bhikkhus.
Since he stops at the boundary of the ancient brahmins but does not violate it, he is called a brahmin who remains within the boundary.
Since he torments neither himself nor others, in this very life he dwells hungerless, quenched and cooled, experiencing bliss, having himself become divine.
Since her death, he did not bathe, anoint himself, eat his meals, or undertake his work.
Since her death, he does not bathe, anoint himself, eat his meals, or undertake his work.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth bondage of the mind that he has not eradicated.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth kind of mental barrenness that he has not abandoned.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the first bondage of the mind that he has not eradicated.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the first bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the first bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the first kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the first kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fourth bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the fourth kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the second bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the second kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the third bondage of the mind.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … and striving, this is the third kind of mental barrenness.
Since his mind does not incline to ardor … … and striving, this is the first kind of mental barrenness that he has not abandoned.
Since his mind inclines to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth bondage of the mind that he has well eradicated.
Since his mind inclines to ardor … and striving, this is the fifth kind of mental barrenness that he has abandoned.
Since his mind inclines to ardor … and striving, this is the first bondage of the mind that he has well eradicated.
Since his mind inclines to ardor … and striving, this is the first kind of mental barrenness that he has abandoned.
Since I declared myself a lay follower, I don’t recall ever intentionally transgressing any training rule.”
Since I teach the Dhamma through direct knowledge, not without direct knowledge; since I teach the Dhamma with a basis, not without a basis; since I teach the Dhamma that is antidotal, not one without antidotes, my exhortation should be acted upon, my instructions should be acted upon.
Since that is so, this is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed….
Since that is so, this is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One and display such an offering of loving-kindness to him.
Since that is so, this is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
Since that is so, this is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
Since that is so, this is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
Since the queen’s death, he does not bathe, anoint himself, eat his meals, or undertake his work.
Since the Tathāgata has realized for himself … the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which he claims the place of the chief bull, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata has realized for himself … the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata recollects his manifold past abodes … with their aspects and details, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata recollects his manifold past abodes … with their aspects and details, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the defilement, the cleansing, and the emergence in regard to the jhānas … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the defilement, the cleansing, and the emergence in regard to the jhānas … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the diversity in the dispositions of beings, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the possible as possible and the impossible as impossible, this is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which he claims the place of the chief bull, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the possible as possible and the impossible as impossible, this is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he claims the place of the chief bull, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the result of the undertaking of kamma … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the superior or inferior condition of the faculties of other beings and persons, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the ways leading everywhere, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is the world with its numerous and diverse elements, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata understands as it really is … the result of the undertaking of kamma … this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata … understands how beings fare in accordance with their kamma, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, on account of which … he sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since the Tathāgata … understands how beings fare in accordance with their kamma, this too is a Tathāgata’s power that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he … sets in motion the brahma wheel.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they all have compassion for him, only growth in wholesome qualities and not decline is to be expected for him.
Since they do not apprehend as true and valid anything that should be done or should not be done, they are muddle-minded, they do not guard themselves, and even the personal designation ‘ascetic’ could not be legitimately applied to them.
Since they do not apprehend as true and valid anything that should be done or should not be done, they are muddle-minded, they do not guard themselves, and even the personal designation ‘ascetic’ could not be legitimately applied to them.
Since they do not apprehend as true and valid anything that should be done or should not be done, they are muddle-minded, they do not guard themselves, and even the personal designation ‘ascetic’ could not be legitimately applied to them.
Since they have already seen this dartto which people cling and adhere, “I know, I see, it is just so,”the Tathāgatas cling to nothing.
Since we are similar with regard to concentration, we will have a discussion on concentration, and it will flow on smoothly between us, and we will feel at ease.
Since we are similar with regard to wisdom, we will have a discussion on wisdom, and it will flow on smoothly between us, and we will feel at ease.’
Therefore such a person is to be associated with, followed, and served.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it, he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty; he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it, he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty; he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Sincerity is a nutriment for friendships.
Sirs, do not make any noise.
Sit down, respected Moggallāna.
Sit down, respected Moggallāna.
Sitting to one side, the Kālāmas said to the Blessed One:
Sixty bhikkhus gave up the training and returned to the lower life, saying: “It is difficult to do, Blessed One, very difficult to do.”
And the minds of sixty bhikkhus were liberated from the taints by non-clinging.
Skillfulness in a meditative attainment and skillfulness in emerging from a meditative attainment.
Slaves, workers, and servants do their work without grimacing.
Slaves, workers, and servants grimace when they do their work.
Slight is the unlucky throw at dicethat results in the loss of one’s wealth, of all, oneself included;much worse is this unlucky throwof harboring hate against the fortunate ones.
So for the third time, Bhante, I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.
So he returned to the Blessed One and told him: “Bhante, there is no suitable rest house in Kapilavatthu where the Blessed One might stay for the night.
So I am the eldest, the best in the world.
So I take it.”
So I take it.”
So I take it.”
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena, so unstable, so unreliable.
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena, so unstable, so unreliable.
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena….
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena….
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena….
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena….
So impermanent are conditioned phenomena….
So it is the eldest among them.”
So it is, brahmin!
So it is, Fortunate One!
So it is, Fortunate One!
So it is, Sumanā!
So it is, Ānanda!
So powerful among the animals is the lion, the king of beasts, so majestic and mighty.
So since the world is ablazewith old age and death,one should take out by giving:what is given is well taken out.When one departs,self-control over body, speech, and mind,and the deeds of merit one did while alive,lead to one’s happiness.
So that another bhikkhu would not think of reproving falsely.
So that another bhikkhu would think of reproving about what is true.
So that he doesn’t corrupt the good bhikkhus.
So that he doesn’t corrupt the good bhikkhus.
So that he doesn’t corrupt the good bhikkhus.
So that he doesn’t corrupt the good bhikkhus.” 
So that it doesn’t spoil the good barley.
So that there will be no disgrace to my teacher’s guild.
So that they don’t spoil the good grain.
So that this man does not encounter calamity and disaster right here.’
So too, when a person’s bodily and verbal behavior are impure and he does not gain from time to time an opening of the mind, placidity of mind, on that occasion one should arouse sheer compassion, sympathy, and tender concern for him, thinking, ‘Oh, may this venerable one abandon bodily misbehavior and develop good bodily behavior; may he abandon verbal misbehavior and develop good verbal behavior; may he abandon mental misbehavior and develop good mental behavior!
So that, with the breakup of the body, after death, he will not be reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.’
In this way resentment toward that person should be removed.
So the soil remover or his apprentice washes, rinses, and cleans it again.
So there are one hundred and eight currents of craving.
So too when one gives excellent foodto those accomplished in virtuous behavior,it arrives at several kinds of excellence,for what one has done is excellent.
So too, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a certain peaceful liberation of mind.
So too, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a certain peaceful liberation of mind….
So too, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a certain peaceful liberation of mind….
So too, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a certain peaceful liberation of mind….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus … … he has not totally abandoned ignorance.
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, a bhikkhu is practicing thus….
So too, all wholesome qualities are rooted in heedfulness and converge upon heedfulness and heedfulness is declared foremost among them.
So too, although such a bhikkhu might not wish: ‘Oh, if only my fellow monks would honor, respect, esteem, and venerate me!’ yet his fellow monks honor, respect, esteem, and venerate him.
So too, although such a bhikkhu might wish: ‘Oh, if only my fellow monks would honor, respect, esteem, and venerate me!’ yet his fellow monks do not honor, respect, esteem, and venerate him.
So too, among human beings,when the one considered the chiefbehaves unrighteously,other people do so as well.
So too, among human beings,when the one considered the chiefconducts himself righteously,other people do so as well.The entire kingdom rejoicesif the king is righteous.
So too, among human beingsit is in any kind of birth—among khattiyas, brahmins, vessas,suddas, caṇḍālas, or scavengers—among people of any sortthat the tamed person of good manners is born:one firm in Dhamma, virtuous in conduct,truthful in speech, endowed with moral shame;one who has abandoned birth and death,consummate in the spiritual life,with the burden dropped, detached,who has done his task, free of taints;who has gone beyond all things and by non-clinging has reached nibbāna:an offering is truly vastwhen planted in that spotless field.
So too, an evil bhikkhu has ten bad qualities.
So too, an excellent thoroughbred person, when gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, does not dwell with a mind obsessed and oppressed by sensual lust, and he understands as it really is the escape from arisen sensual lust.
So too, any kamma that is fashioned through greed … hatred … delusion, born of delusion, caused by delusion, originated by delusion, ripens wherever the individual is reborn.
So too, any kamma that is fashioned through non-greed … non-hatred … non-delusion, born of non-delusion, caused by non-delusion, originated by non-delusion, is abandoned when delusion has vanished; it is cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.”
So too, associating with good persons, becoming full, fills up hearing the good Dhamma….
So too, associating with good persons, becoming full, fills up hearing the good Dhamma….
So too, bhikkhus, when noble five-factored right concentration has been developed and cultivated in this way, then, there being a suitable basis, he is capable of realizing any state realizable by direct knowledge toward which he might incline his mind.
So too, Brahmin Dhammika, were you following the duty of an ascetic when the lay followers of the native district banished you from all seven monasteries?”
So too, for a person of right view … all lead to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to welfare and happiness.
So too, for a person of right view … … and right liberation, whatever bodily kamma, verbal kamma, and mental kamma he instigates and undertakes in accordance with that view, and whatever his volition, yearning, inclination, and volitional activities, all lead to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to well-being and happiness.
So too, for a person of wrong view … all lead to what is unwished for, undesired, and disagreeable, to harm and suffering.
So too, for a person of wrong view … and wrong liberation, whatever bodily kamma, verbal kamma, and mental kamma he instigates and undertakes in accordance with that view, and whatever his volition, yearning, inclination, and volitional activities, all lead to what is unwished for, undesired, and disagreeable, to harm and suffering.
So too, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, non-regret possesses its proximate cause.
So too, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, non-regret possesses its proximate cause.
So too, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
So too, for an immoral person, one deficient in virtuous behavior, non-regret lacks its proximate cause.
So too, for an immoral person, one deficient in virtuous behavior, non-regret lacks its proximate cause.
So too, for an immoral person, one deficient in virtuous behavior, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
So too, friend Uttiya, the Tathāgata has no concern whether the entire world will be emancipated, or half the world, or a third of the world.
So too, friend, when a bhikkhu is thus perfectly liberated in mind, even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into range of the eye … Even if powerful phenomena cognizable by the mind come into range of the mind, they do not obsess his mind; his mind is not at all affected.
So too, having abandoned these five obstructions … it is possible that a bhikkhu … might realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.” 
So too, it can be expected that one who would say: ‘I do not gain concentration, yet I will resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves,’ will either sink or float away.
So too, it is impossible for a bhikkhu with a cloudy mind to know his own good, the good of others, or the good of both, or to realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
So too, it is impossible that a bhikkhu with a misdirected mind would pierce ignorance, arouse true knowledge, and realize nibbāna.
So too, it is possible for a bhikkhu with a limpid mind to know his own good, the good of others, and the good of both, and to realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
So too, it is possible that a bhikkhu with a well-directed mind would pierce ignorance, arouse true knowledge, and realize nibbāna.
So too, not associating with good persons, becoming full, fills up not hearing the good Dhamma … and ignorance, becoming full, fills up craving for existence.
So too, not associating with good persons, becoming full, fills up not hearing the good Dhamma….
So too, possessing four factors, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
So too, possessing three factors, a bhikkhu is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
So too, sir, whatever one hears of Master Gotama’s Dhamma—discourses, mixed prose and verse, expositions, or amazing accounts—all one’s affliction, fatigue, and feverish burning subside.”
So too, such a person overcome by bad unwholesome qualities born of greed … born of hatred … born of delusion, with his mind obsessed by them, dwells in suffering in this very life, with distress, anguish, and fever, and with the breakup of the body, after death, a bad destination can be expected for him.
So too, the bhikkhus see eight astounding and amazing qualities in this Dhamma and discipline because of which they take delight in it.
So too, the defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
So too, the defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
So too, the defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
So too, the defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
So too, the defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
So too, the doctrine of Makkhali is declared the worst among the doctrines of the various ascetics.
So too, there are these five dangers in a person who is similar to a charnel ground.
So too, there are these five dangers in women.
So too, there are these five dangers in women.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to bulls found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to clouds found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to mangoes found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to mice found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to pools of water found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to pots found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to trees found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four kinds of persons similar to vipers found existing in the world.
So too, there are these four perils to be expected for a clansman who has gone forth out of faith from the household life into homelessness in this Dhamma and discipline.
So too, when a bhikkhu is intent on development, even though he does not know: ‘I have worn away so much of the taints today, so much yesterday, so much earlier,’ yet when they are worn away, he knows that they are worn away.
So too, when a bhikkhu is intent on development, his fetters readily collapse and rot away.” 
So too, when a bhikkhu is thus perfectly liberated in mind, even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into range of the eye … Even if powerful phenomena cognizable by the mind come into range of the mind, they do not obsess his mind; his mind is not at all affected.
So too, when a person’s bodily and verbal behavior are pure and from time to time he gains an opening of the mind, placidity of mind, on that occasion one should attend to his pure bodily behavior, to his pure verbal behavior, and to the opening of the mind, the placidity of mind, that he gains from time to time.
So too, when a person’s bodily behavior and verbal behavior are impure but from time to time he gains an opening of the mind, placidity of mind, on that occasion one should not attend to the impurity of his bodily and verbal behavior, but should instead attend to the opening of the mind, the placidity of mind, he gains from time to time.
So too, when one dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by doubt, and one does not understand as it really is the escape from arisen doubt, on that occasion one does not know and see as it really is one’s own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
So too, when one dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by dullness and drowsiness … let alone those that have not been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by ill will … let alone those that have not been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by restlessness and worry … … let alone those that have not been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by sensual lust … let alone those that have not been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed and oppressed by doubt, and one understands as it really is the escape from arisen doubt, on that occasion one knows and sees as it really is one’s own good, the good of others, and the good of both.
So too, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed and oppressed by dullness and drowsiness … let alone those that have been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed and oppressed by ill will … let alone those that have been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed and oppressed by restlessness and remorse … let alone those that have been so recited.
So too, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed and oppressed by sensual lust … let alone those that have been so recited.
So too, when the mind has failed, bodily, verbal, and mental actions fail.
So too, when the mind has not failed, bodily, verbal, and mental actions do not fail.
So too, when there is a sense of moral shame and moral dread, for one possessing a sense of moral shame and moral dread, restraint of the sense faculties possesses its proximate cause.
So too, when there is mindfulness and clear comprehension, for one possessing mindfulness and clear comprehension, the sense of moral shame and moral dread possess their proximate cause.
So too, when there is no mindfulness and clear comprehension, for one deficient in mindfulness and clear comprehension, the sense of moral shame and moral dread lack their proximate cause.
So too, when there is no restraint of the sense faculties, for one deficient in restraint of the sense faculties, virtuous behavior lacks its proximate cause.
So too, when there is no sense of moral shame and moral dread, for one deficient in a sense of moral shame and moral dread, restraint of the sense faculties lacks its proximate cause.
So too, when there is restraint of the sense faculties, for one who exercises restraint over the sense faculties, virtuous behavior possesses its proximate cause.
So too, without having abandoned these five obstructions … it is impossible that a bhikkhu … might realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
So too, Ānanda, it was only when I did not see even a mere fraction of a hair’s tip of a bright quality in Devadatta that I declared of him: ‘Devadatta is bound for the plane of misery, bound for hell, and he will remain there for an eon, unredeemable.’
So we take it.”
So we take it.”
So we take it.”
So we take it.”
So we take it.”
So we take it.”
So, I say, this person is just like a bull wrathful both toward his own cattle and toward the cattle of others.
So, I say, this person is just like a bull wrathful neither toward his own cattle nor toward the cattle of others.
So, I say, this person is just like a bull wrathful toward its own cattle, not toward the cattle of others.
So, I say, this person is just like a bull wrathful toward the cattle of others, not toward his own cattle.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that both thunders and rains.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that both thunders and rains.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that neither thunders nor rains.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that neither thunders nor rains.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that rains but does not thunder.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that rains but does not thunder.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that thunders but does not rain.
So, I say, this person is just like a cloud that thunders but does not rain.
So, I say, this person is just like a mango that is ripe and appears to be ripe.
So, I say, this person is just like a mango that is ripe but appears to be unripe.
So, I say, this person is just like a mango that is unripe and appears to be unripe.
So, I say, this person is just like a mango that is unripe but appears to be ripe.
So, I say, this person is just like a mouse that both makes a hole and lives in it.
So, I say, this person is just like a mouse that lives in a hole but does not make one.
So, I say, this person is just like a mouse that makes a hole but does not live in it.
So, I say, this person is just like a mouse that neither makes a hole nor lives in one.
So, I say, this person is just like a pool of water that is deep and appears to be deep.
So, I say, this person is just like a pool of water that is deep but appears to be shallow.
So, I say, this person is just like a pool of water that is shallow and appears to be shallow.
So, I say, this person is just like a pool of water that is shallow but appears to be deep.
So, I say, this person is just like a pot that is empty and covered.
So, I say, this person is just like a pot that is empty and open.
So, I say, this person is just like a pot that is full and covered.
So, I say, this person is just like a pot that is full and open.
So, I say, this person is just like a tree made of hardwood and surrounded by hardwood.
So, I say, this person is just like a tree made of hardwood but surrounded by softwood.
So, I say, this person is just like a tree made of softwood and surrounded by softwood.
So, I say, this person is just like a tree made of softwood but surrounded by hardwood.
So, I say, this person is just like a viper whose venom is both quick to come up and virulent.
So, I say, this person is just like a viper whose venom is neither quick to come up nor virulent.
So, I say, this person is just like a viper whose venom is quick to come up but not virulent.
So, I say, this person is just like a viper whose venom is virulent but not quick to come up.
Solitude is hard to undertake and hard to delight in.
Solitude with respect to robes, solitude with respect to almsfood, and solitude with respect to lodgings.
Some ascetics and brahminsare dragged around by lust and hatred;men hindered by ignoranceseek delight in pleasant things.
Some ascetics and brahminslive by wrong livelihood.These are the defilements that the Buddha,Kinsman of the Sun, described.
Some intelligent people here understand the meaning of what is said by means of a simile.
Some kill themselves with a sword;some who are distraught swallow poison;some hang themselves with a rope;some into a mountain gorge.
Some Licchavis were blue, with a blue complexion, clothed in blue, wearing blue ornaments.
Some Licchavis were red, with a red complexion, clothed in red, wearing red ornaments.
Some Licchavis were white, with a white complexion, clothed in white, wearing white ornaments.
Some Licchavis were yellow, with a yellow complexion, clothed in yellow, wearing yellow ornaments.
Some other person gains the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena but not internal serenity of mind.
Some other person gains the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena but not internal serenity of mind.
Some other person speaks praise of someone who deserves praise, and the praise is accurate, truthful, and timely; but he does not speak dispraise of someone who deserves dispraise, though the dispraise would be accurate, truthful, and timely.
Some paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side … … some kept silent and sat down to one side.
Some paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side; some exchanged greetings with him and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, sat down to one side; some reverentially saluted him and sat down to one side; some pronounced their name and clan and sat down to one side; some kept silent and sat down to one side.
Some person has risen up and crosses over.
Some person has risen up and gained a firm foothold.
Some person has risen up and stays there.
Some person has risen up and then goes under.
Some person has risen up, crossed over, and gone beyond, a brahmin who stands on high ground.
Some person has risen up, sees clearly, and looks around.
Some time later the Venerable Anuruddha abandoned those three qualities and stopped attending to them.
Some were reborn in companionship with affluent khattiyas; some in companionship with affluent brahmins; some in companionship with affluent householders.
Someone of the black class produces a white state.
Someone of the black class produces nibbāna, which is neither black nor white.
Someone of the white class produces a white state.
Soon after he left, we considered: ‘Friends, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis.
Soon after he left, we considered: ‘Friends, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis….
Soon after his full ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, the bhikkhu Gavesī realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Soon after recovering, it occurs to him: ‘I’ve recovered from illness, just recovered from illness.
Soon after recovering, it occurs to him: ‘I’ve recovered from illness; I’ve just recovered from illness.
Soon after the Blessed One had left, those venerable ones, too, got up from their seats and went to their own dwellings.
Sorrowless, without darts, the noble disciple realizes nibbāna.
Sorrowless, without darts, the noble disciple realizes nibbāna.
Speak, friend Sarabha!
Standing there, they said to him: “Please, Bhante, let the Blessed One go to the Sārandada Shrine out of compassion.”
The Blessed One silently consented.
Starting today, whatever confidence I had in the foolish Nigaṇṭhas, I winnow in a strong wind or let it be carried away by the current of a river.
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “I too, Bhante, develop mindfulness of death.”
Still another gains neither internal serenity of mind nor the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Still another gains neither internal serenity of mind nor the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Still another gains neither internal serenity of mind nor the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Still another kind of good horse possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
Still another kind of person torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself, and also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others.
Still another kind of person who is like a good horse possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
Still another patient will recover from his illness only if he gets suitable food, not if he fails to get it; only if he gets suitable medicine, not if he fails to get it; and only if he gets a competent attendant, not if he fails to get one.
Still another person attains nibbāna without exertion in this very life.
Still another person does not speak dispraise of someone who deserves dispraise, though the dispraise would be accurate, truthful, and timely; and he does not speak praise of someone who deserves praise, though the praise would be accurate, truthful, and timely.
Still another person fulfills virtuous behavior and concentration but does not fulfill wisdom.
Still another person has abandoned the lower fetters and the fetters for obtaining rebirth, but not the fetters for obtaining existence.
Still another teacher prescribes the full understanding of sensual pleasures, forms, and feelings.
Still, he is a good speaker with a good delivery … expressive of the meaning; and he is one who instructs, encourages, inspires, and gladdens his fellow monks.
Still, he is a good speaker with a good delivery … expressive of the meaning; and he is one who instructs, encourages, inspires, and gladdens his fellow monks.
Stirred, he strives carefully.
Stirred, he strives carefully.
Stirred, he strives carefully.
Stirred, he strives carefully.
Striving by restraint, striving by abandonment, striving by development, and striving by protection.
Striving by restraint, striving by abandonment, striving by development, and striving by protection.
Strong painful feelings are increasing in me, not subsiding, and their increase, not their subsiding, is to be seen.
Strong painful feelings are increasing in me, not subsiding, and their increase, not their subsiding, is to be seen.”
Success relating to material goods and success relating to the Dhamma.
Such a bhikkhu creates a dispute in the Saṅgha that leads to the harm of many people, to the unhappiness of many people, to the ruin, harm, and suffering of devas and humans.
Such a bhikkhu creates a dispute in the Saṅgha that leads to the harm of many people, to the unhappiness of many people, to the ruin, harm, and suffering of devas and humans.
Such a Dhamma speaker is reckoned as a Dhamma speaker by such an assembly.
Such a Dhamma speaker is reckoned as a Dhamma speaker by such an assembly.
Such a Dhamma speaker is reckoned as a Dhamma speaker by such an assembly.
Such a Dhamma speaker is reckoned as a Dhamma speaker by such an assembly.
Such a discerning good man—who grows here in faith and virtuous behavior,in wisdom, generosity, and learning—grows in both ways in this life.
Such a person is imprisoned for half a kahāpaṇa, a kahāpaṇa, or a hundred kahāpaṇas.
Such a person is not imprisoned for half a kahāpaṇa, a kahāpaṇa, or a hundred kahāpaṇas.
Such a person is not to be associated with, followed, and served except out of sympathy and compassion.
Such a person is to be associated with, followed, and served with honor and respect.
Such a person is to be associated with, followed, and served.
Such a person is to be associated with, followed, and served.
Such a person is to be looked upon with disgust, not to be associated with, followed, and served.
Such a person is to be looked upon with equanimity, not to be associated with, followed, and served.
Such a Saṅgha of bhikkhus, such an assembly, is rarely seen in the world.
Such a Saṅgha of bhikkhus, such an assembly, is worth traveling many yojanas to see, even with a shoulder bag.
Such a Saṅgha of bhikkhus, such an assembly, is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
Such a thing is impossible.
Such a thing is impossible.
Such a village or town should be resorted to; such a village or town should not be resorted to.’
Such a village or town should be resorted to; such a village or town should not be resorted to.’
Such are the bond of sensuality, the bond of existence, the bond of views, and the bond of ignorance.
Such are the devas, such are human beings; such is hell, such the animal realm, such the sphere of afflicted spirits.’”
Such are the severance of the bond of sensuality, the severance of the bond of existence, the severance of the bond of views, and the severance of the bond of ignorance.
Such being the case, if I were to feel repelled, humiliated, and disgusted when seeing another who has died, that would not be proper for me.’
When I reflected thus, my intoxication with life was completely abandoned.
Such being the case, if I were to feel repelled, humiliated, and disgusted when seeing another who is ill, that would not be proper for me.’
When I reflected thus, my intoxication with health was completely abandoned.
Such being the case, if I were to feel repelled, humiliated, and disgusted when seeing another who is old, that would not be proper for me.’
When I reflected thus, my intoxication with youth was completely abandoned.
Such is mental good conduct, such the result of mental good conduct; such is mental misconduct, such the result of mental misconduct.
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred person.
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred person.
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred person.
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred person.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.’
Such is the meaning of this, and so you should retain it in mind.”
Such is the meaning of this, and so you should retain it in mind.”
Such is the meditation of a person who is like a wild colt.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
Such is the unsurpassed sight and the unsurpassed hearing.
Such is the unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, and the unsurpassed gain.
Such is the unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, the unsurpassed gain, and the unsurpassed training.
Such is the unsurpassed sight.
Such is the way the noble discuss things;this is the discussion of the noble ones.Having understood this, the wise personshould not swell up but should discuss things.
Such is this Saṅgha of bhikkhus.
Such is verbal good conduct, such the result of verbal good conduct; such is verbal misconduct, such the result of verbal misconduct.
Such livelihood should be cultivated; such livelihood should not be cultivated.
Such livelihood should be cultivated; such livelihood should not be cultivated.
Such mental action should be cultivated; such mental action should not be cultivated.
Such mental action should be cultivated….
Such people are bound by the yoke of Māra,and do not reach security from bondage.Beings continue in saṃsāra,going to birth and death.
Such verbal action should be cultivated; such verbal action should not be cultivated.
Such verbal action should be cultivated….
Sunetta, Mūgapakkha,the brahmin Aranemi,Kuddālaka, and Hatthipāla,the brahmin youth, were teachers.
Suppavāsā, a female noble disciple who gives food gives the recipients these four things.”
Suppose a king had a frontier city with strong ramparts, walls, and arches, and with a single gate.
Suppose a man were skilled in the sound of a conch.
Suppose a man were skilled in the sound of a kettledrum.
Suppose a man were to grab hold of a branch with a clean hand.
Suppose a man were to grab hold of a branch with his hand smeared with gum.
Suppose a rag-robed bhikkhu sees a rag by the roadside.
Suppose a river were flowing down from a mountain, traveling a long distance, with a swift current, carrying along much flotsam.
Suppose a river were flowing down from a mountain, traveling a long distance, with a swift current, carrying along much flotsam.
Suppose a sick, afflicted, gravely ill person was traveling along a highway, and the last village behind him and the next village ahead of him were both far away.
Suppose I shave off my hair and beard, put on ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness.’
On a later occasion, having abandoned a small or a large fortune, having abandoned a small or a large circle of relatives, he shaves off his hair and beard, puts on ochre robes, and goes forth from the household life into homelessness.
Suppose I shave off my hair and beard, put on ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness.’
On a later occasion, having abandoned a small or a large fortune, having abandoned a small or a large circle of relatives, he shaves off his hair and beard, puts on ochre robes, and goes forth from the household life into homelessness.
Suppose not far from a village or town there was a great heap of grain, and a large crowd of people were to take away grain with carrying-poles, baskets, hip-sacks, and their cupped hands.
Suppose one were to exercise sovereignty and kingship over these sixteen great countries abounding in the seven precious substances, that is, the Aṅgans, the Magadhans, the Kāsis, the Kosalans, the Vajjis, the Mallas, the Cetis, the Vaṅgas, the Kurus, the Pañcālas, the Macchas, the Sūrasenas, the Assakas, the Avantis, the Gandhārans, and the Kambojans: this would not be worth a sixteenth part of the uposatha observance complete in those eight factors.
Suppose there is a little water in a puddle.
Suppose there is a pond covered with algae and water plants.
Suppose there is an ascetic or brahmin who spends as much time as he wants yielding to the pleasure of rest, the pleasure of sloth, the pleasure of sleep; one who does not guard the doors of the sense faculties, who is immoderate in eating, and is not intent on wakefulness; who lacks insight into wholesome qualities; who does not dwell intent on the endeavor to develop the aids to enlightenment in the earlier and later phases of the night.
Suppose there was a man here who, without doing anything unwholesome, would earn a kahāpaṇa daily for his work.
Suppose there was a man here who, without doing anything unwholesome, would earn half a kahāpaṇa daily for his work.
Suppose there was a man here who, without doing anything unwholesome, would earn two kahāpaṇas … three … four … five … six … seven … eight … nine … ten … twenty … thirty … forty … fifty kahāpaṇas daily for his work.
Suppose there were a bowl of water being heated over a fire, bubbling and boiling.
Suppose there were a bowl of water covered over with algae and water plants.
Suppose there were a bowl of water mixed with lac, turmeric, blue dye, or crimson dye.
Suppose there were a bowl of water not covered over with algae and water plants.
Suppose there were a bowl of water not heated over a fire, not bubbling and boiling.
Suppose there were a bowl of water not mixed with lac, turmeric, blue dye, or crimson dye.
Suppose there were a bowl of water not stirred by the wind, without ripples, without swirls, not churned into wavelets.
Suppose there were a bowl of water stirred by the wind, rippling, swirling, churned into wavelets.
Suppose there were a bowl of water that is clear, serene, and limpid, placed in the light.
Suppose there were a bowl of water that is cloudy, turbid, and muddy, placed in the dark.
Suppose there were a pond with clear, sweet, cool water, clean, with smooth banks, a delightful place shaded by various trees.
Suppose there were a reservoir many years old.
Suppose there were a reservoir many years old.
Suppose there were two friends who had played together in the mud.
Suppose, Visākhā, in the evening a cowherd returns the cows to their owners.
Suppose, Visākhā, one were to exercise sovereignty and kingship over these sixteen great countries abounding in the seven precious substances, that is, the Aṅgans, the Magadhans, the Kāsis, the Kosalans, the Vajjis, the Mallas, the Cetis, the Vaṅgas, the Kurus, the Pañcālas, the Macchas, the Sūrasenas, the Assakas, the Avantis, the Gandhārans, and the Kambojans: this would not be worth a sixteenth part of the uposatha observance complete in those eight factors.
Surely, it is the extraction of the dart of sorrow!
Surely, that bhikkhu did not pervade these four royal families of snakes with a mind of loving-kindness.
Surely, they will treat you in a way that fits your heedlessness.
Surely, they will treat you in a way that fits your heedlessness.
Surely, they will treat you in a way that fits your heedlessness.
Sustaining a favorable relationship with material goods and doing so with the Dhamma.
Sāriputta and Moggallāna are well behaved.”
Sāriputta and Moggallāna are well behaved.”
Sāriputta and Moggallāna are well behaved.”
Sāriputta properly continues to keep in motion the unsurpassed wheel of the Dhamma set in motion by the Tathāgata.”
Sāriputta, for one who does not have faith in wholesome qualities …  … whether night or day comes, only growth and not deterioration in wholesome qualities is to be expected.”
Sāriputta, for one who does not have faith in wholesome qualities …  … ‘A person who holds right view’: this is a case of non-decline.”
Sāriputta, I had not been disposed to give this Dhamma exposition to the bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male lay followers, and female lay followers.
Sāriputta, those wanderers of other sects are lost who did not get to hear this exposition of the Dhamma.”
Sāriputta, whenever a noble disciple enters and dwells in the rapture of solitude … … on that occasion these five things do not occur in him.”
Sāḷha the Licchavi then said to the Blessed One:
Taking what is not given is the near shore, abstention from taking what is not given the far shore.
Taking what is not given, I say, is also threefold: caused by greed, caused by hatred, and caused by delusion.
Talk on fewness of desires, on contentment, on solitude, on not being bound up with others, on arousing energy, on virtuous behavior, on concentration, on wisdom, on liberation, on knowledge and vision of liberation.
Tathāgatas do not smile without a reason.”
Tathāgatas do not smile without a reason.”
Then the Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One: “Why, Bhante, did the Blessed One smile?
That a Tathāgata, Arahant, Perfectly Enlightened One might arise in the world!
That ascetic Gotama whom you are praising is an abolitionist who refrains from making definite declarations.”
That aspiration of his, resolved on what is inferior, not developed higher, leads to rebirth there.
That aspiration of his, resolved on what is inferior, not developed higher, leads to rebirth there.
That aspiration of his, resolved on what is inferior, not developed higher, leads to rebirth there.
That aspiration of his, resolved on what is inferior, not developed higher, leads to rebirth there.
That bad kamma of yours was not done by your mother or father, nor by your brother or sister, nor by your friends and companions, nor by your relatives and family members, nor by the deities, nor by ascetics and brahmins.
That bad kamma of yours was not done by your mother or father, nor by your brother or sister, nor by your friends and companions, nor by your relatives and family members, nor by the deities, nor by ascetics and brahmins.
That bad kamma of yours was not done by your mother or father, nor by your brother or sister, nor by your friends and companions, nor by your relatives and family members, nor by the deities, nor by ascetics and brahmins.
That bhikkhu saw me doing so.
That clansman has few desires, since he does not want his inner wholesome qualities to be known by others.
That concentration is not peaceful and sublime, not gained by full tranquilization, not attained to unification, but is reined in and checked by forcefully suppressing.
That concentration is peaceful and sublime, gained by full tranquilization, and attained to unification; it is not reined in and checked by forcefully suppressing.
That field does not exist, that site does not exist, that base does not exist, that location does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise in one internally.
That highest state to be attained by an ascetic,by a brahmin who has lived the spiritual life,to be attained by a master of knowledge and a healer—that highest state to be attained by one unstained,by a stainless one who is purified, to be attained by a knower, by one liberated— I am triumphant in battle;freed, I free others from bondage.I am a nāga, supremely tamed,one beyond training, attained to nibbāna.
That I might attend upon that Blessed One!
That is how an ascetic follows the duty of an ascetic.”
That is how Nanda is intent on wakefulness.
That is its meaning, and it is in this way that you should retain it in mind.”
That is my view.”
That is Nanda’s mindfulness and clear comprehension.
That is the sacrifice the great seersof right conduct attend.The wise person should offer this;this sacrifice is very fruitful.
That is what wanderers of other sects prescribe as solitude with respect to almsfood.
That is what wanderers of other sects prescribe as solitude with respect to lodgings.
That is what wanderers of other sects prescribe as solitude with respect to robes.
That is where perceptions of forms cease and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended perceptions of forms.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where rapture ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended rapture.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where sensual pleasures cease, and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended sensual pleasures.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended the perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where the perception of the base of nothingness ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended the perception of the base of nothingness.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where the perception of the base of the infinity of consciousness ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended the perception of the base of the infinity of consciousness.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where the perception of the base of the infinity of space ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended the perception of the base of the infinity of space.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where the pleasure equanimity ceases and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended the pleasure equanimity.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is where thought and examination cease, and those are the ones who dwell having thoroughly ended thought and examination.’
Surely, bhikkhus, one who is not crafty or hypocritical should delight and rejoice in this statement, saying: ‘Good!’ Having done so, bowing in reverential salutation, he should attend upon them.
That is, with ignorance as condition, volitional activities; with volitional activities as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, name-and-form; with nameand-form as condition, the six sense bases; with the six sense bases as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging; with clinging as condition, existence; with existence as condition, birth; with birth as condition, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, dejection, and anguish come to be.
That kamma leads to the cessation of kamma, not to the origination of kamma.
That kamma leads to the cessation of kamma, not to the origination of kamma.
That kamma leads to the origination of kamma, not to the cessation of kamma.
That kamma leads to the origination of kamma, not to the cessation of kamma.
That man who, with thoughts of hatred,reviles these outside seers devoid of lust were concentrated,generates abundant demerit.
That one is a body witness.
That one is a Dhamma follower.
That one is a faith follower.
That one is attained to view.
That one is immoral, of bad character.’
Still, when I am serving the Saṅgha, I do not recall thinking: ‘Let me give this one little, let me give that one a lot.’
Rather, I give with an equal mind.
That one is liberated by faith.
That one is liberated by wisdom.
That one is virtuous, of good character.
That peaceful, mindful bhikkhu,tranquil, undefeated, enlightenedby breaking through conceit,is called “one who has drawn back.”
That same noble disciple, possessing this factor of striving for purity of virtuous behavior, this factor of striving for purity of mind, and this factor of striving for purity of view, detaches his mind from the things that cause attachment and emancipates his mind through the things that bring emancipation.
That the Blessed One might teach me the Dhamma, and that I might come to understand his Dhamma!’
That the world is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change: this is the danger in the world.
That was the time when we should have approached the Blessed One and asked him about the meaning, and we should have retained it in mind as he would have explained it to us.
That was the time when we should have approached the Blessed One and asked him about the meaning, and we should have retained it in mind as he would have explained it to us.
That was the time when you should have approached the Blessed One and asked him about the meaning.
That was the time when you should have approached the Blessed One and asked him about the meaning.
That will be your guest’s gift to me.”
That, too, is about to be completely destroyed.
That’s how a tree follows the duty of a tree.’ – ‘Sir, I wasn’t following the duty of a tree when the violent rainstorm came and twisted and uprooted my dwelling.’ – ‘If, deity, you would follow the duty of a tree, your dwelling might return to its former state.’ – ‘I will, sir, follow the duty of a tree.
The accumulation of material goods and the accumulation of the Dhamma.
The aggregate of virtuous behavior of one beyond training, the aggregate of concentration of one beyond training, and the aggregate of wisdom of one beyond training.
The aggregate of virtuous behavior of one beyond training, the aggregate of concentration of one beyond training, and the aggregate of wisdom of one beyond training.
The angry person doesn’t know the good;the angry person doesn’t see the Dhamma.There is just blindness and dense gloomwhen anger overcomes a person.
The angry person is ugly;he also sleeps badly;having gained some benefit,he takes it to be harmful.
The angry person,overcome by anger,having slain by body and speech,incurs the loss of wealth.
The angry worldling slays his mother,the good woman who gave him life,the one by whom he was nurturedand who showed him this world.
The arahant, the one practicing for arahantship; the non-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of non-returning; the once-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of once-returning; the stream-enterer, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of stream-entry; the clan member.
The arahant, the one practicing for arahantship; the non-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of non-returning; the once-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of once-returning; the stream-enterer, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of stream-entry; the worldling.
The arahant.
The arahants are thornless and without thorns.”
The arahants are thornless.
The arahants are without thorns.
The arising of his memory is sluggish, but then that being quickly reaches distinction.
The ascetic Gotama knowingly uses meat especially for his sake, a deed done on his account.’”
The ascetic Gotama knowingly uses meat especially for his sake, the act being done on his account.”
The ascetic unshaken, the red-lotus ascetic, the white-lotus ascetic, and the delicate ascetic among ascetics.
The ascetic unshaken, the white-lotus ascetic, the red-lotus ascetic, and the delicate ascetic among ascetics.
The ascetic unshaken, the white-lotus ascetic, the red-lotus ascetic, and the delicate ascetic among ascetics.
The ascetic unshaken, the white-lotus ascetic, the red-lotus ascetic, and the delicate ascetic among ascetics.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus are not restless, puffed up, vain, talkative, and rambling in their talk but have established mindfulness, clearly comprehend, are concentrated, with one-pointed minds and restrained sense faculties, is called the deep assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus are restless, puffed up, vain, talkative, rambling in their talk, with muddled mindfulness, lacking in clear comprehension, unconcentrated, with wandering minds, with loose sense faculties, is called the shallow assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus do not enter upon a wrong course on account of desire, hatred, delusion, or fear is called the cream of an assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus do not understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’ is called the assembly of the ignoble.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus dwell in concord, harmoniously, without disputes, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with eyes of affection, is called the harmonious assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus enter upon a wrong course on account of desire, hatred, delusion, or fear is called the dregs of an assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus take to arguing and quarreling and fall into disputes, stabbing each other with piercing words, is called the divided assembly.
The assembly in which the bhikkhus understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; understand as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; understand as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; understand as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’ is called the assembly of the noble.
The assembly is pure.
The assembly is thrilled.
The assembly is thrilled.
The assembly of the foremost, the divided assembly, and the harmonious assembly.
The assembly of the inferior and the assembly of the foremost.
The assembly of the noble and the assembly of the ignoble.
The assembly that acts contrary to the Dhamma and the assembly that acts in accordance with the Dhamma….
The assembly that speaks non-Dhamma and the assembly that speaks Dhamma.
The assembly that values worldly things, not the good Dhamma, and the assembly that values the good Dhamma, not worldly things.
The assembly trained in vain talk, not in interrogation, and the assembly trained in interrogation, not in vain talk.
The assembly trained in vain talk, the assembly trained in interrogation, and the assembly trained to the limits.
The asura with a retinue of asuras, the asura with a retinue of devas, the deva with a retinue of asuras, and the deva with a retinue of devas.
The attainer of nibbāna in the interval, the attainer of nibbāna upon landing, the attainer of nibbāna without exertion, the attainer of nibbāna through exertion, and one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
The attainer of nibbāna in the interval, the attainer of nibbāna upon landing, the attainer of nibbāna without exertion, the attainer of nibbāna through exertion, and one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
The basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving; the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior; and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in meditative development.
The best thing in which to increase is wisdom.
The best thing in which to increase is wisdom.
The best thing in which to increase is wisdom.
The bhikkhu does not hear: ‘In such and such a village or town the women or girls are beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion,’ but he himself sees a woman or a girl who is beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
The bhikkhu enters, and either the queen smiles when she sees the bhikkhu or the bhikkhu smiles when he sees the queen.
The bhikkhu hears: ‘In such and such a village or town the women or girls are beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.’
Having heard this, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
The bhikkhu then said to him:
The bhikkhu then said to him:
The bhikkhu then said to him: 
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher also has reverence for the Dhamma.
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher and the Dhamma also has reverence for the Saṅgha.
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha also has reverence for the training.
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and the training also has reverence for concentration.
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, the training, and concentration also has reverence for heedfulness.
The bhikkhu who has reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, the training, concentration, and heedfulness also has reverence for hospitality.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher also lacks reverence for the Dhamma.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher and the Dhamma also lacks reverence for the Saṅgha.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha also lacks reverence for the training.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and the training also lacks reverence for concentration.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, the training, and concentration  also lacks reverence for heedfulness.
The bhikkhu who lacks reverence for the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, the training, concentration, and heedfulness also lacks reverence for hospitality.
The bhikkhunī of Kajaṅgalā is wise, of great wisdom.
The bhikkhunī of Kajaṅgalā said this:
The bhikkhus opened the door for him.
The bhikkhus teach him the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; they reveal the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life.
The bhikkhus teach him the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; they reveal the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life.
The bhikkhus teach him the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; they reveal the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life.
The blameworthy, the mostly blameworthy, the slightly blameworthy, and the blameless.
The Blessed One addressed the Venerable Nāgita: “Who is making such an uproar and a racket, Nāgita?
The Blessed One answered me in exactly the same terms and phrases that the Venerable Sāriputta used.
The Blessed One asked him:
The Blessed One consented by silence.
The Blessed One consented by silence.
The Blessed One criticizes what deserves criticism and praises what is praiseworthy.
The Blessed One directly knew to what extent the attainment of the consciousness kasiṇa is supreme.
The Blessed One directly knew to what extent the attainment of the earth kasiṇa is supreme.
The Blessed One has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the darkness so those with good eyesight can see forms.
The Blessed One has overcome this adherence to lust for sensual pleasures, bondage, fixation, obsession, holding firmly, and he has overcome this adherence to lust for views, bondage, fixation, obsession, holding firmly.”
The Blessed One has seen you.
The Blessed One has seen you.
The Blessed One has spoken of these five objects of sensual pleasure as confinement.
The Blessed One has validly declared: ‘This is wholesome’ and: ‘This is unwholesome.’
Thus, when he declares what is wholesome and what is unwholesome, the Blessed One makes definite declarations.
The Blessed One Kassapa had a lay follower named Gavesī who had not fulfilled virtuous behavior.
The Blessed One knew with his own mind the course of thought in the Venerable Anuruddha’s mind.
The Blessed One may go at his own convenience.”
The Blessed One opened the door.
The Blessed One said this concentration has final knowledge as its fruit.’
When one is thus percipient too, friend, one does not experience that base.”
The Blessed One said this to them:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this:
The Blessed One said this: 
The Blessed One said this: 
The Blessed One said this: 
The Blessed One said this: 
The Blessed One said this: “And what, bhikkhus, are the three qualities that lead to decline?
The Blessed One said this: “Bhikkhus, it is because of not understanding and penetrating four things that you and I have roamed and wandered for such a long stretch of time.
The Blessed One said to him:
The Blessed One said to him:
The Blessed One said to him: 
The Blessed One said to him: “Enough, Phagguṇa, do not stir on your bed.
The Blessed One said to him: “Sāriputta, one of your fellow monks has made a complaint about you,: ‘Bhante, the Venerable Sāriputta struck me and then set out on tour without apologizing.’”
The Blessed One sat down on the seat prepared for him.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat prepared for him.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat that was prepared for him and said:
The Blessed One saw him standing there and said to him:
The Blessed One saw him standing there and said to him:
The Blessed One should analyze his knowledges of a person’s faculties.
The Blessed One should explain the manifestations of faith.
The Blessed One should speak.
The Blessed One should teach about the seventh person, the one who dwells in the markless.
The Blessed One should teach the Dhamma briefly; he should teach the Dhamma in detail; he should teach the Dhamma both briefly and in detail.
The Blessed One taught the spiritual life,not based on tradition, culminating in nibbāna,lived for the sake ofrestraint and abandoning.
The Blessed One then addressed the bhikkhus:
The Blessed One then addressed the bhikkhus:
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Nāgita: “Who is making such an uproar and a racket, Nāgita?
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Nāgita: “Who is making such an uproar and a racket, Nāgita?
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Sāriputta: “Sāriputta, pardon this hollow man before his head splits into seven pieces right there.”
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Sāriputta: “You should know, Sāriputta, that any white-robed householder whose actions are restrained by five training rules and who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, four pleasant visible dwellings that pertain to the higher mind, might, if he so wished, declare of himself: ‘I am finished with hell, the animal realm, and the sphere of afflicted spirits; I am finished with the plane of misery, the bad destination, the lower world; I am a stream-enterer, no longer subject to the lower world, fixed in destiny, heading for enlightenment.’
The Blessed One then addressed the Venerable Ānanda:
The Blessed One then asked him: “Where are you coming from, Brahmin Dhammika?”
The Blessed One then entered the assembly hall, sat down on the seat that was prepared for him, and said to the Venerable Nandaka: “You gave the bhikkhus a long exposition of the Dhamma.
The Blessed One then gave me a progressive discourse, that is, a talk on giving, virtuous behavior, and heaven; he revealed the danger, degradation, and defilement of sensual pleasures and the benefit of renunciation.
The Blessed One then gave me a progressive discourse….
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her:
The Blessed One then said to her: 
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him:
The Blessed One then said to him: 
The Blessed One then said to him: 
The Blessed One then said to him: 
The Blessed One then said to him: 
The Blessed One then said to him: “Does your family give gifts, householder?”
The Blessed One then said to him: “I hope, Ugga, that it is as you would have wished.”
The Blessed One then said to the householder Anāthapiṇḍika:
The Blessed One then said to the householder Anāthapiṇḍika:
The Blessed One then said to the Venerable Subhūti:
The Blessed One then said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
The Blessed One then said to them:
The Blessed One then said to them:
The Blessed One then said to those girls:
The Blessed One then said to those Licchavis:
The Blessed One then went to the Cāpāla Shrine, sat down on the seat that was prepared for him, and said to the Venerable Ānanda: 
The Blessed One will open the door for you.”
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed One would certainly not speak in such a way.
The Blessed Onesat down and said to the Venerable Phagguṇa: “I hope you are bearing up, Phagguṇa.
The blind person, the one-eyed person, and the two-eyed person.
The bodily knife, the verbal knife, and the mental knife.
The body itself as well as those tactile objects will actually be present, and yet one will not experience that base.”
The body witness, the one attained to view, and the one liberated by faith.
The bond of sensuality, the bond of existence, the bond of views, and the bond of ignorance.
The Book of the Eights is finished.
The Book of the Elevens is finished.
The Book of the Fives is finished.
The Book of the Fours is finished.
The Book of the Nines is finished.
The Book of the Ones is finished.
The Book of the Sevens is finished.
The Book of the Sixes is finished.
The Book of the Tens is finished.
The Book of the Threes is finished.
The Book of the Twos is finished.
The brahmin Doṇa then saw the thousand-spoked wheels of the Blessed One’s footprints, with their rims and hubs, complete in all respects, and thought: “It is astounding and amazing!
The brahmin Doṇa was also traveling along the highway between Ukkaṭṭhā and Setavya.
The brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala heard: “It is said that the ascetic Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan family, has arrived at Icchānaṅgala and is now dwelling in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
The brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala heard: “It is said that the ascetic Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan family, has arrived at Icchānaṅgala and is now dwelling in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
The brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala heard: “It is said that the ascetic Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan family, has arrived at Icchānaṅgala and is now dwelling in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
The brahmin householders of Venāgapura heard: “It is said that the ascetic Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan family, has arrived at Venāgapura.
The brahmin Kāraṇapālī saw the brahmin Piṅgiyānī coming in the distance and said to him:
The brahmin Piṅgiyānī presented those five hundred upper robes to the Blessed One.
The brahmin Vacchagotta of Venāgapura then said to the Blessed One:
The brahmā Tissa paid homage to him and sat down to one side.
The brahmā Tissa then paid homage to the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna and sat down to one side.
The Buddha is measureless, the Dhamma is measureless, the Saṅgha is measureless; creeping things, snakes, scorpions, centipedes, spiders, lizards, and rats are finite.
The celestial high and luxurious bed, the divine high and luxurious bed, and the noble high and luxurious bed.
The coarse way of practice, the blistering way of practice, and the middle way of practice.
The coarse way of practice, the blistering way of practice, and the middle way of practice.
The core of virtuous behavior, the core of concentration, the core of wisdom, and the core of liberation.
The corpse’s posture, the sensualist’s posture, the lion’s posture, and the Tathāgata’s posture.
The cowherds’ uposatha, the Nigaṇṭhas’ uposatha, and the noble ones’ uposatha.
The cowherds’ uposatha, thus observed, is not of great fruit and benefit, nor is it extraordinarily brilliant and pervasive.
The creature devoted to proliferation,who is delighted with proliferation,has failed to attain nibbāna,the unsurpassed security from bondage.
The deathless has been partaken of by those who have partaken of mindfulness directed to the body.”
The defiled mind is cleansed by exertion.
The deities protect one guarded by the Dhamma,who has managed his wealth for the welfare of many.Fame does not forsake one steadfast in the Dhamma,who is learned and of virtuous behavior and observances.
The deities that receive oblations are not served on time.
The deities that receive oblations are served on time.
The desire for gain and the desire for life.
The desire for the wholesome Dhamma is rare in the world.
The desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill purity of liberation that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects purity of liberation that I have fulfilled’—this is called the factor of striving for purity of liberation.
The desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill purity of mind that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects purity of mind that I have fulfilled’—this is called the factor of striving for purity of mind.
The desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill purity of view that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects purity of view that I have fulfilled’—this is called the factor of striving for purity of view.
The desire, effort, zeal, enthusiasm, indefatigability, mindfulness, and clear comprehension: ‘In just such a way I will fulfill purity of virtuous behavior that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects purity of virtuous behavior that I have fulfilled’—this is called the factor of striving for purity of virtuous behavior.
The destruction of life … and liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
The destruction of life … and wrong view.
The destruction of life … and wrong view.
The destruction of life … and wrong view.
The destruction of life, bhikkhus, is the near shore, abstention from the destruction of life the far shore….
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, and  liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, and  liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, and  liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, and liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, divisive speech, harsh speech, idle chatter, longing, ill will, and wrong view.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech, divisive speech, harsh speech, idle chatter, longing, ill will, and wrong view.
The destruction of life, taking what is not given,the uttering of false speech,and consorting with others’ wives:the wise do not praise such deeds.
The destruction of the taints is to be realized by wisdom.
The devas and Tathāgatas see the foolacting unrighteously in the world.Therefore one should fare mindfully,taking oneself as authority;alert and meditative, taking the world as authority;and fare in accordance with the Dhamma,taking the Dhamma as authority.Truly exerting himself, a sage does not decline.
The Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata shines when exposed, not when concealed.
The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One!
The diminishing of lust, the diminishing of hatred, the diminishing of delusion, and his wisdom eye treads in the deep matters of what is possible and impossible.
The divided assembly and the harmonious assembly.
The domain of one in jhāna is an inconceivable matter … The result of kamma is an inconceivable matter … Speculation about the world is an inconceivable matter that one should not try to conceive; one who tries to conceive it would reap either madness or frustration.
The domain of the Buddhas is an inconceivable matter that one should not try to conceive; one who tries to conceive it would reap either madness or frustration.
The donor is joyful before giving; she has a placid, confident mind in the act of giving; and she is elated after giving.
The dregs of an assembly and the cream of an assembly.
The dullard with a restless mindwho speaks much chatter,his thoughts unsettled,delighting in a bad teaching,holding bad views, disrespectful,is far from an elder’s stature.
The ear itself as well as those sounds will actually be present, and yet one will not experience that base.
The earlier and the later.
The eight emancipations, bhikkhus, are to be realized by the body.
The eight worldly conditions.
The elder bhikkhus—being undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom—will be luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they will not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
The element of good will is to be developed for abandoning the element of ill will.
The element of harmlessness is to be developed for abandoning the element of harming.
The element of renunciation is to be developed for abandoning the sensual element.
The elephant-gem, the horse-gem, the jewel-gem, the woman-gem, and the stewardgem.
The end of the world can never be reachedby means of traveling;yet without reaching the world’s endthere is no release from suffering.
The enjoyment of material goods and the enjoyment of the Dhamma.
The enlightenment factor of mindfulness, the enlightenment factor of discrimination of phenomena, the enlightenment factor of energy, the enlightenment factor of rapture, the enlightenment factor of tranquility, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
The enlightenment factor of mindfulness, the enlightenment factor of discrimination of phenomena, the enlightenment factor of energy, the enlightenment factor of rapture, the enlightenment factor of tranquility, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity: this is called kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
The entire kingdom is dejectedif the king is unrighteous.
The esteemed bhikkhu then teaches him the Dhamma for the destruction of the taints.
The eye itself as well as those forms will actually be present, and yet one will not experience that base.
The factor of striving for purity of virtuous behavior, the factor of striving for purity of mind, the factor of striving for purity of view, and the factor of striving for purity of liberation.
The faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, and the faculty of concentration.
The faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, and the faculty of wisdom.
The faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of wisdom; and with the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
The farmer would swiftly have the plants cut.
The fault pertaining to the present life and the fault pertaining to the future life.
The fetter of compliance, the fetter of aversion, the fetter of views, the fetter of doubt, the fetter of conceit, the fetter of envy, and the fetter of miserliness.
The fetter of compliance, the fetter of aversion, the fetter of views, the fetter of doubt, the fetter of conceit, the fetter of lust for existence, and the fetter of ignorance.
The fetter of compliance, the fetter of aversion, the fetter of views, the fetter of doubt, the fetter of conceit, the fetter of lust for existence, and the fetter of ignorance.
The fire of lust, the fire of hatred, and the fire of delusion.
The fire of lust, the fire of hatred, the fire of delusion, the fire of those worthy of gifts, the householder’s fire, the fire of those worthy of offerings, the wood fire.
The fire of those worthy of gifts, the householder’s fire, and the fire of those worthy of offerings.
The first ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not make himself happy and pleased.
The first ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The first ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The first ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The first ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The first ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The first is the place where he shaved off his hair and beard, put on ochre robes, and went forth from the household life into homelessness.
The first is the place where he was born.
The first jhāna, the second jhāna, the third jhāna, the fourth jhāna, the base of the infinity of space, the base of the infinity of consciousness, the base of nothingness, the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, and the cessation of perception and feeling.
The first jhāna, the second jhāna, the third jhāna, the fourth jhāna, the liberation of the mind by loving-kindness, the liberation of the mind by compassion, the liberation of the mind by altruistic joy, the liberation of the mind by equanimity, the base of the infinity of space, the base of the infinity of consciousness, and the base of nothingness.
The five aggregates subject to clinging.
The five aggregates subject to clinging.
The five faculties.
The five hindrances, becoming full, fill up ignorance.
The five hindrances, becoming full, fill up ignorance.
The five hindrances, becoming full, fill up ignorance.
The five hindrances, too, I say, have a nutriment; they are not without nutriment.
The five lower fetters and the five higher fetters.
The flies—thoughts based on lust—will run in pursuit of oneunrestrained in the sense faculties,unguarded in the eye and ear.
The fool does not reflect thus: ‘Although this deed is agreeable to do, still it will prove harmful.’
So he does that deed, and it proves harmful.
The fool does not reflect thus: ‘Although this deed is disagreeable to do, still it will prove beneficial.’
So he does not do that deed, and his refraining from it proves harmful.
The foot of a tree is a trifle among lodgings, easily gained and blameless.
The foremost kind of virtuous behavior, the foremost kind of concentration, the foremost kind of wisdom, and the foremost kind of liberation.
The foremost of forms, the foremost of feelings, the foremost of perceptions, and the foremost among states of existence.
The foremost of those who enjoy sensual pleasures is King Mandhātā.
The foremost of those who exercise authority is Māra the Evil One.
The form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional activities aggregate subject to clinging, and the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
The form of a man obsesses the mind of a woman.”
The form of a woman obsesses the mind of a man.”
The four bases for psychic potency are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.
The four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.
The four establishments of mindfulness, becoming full, fill up the seven factors of enlightenment.
The four establishments of mindfulness, too, I say, have a nutriment; they are not without nutriment.
The four establishments of mindfulness.
The four kinds of nutriment.
The four practicing the wayand the four established in the fruit:the eight persons among beings—this is the foremost Saṅgha.
The four practicing the wayand the four established in the fruit:this is the upright Saṅgha—composed in wisdom and virtuous behavior.
The four right strivings are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.
The fourth ground on which he may be praised is that he uses that wealth without being tied to it, infatuated with it, and blindly absorbed in it, seeing the danger in it and understanding the escape.
The fragrance of flowers does not spread against the wind,nor the fragrance of sandal, tagara, or jasmine.But the fragrance of good people spreads against the wind:the good person’s fragrance pervades all quarters.
The fragrance of roots, the fragrance of heartwood, and the fragrance of flowers.
The gatekeeper posted there would be wise, competent, and intelligent; one who keeps out strangers and admits acquaintances.
The generous one, having become a deva, would surpass the other in these five ways.”
The generous one, having gone forth, would surpass the other in these five ways.”
The gift of material goods and the gift of the Dhamma.
The gift of material goods and the gift of the Dhamma.
The going forth is prescribed by the wise, prescribed by good people.
The gold is not yet malleable, wieldy, and luminous, but still brittle and not properly fit for work.
The great seers of right conductdo not attend a sacrificewhere goats, rams, cattle,and various creatures are slain.
The ground trampled by the hooves of cattle is rough, the spread of leaves is thin, the leaves on the tree are sparse, the ochre robes leave one cold, and the gale wind blows cold.
The happiness accompanied by rapture and the happiness without rapture.
The happiness based on form and the happiness based on the formless.
The happiness based on pleasure and the happiness based on equanimity.
The happiness based on the presence of rapture and the happiness based on the absence of rapture.
The happiness bound up with acquisitions and the happiness without acquisitions.
The happiness of a layperson and the happiness of one who has gone forth.
The happiness of concentration and the happiness without concentration.
The happiness of ownership, the happiness of enjoyment, the happiness of freedom from debt, and the happiness of blamelessness.
The happiness with taints and the happiness without taints.
The heart’s wish of one who is virtuous succeeds because of his purity.
The heart’s wish of one who is virtuous succeeds because of his purity.
The heart’s wish of one who is virtuous succeeds because of his purity.
The heart’s wish of one who is virtuous succeeds because of his purity.
The hindrance of sensual desire, the hindrance of ill will, the hindrance of dullness and drowsiness, the hindrance of restlessness and remorse, and the hindrance of doubt.
The hindrance of sensual desire, the hindrance of ill will, the hindrance of dullness and drowsiness, the hindrance of restlessness and remorse, and the hindrance of doubt.
The hollow man Makkhali teaches the doctrine and view: ‘There is no kamma, no deed, no energy.’ 
The horse sacrifice, human sacrifice,sammāpāsa, vājapeyya, niraggaḷa:these grand sacrifices, fraught with violence,do not bring great fruit.
The householder endowed with faithhas made a lucky throw in both cases:for his welfare in this present lifeand happiness in future lives.Thus it is that for home-dwellersthis merit increases through generosity.
The householder Nakulapitā then said to the Blessed One:
The householder Ugga of Hatthigāma said this:
The householder Ugga of Vesālī said this:
The housewife Nakulamātā in turn said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, since I was a young girl given to the young householder Nakulapitā in marriage, I do not recall ever transgressing against him even in thought, much less by deed.
The husband is immoral,miserly and abusive,but his wife is virtuous,charitable, generous.She is a female deva livingwith a wretched husband.
The husband is virtuous,charitable, generous,but his wife is immoral,miserly and abusive.She is a wretch livingwith a deva husband.
The hymns of the brahmins flourish when concealed, not when exposed.
The ignorant go aboutcreating unwholesome kammaborn of lust, hatred, and delusion:distressful deeds productive of suffering.People hindered by ignorance,blind, lacking eyes to see,in accordance with their own nature,do not think of it in such a way.
The impatient practice, the patient practice, the taming practice, and the calming practice.
The impatient practice, the patient practice, the taming practice, and the calming practice.
The instructed noble disciple understands this as it really is; therefore I say that for the instructed noble disciple there is development of the mind.”
The inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes the impermanent to be permanent; the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is suffering to be pleasurable; the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is non-self to be self; the inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is unattractive to be attractive.
The king and his harem made use of one section of the tree, the army used another section, the townfolk and countryfolk used still another, ascetics and brahmins used still another, and the beasts and birds used still another.
The king lives on the milk in the first teat of a cow with a calf of the same color while the chief queen lives on the milk in the second teat and the brahmin high priest lives on the milk in the third teat; the milk in the fourth teat they pour onto the fire, and the calf lives on what is left.
The king thinks: ‘No one else has entered here except the monk.
The king thinks: ‘No one else has entered here except the monk.
The king thinks: ‘No one else has entered here except the monk.
The king thinks: ‘Surely, something has gone on between them, or something is about to go on.’
This is the first danger in entering the king’s inner palace.
The king’s bull elephant is beautiful!
The king’s bull elephant is graceful!
The king’s bull elephant is massive!
The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’” 
The knowledge arises that is personally yours: ‘This concentration is presently pleasant and in the future has a pleasant result.’
The knowledge arises that is personally yours: ‘This concentration is noble and spiritual.’
The knowledge arises that is personally yours: ‘This concentration is not practiced by low persons.’
The knowledge arises that is personally yours: ‘This concentration is peaceful and sublime, gained by full tranquilization, and attained to unification; it is not reined in and checked by forcefully suppressing.’
The knowledge arises that is personally yours: ‘I enter this concentration mindfully and I emerge from it mindfully.’
Bhikkhus, being alert and continuously mindful, develop concentration that is measureless.
The Kālāmas of Kesaputta heard: “It is said that the ascetic Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan family, has arrived at Kesaputta.
The lay follower who does not stop seeing who have developed themselves,who listens to the noble ones’ teachings,and trains in the higher virtue;whose confidence in the bhikkhusis ever on the increase;who wants to listen to the good Dhammawith a mind not bent on criticism;the lay follower who seeks noneworthy of offerings among outsiders;but who here first undertakesto do meritorious deeds:these seven well-taught principlesdescribe what leads to non-decline.A lay follower who resorts to themdoes not fall away from the good Dhamma.
The lay follower who stops seeing who have developed themselves, hearing the noble ones’ teachings,and does not train in the higher virtue;whose suspicion toward the bhikkhusis ever on the increase;who wants to listen to the good Dhammawith a mind bent on criticism;the lay follower who seeksone worthy of offerings among outsidersand first undertakes to domeritorious deeds toward them:these seven well-taught principlesdescribe what leads to decline.A lay follower who resorts to themfalls away from the good Dhamma.
The Licchavi Abhaya then said to the Venerable Ānanda:
The life span of the devas of Brahmā’s company is an eon.
The life span of the devas of Brahmā’s company is an eon.
The life span of the devas of great fruit is five hundred eons.
The life span of the devas of great fruit is five hundred eons.
The life span of the devas of refulgent glory is four eons.
The life span of the devas of refulgent glory is four eons.
The life span of the devas of streaming radiance is two eons.
The life span of the devas of streaming radiance is two eons.
The life span of the devas of the base of nothingness is, eons.
The life span of the devas of the base of the infinity of consciousness is, eons.
The life span of the devas of the base of the infinity of space is, eons.
The life span of the devas the four great kings is five hundred such celestial years.
The life span of the devas who control what is created by others is sixteen thousand such celestial years.
The life span of the devas who delight in creation is eight thousand such celestial years.
The life span of the Tusita devas is four thousand such celestial years.
The life span of the Tāvatiṃsa devas is a thousand such celestial years.
The life span of the Yāma devas is two thousand such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is a thousand such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is eight thousand such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is five hundred such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is four thousand such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is sixteen thousand such celestial years.
The life span of those devas is two thousand such celestial years.
The light of the moon, the light of the sun, the light of fire, and the light of wisdom.
The lion, the king of beasts, lies down on his right side, having covered one foot with the other and tucked his tail in between his thighs.
The luster of the moon, the luster of the sun, the luster of fire, and the luster of wisdom.
The lustful, the hating, the deluded, and the conceited.
The male and female householders saw the Blessed One sitting there and approached him, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
The man who gives life and beauty,who gives happiness and strength,will obtain long life and famewherever he is reborn.
The man would cut this tree down at its foot, cut off the crown, thoroughly clean it out, and use it as a gutter for a well.
The manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One is rare in the world.
The manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One is rare in the world.
The manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One is rare in the world.
The manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One is rare in the world.
The manifestation of these five gems is rare in the world.” 
The manifestation of these six things is rare in the world.”
The manifestation of these three is rare in the world.”
The mark of the attractive and careless attention.
The mark of the repulsive and careless attention.
The meaning is stated, but one does not bring oneself into the picture.
The mental infatuation is what I call the fetter.
The mental infatuation is what I call the fetter.
The mental infatuation is what I call the fetter.
The mind is developed.
The mind of one without restraint is far from concentration.
The mind of one without restraint is far from concentration.
The mind, when developed and cultivated, brings happiness.”
The mind, when developed and cultivated, leads to great good.”
The mind, when developed and manifested, leads to great good.”
The mind, when tamed, guarded, protected, and restrained, leads to great good.” 
The mind, when undeveloped and uncultivated, brings suffering.”
The mind, when undeveloped and uncultivated, leads to great harm.”
The mind, when undeveloped and unmanifested, leads to great harm.”
The mind, when untamed, unguarded, unprotected, and unrestrained, leads to great harm.”
The moon is a luminary, the sun is a luminary, fire is a luminary, and wisdom is a luminary.
The moon shines when exposed, not when concealed.
The near and the far shores of the ocean.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
the next generation follow their example.
The Nigaṇṭhas are without faith, immoral, morally shameless, morally reckless, and devoted to bad persons.
The Nigaṇṭhas have these ten bad qualities.”
The nine abodes of beings.
The nine abodes of beings.
The noble disciple reflects thus: ‘I am not afraid on account of my livelihood.
The noble disciple with right liberation has split the great mass of ignorance.”
The noble disciple with right view understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
The noble eightfold path.
The noble Ānanda has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the darkness so those with good eyesight can see forms.
The non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes the impermanent to be impermanent; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is suffering to be suffering; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is non-self to be non-self; the non-inversion of perception, mind, and view that takes what is unattractive to be unattractive.
The nose itself as well as those odors will actually be present, and yet one will not experience that base.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with divisive speech as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with false speech as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with harsh speech as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with idle chatter as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with ill will as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with longing as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with sexual misconduct as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with taking what is not given as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with the destruction of life as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with the destruction of life as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong action as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong concentration as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong effort as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong intention as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong knowledge as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong liberation as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong liberation as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong livelihood as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong mindfulness as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong speech as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong view as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong view as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong view as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous bad unwholesome qualities that originate with wrong view as condition: these are harmful.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from divisive speech as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from false speech as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from harsh speech as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from idle chatter as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from sexual misconduct as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from taking what is not given as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from the destruction of life as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with abstention from the destruction of life as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with good will as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with non-longing as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right action as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right concentration as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right effort as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right intention as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right knowledge as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right liberation as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right liberation as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right livelihood as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right mindfulness as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right speech as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right view as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right view as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right view as condition: these are beneficial.
The numerous wholesome qualities that reach fulfillment by development with right view as condition: these are beneficial.
The odor of a man obsesses the mind of a woman.”
The odor of a woman obsesses the mind of a man.” 
The offering of material goods and the offering of the Dhamma.
The once-returner.
The one bent down who bends lower, the one bent down who rises, the one risen who bends down, and the one risen who rises higher.
The one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
The one ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The one ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The one ground on which he may be criticized is that he seeks wealth unrighteously, by violence.
The one ground on which he may be criticized is that he uses that wealth while being tied to it, infatuated with it, and blindly absorbed in it, not seeing the danger in it and understanding the escape.
The one ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The one ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The one ground on which he may be praised is that he seeks wealth righteously, without violence.
The one heading from darkness to darkness, the one heading from darkness to light, the one heading from light to darkness, and the one heading from light to light.
The one liberated in both respects, the one liberated by wisdom, the body witness, the one attained to view, the one liberated by faith, the Dhamma follower, and the faith follower.
The one made of softwood that is surrounded by softwood; the one made of softwood that is surrounded by hardwood; the one made of hardwood that is surrounded by softwood; and the one made of hardwood that is surrounded by hardwood.
The one made of softwood who is surrounded by softwood; the one made of softwood who is surrounded by hardwood; the one made of hardwood who is surrounded by softwood; and the one made of hardwood who is surrounded by hardwood.
The one that is empty and covered; the one that is full and open; the one that is empty and open; and the one that is full and covered.
The one that is shallow but appears to be deep; the one that is deep but appears to be shallow; the one that is shallow and appears to be shallow; and the one that is deep and appears to be deep.
The one that is unripe but appears ripe; the one that is ripe but appears unripe; the one that is unripe and appears unripe; and the one that is ripe and appears ripe.
The one that makes a hole but does not live in it; the one that lives in a hole but does not make one; the one that neither makes a hole nor lives in one; and the one that both makes a hole and lives in it.
The one that thunders but does not rain; the one that rains but does not thunder; the one that neither thunders nor rains; and the one that both thunders and rains.
The one who attains final nibbāna in the interval.
The one who gives and then despises; the one who despises as a result of living together; the one gullible for gossip; the capricious one; and the one who is dull and stupid.
The one who hears the Dhamma experiences the meaning and the Dhamma.
The one who is easily measured, the one who is hard to measure, and the immeasurable one.
The one who is empty and covered; the one who is full and open; the one who is empty and open; and the one who is full and covered.
The one who is shallow but appears to be deep; the one who is deep but appears to be shallow; the one who is shallow and appears to be shallow; and the one who is deep and appears to be deep.
The one who is unripe but appears ripe; the one who is ripe but appears unripe; the one who is unripe and appears unripe; and the one who is ripe and appears ripe.
The one who makes a hole but does not live in it; the one who lives in a hole but does not make one; the one who neither makes a hole nor lives in one; and the one who both makes a hole and lives in it.
The one who teaches the Dhamma experiences the meaning and the Dhamma.
The one who thunders but does not rain; the one who rains but does not thunder; the one who neither thunders nor rains; and the one who both thunders and rains.
The one whose speech is like dung, the one whose speech is like flowers, and the one whose speech is like honey.
The one whose venom is quick to come up but not virulent; the one whose venom is virulent but not quick to come up; the one whose venom is both quick to come up and virulent; and the one whose venom is neither quick to come up nor virulent.
The one whose venom is quick to come up but not virulent; the one whose venom is virulent but not quick to come up; the one whose venom is both quick to come up and virulent; and the one whose venom is neither quick to come up nor virulent.
The one without expectation, the one full of expectation, and the one who has overcome expectation.
The one without expectation, the one full of expectation, and the one who has overcome expectation.
The one wrathful toward his own cattle, not toward the cattle of others; the one wrathful toward the cattle of others, not toward his own cattle; the one wrathful both toward his own cattle and toward the cattle of others; and the one wrathful neither toward his own cattle nor toward the cattle of others.
The one wrathful toward its own cattle, not toward the cattle of others; the one wrathful toward the cattle of others, not toward its own cattle; the one wrathful both toward its own cattle and toward the cattle of others; and the one wrathful neither toward its own cattle nor toward the cattle of others.
The one, bhikkhus, is the near shore, the other the far shore.”
The one, bhikkhus, is the near shore, the other the far shore.” 
The one, brahmin, is the near shore, the other the far shore.”
The one, brahmin, is the near shore, the other the far shore.” 
The other said: “Bhante, these bhikkhunīs are well liberated without residue remaining.”
The other sects are empty of ascetics.’
It is in such a way that you should rightly roar your lion’s roar.
The other sects are empty of ascetics.’
It is in such a way that you should rightly roar your lion’s roar.” 
The passing away and rebirth of beings are to be realized by the eye.
The perception of forms is one thing, the perception of sounds is another, the perception of odors still another, the perception of tastes still another, the perception of tactile objects still another, and the perception of mental phenomena still another.
The perception of good will is to be developed for abandoning the perception of ill will.
The perception of harmlessness is to be developed for abandoning the perception of harming.
The perception of impermanence is to be developed for abandoning the view of gratification.
The perception of impermanence should be developed to eradicate the conceit ‘I am.’
When one perceives impermanence, the perception of non-self is stabilized.
The perception of impermanence should be developed to eradicate the conceit ‘I am.’
When one perceives impermanence, the perception of non-self is stabilized.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, and the perception of non-delight in the entire world.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, and the perception of non-delight in the entire world.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of a skeleton, the perception of a worm-infested corpse, the perception of a livid corpse, the perception of a fissured corpse, and the perception of a bloated corpse.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of a skeleton, the perception of a worm-infested corpse, the perception of a livid corpse, the perception of a festering corpse, the perception of a fissured corpse, and the perception of a bloated corpse.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of unattractiveness, the perception of danger, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, and the perception of cessation.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in what is impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, and the perception of dispassion.
The perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in what is impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, and the perception of cessation.
The perception of non-self is to be developed for abandoning the view of self.
The perception of renunciation is to be developed for abandoning sensual perception.
The perception of unattractiveness … … The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The perception of unattractiveness … … The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of danger, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, and the perception of non-delight in the entire world.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of danger, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, and the perception of non-delight in the entire world.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, and the perception of non-self in what is suffering.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, and the perception of dispassion.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, and the perception of dispassion.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, and the perception of cessation.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, the perception of non-self in what is suffering, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, and the perception of cessation.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of nondelight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, and the perception of non-self in what is suffering.
The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, the perception of nondelight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in the impermanent, and the perception of non-self in what is suffering.
The peril of birth, the peril of old age, the peril of illness, and the peril of death.
The peril of fire, the peril of floods, the peril of kings, and the peril of bandits.
The peril of old age, the peril of illness, and the peril of death.
The peril of self-reproach, the peril of reproach by others, the peril of punishment, and the peril of a bad destination.
The peril of waves, the peril of crocodiles, the peril of whirlpools, and the peril of fierce fish.
The peril of waves, the peril of crocodiles, the peril of whirlpools, and the peril of fierce fish.
The person described as one-eyedis a hypocrite who seeks wealth, righteously unrighteously.
The person here in whomthese qualities are found is a friend,benevolent and compassionate.Even if one is dismissed by him,one desiring a friendshould resort to such a person.
The person here in whomthese qualities are found is a friend.One desiring a friendshould resort to such a person.
The person practicing both for his own welfare and for the welfare of others is the foremost, the best, the preeminent, the supreme, and the finest of these four persons.
The person practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others is the more excellent and sublime of the three persons.
The person who does not examine the meaning of the teachings that have been retained in mind is in that respect blameworthy; the person who examines the meaning of the teachings that have been retained in mind is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who does not listen to the Dhamma with eager ears is in that respect blameworthy; the person who listens to the Dhamma with eager ears is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who does not want to hear the good Dhamma is in that respect blameworthy; the person who wants to hear the good Dhamma is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who does not want to see the noble ones is in that respect blameworthy; the person who wants to see the noble ones is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who goes along with the stream; the one who goes against the stream; the one who is inwardly firm; and the one who has crossed over and gone beyond, the brahmin who stands on high ground.
The person who has not understood the meaning and the Dhamma and does not practice in accordance with the Dhamma is in that respect blameworthy; the person who has understood the meaning and the Dhamma and then practices in accordance with the Dhamma is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who is like a line etched in stone, the person who is like a line etched in the ground, and the person who is like a line etched in water.
The person who is practicing for his own welfare but not for the welfare of others is in that respect blameworthy; the person who is practicing for his own welfare and for the welfare of others is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person who, having heard the Dhamma, does not retain it in mind is in that respect blameworthy; the person who, having heard the Dhamma, retains it in mind is in that respect praiseworthy.
The person with inverted wisdom, the person with lap-like wisdom, and the person with wide wisdom.
The person with inverted wisdom,stupid and undiscerning,often goes to visit bhikkhus.
The person with lap-like wisdomis said to be better than the former.He too often goes to visit bhikkhus.
The person with wide wisdomis said to be the best of these.He too often goes to visit bhikkhus.
The place where the sun rises and the place where it sets.
The place where the Tathāgata attained final nibbāna by the nibbāna element without residue remaining is an inspiring place that should be seen by a clansman endowed with faith.
The place where the Tathāgata awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment is an inspiring place that should be seen by a clansman endowed with faith.
The place where the Tathāgata set in motion the unsurpassed wheel of the Dhamma is an inspiring place that should be seen by a clansman endowed with faith.
The place where the Tathāgata was born is an inspiring place that should be seen by a clansman endowed with faith.
The power of children is weeping; the power of women is anger; the power of thieves is a weapon; the power of kings is sovereignty; the power of fools is to complain; the power of the wise is to deliberate; the power of the learned is reflection; the power of ascetics and brahmins is patience.
The power of concentration is to be seen in the four jhānas.
The power of development is the power of trainees.
The power of energy is to be seen in the four right strivings.
The power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith is to be seen in the four factors of stream-entry.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, and the power of concentration.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, the power of wisdom; and with the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of energy,the powers of moral shame and moral dread;the powers of mindfulness and concentration,and wisdom, the seventh power;a powerful bhikkhu possessing theseis wise and lives happily.
The power of faith, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of energy, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of energy, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of energy, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of energy, and the power of wisdom.
The power of faith, the power of moral shame, the power of moral dread, the power of energy, and the power of wisdom.
The power of mindfulness is to be seen in the four establishments of mindfulness.
The power of mindfulness, the power of concentration, the power of blamelessness, and the power of sustaining a favorable relationship.
The power of reflection and the power of development.
The power of reflection and the power of development.
The power of reflection and the power of development.
The power of reflection, the power of development, the power of blamelessness, and the power of sustaining a favorable relationship.
The power of wisdom is to be seen in the four noble truths.
The power of wisdom, the power of energy, the power of blamelessness, and the power of sustaining a favorable relationship.
The power of wisdom, the power of energy, the power of blamelessness, and the power of sustaining a favorable relationship.
The pursuit of wholesome qualities and the non-pursuit of unwholesome qualities leads to great good.”
The pursuit of wholesome qualities and the non-pursuit of unwholesome qualities leads to great good.”
The pursuit of wholesome qualities and the non-pursuit of unwholesome qualities leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.”
The quest for material goods and the quest for the Dhamma.
The radiance of the moon, the radiance of the sun, the radiance of fire, and the radiance of wisdom.
The rain, falling in thick droplets, would make the various kinds of shells, the gravel and pebbles, disappear.
The reflective poet, the narrative poet, the didactic poet, and the inspirational poet.
The relinquishment of material goods and relinquishment the Dhamma.
The removal and abandonment of desire and lust for the world: this is the escape from the world.’
The removal of anger and the removal of hostility.
The result of kamma, I say, is threefold: in this very life, or in the rebirth, or on some subsequent occasion.
The right view of one beyond training; the right intention … the right speech … the right action … the right livelihood … the right effort … the right mindfulness … the right concentration … the right knowledge … the right liberation of one beyond training.
The rulers seized and abducted him on some pretext and executed him.
The Saṅgha is practicing the good path!’”
The search for material goods and the search for the Dhamma.
The second ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not make himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not make himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The second ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The second ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he makes himself happy and pleased.
The second ground on which he may be praised is that he shares the wealth and does meritorious deeds.
The second is the place where he understood as it really is: ‘This is suffering,’ and ‘This is the origin of suffering,’ and ‘This is the cessation of suffering,’ and ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
And the third is the place where, with the destruction of the taints, he realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwelled in it.
The second is the place where he was head-anointed a khattiya king.
The sensual element, the element of ill will, and the element of harming.
The sensualist usually lies on his left side.
The seven factors of enlightenment, becoming full, fill up true knowledge and liberation.
The seven factors of enlightenment, becoming full, fill up true knowledge and liberation.
The seven factors of enlightenment, becoming full, fill up true knowledge and liberation.
The seven factors of enlightenment, becoming full, fill up true knowledge and liberation.
The seven factors of enlightenment, too, I say, have a nutriment; they are not without nutriment.
The seven factors of enlightenment….
The seven stations for consciousness.
The seven-times-at-most attainer, the family-to-family attainer, the one-seed attainer, the once-returner, and one who, in this very life, is an arahant.
The seven-times-at-most attainer, the family-to-family attainer, the one-seed attainer, the once-returner, and one who, in this very life, is an arahant.
The severance of the bond of sensuality, the severance of the bond of existence, the severance of the bond of views, and the severance of the bond of ignorance.
The shallow assembly and the deep assembly.
The sheep merchant or butcher can execute, imprison, fine, or otherwise penalize such a person for stealing a sheep.
The sheep merchant or butcher can’t execute, imprison, fine, or otherwise penalize such a person for stealing a sheep; he can only plead with him: ‘Sir, return my sheep or pay me for it.’
The six elements of escape.
The six internal sense bases.
The sky and the earth are far apart,the ocean’s far shore is said to be far,and so the place where the sun risesfrom the place where it sets.
The sky and the earth.
The snake, the scorpion, the centipede, the mongoose, the cat, the mouse, and the owl, or any other animals that creep away when they see people.
The soil remover or his apprentice washes, rinses, and cleans it again.
The sound of a man obsesses the mind of a woman.”
The sound of a woman obsesses the mind of a man.”
The spiritual life is lived for the abandoning and eradication of these five kinds of miserliness.”
The spiritual life is lived to abandon and eradicate these seven fetters.
The spiritual life is lived to abandon and eradicate these seven underlying tendencies.
The splendor of the moon, the splendor of the sun, the splendor of fire, and the splendor of wisdom.
The stain of beauty is laziness.
The stain of houses is lack of upkeep.
The stream-enterer, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of stream-entry … the arahant, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of arahantship.
The stream-enterer, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of stream-entry; the once-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of once-returning; the non-returner, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of non-returning; the arahant, the one practicing for realization of the fruit of arahantship.
The striving of laypeople who dwell at home for the purpose of presenting robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick, and the striving of those who have gone forth from the household life into homelessness for the relinquishment of all acquisitions.
The sun shines when exposed, not when concealed.
The taints do not increase for these two.”
The taints do not increase for these two.”
The taints do not increase for these two.”
The taints do not increase for these two.”
The taints do not increase for these two.”
The taints increase for these two.”
The taints increase for these two.”
The taints increase for these two.”
The taints increase for these two.”
The taints increase for these two.”
The taste of a man obsesses the mind of a woman.”
The taste of a woman obsesses the mind of a man.”
The Tathāgata and a disciple of the Tathāgata.
The Tathāgata and a disciple of the Tathāgata.
The Tathāgata has abandoned the bad unwholesome qualities that are to be burned up; he has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them so that they are no more subject to future arising.
The Tathāgata has abandoned the bad unwholesome qualities that are to be burned up; he has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them so that they are no more subject to future arising.
The Tathāgata has abandoned the production of renewed existence, the future bed of the womb; he has cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, obliterated it so that it is no more subject to future arising.
The Tathāgata has abandoned the production of renewed existence, the future bed of the womb; he has cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, obliterated it so that it is no more subject to future arising.
The Tathāgata has fully awakened to the cessation of the world; the Tathāgata has realized the cessation of the world.
The Tathāgata has fully awakened to the origin of the world; the Tathāgata has abandoned the origin of the world.
The Tathāgata has fully awakened to the way leading to the cessation of the world; the Tathāgata has developed the way leading to the cessation of the world.
The Tathāgata has these two kinds of Dhamma teaching.”
The Tathāgata teaches him the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals a spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
The Tathāgata teaches him the Dhamma … he reveals a spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One and the paccekabuddha.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One and the wheel-turning monarch.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One and the wheel-turning monarch.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One and the wheel-turning monarch.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One and the wheel-turning monarch.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One; a paccekabuddha; a Tathāgata’s disciple; and a universal monarch.
The Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One; a paccekabuddha; the one liberated in both respects; the one liberated by wisdom; the body witness; the one attained to view; the one liberated by faith; the Dhamma follower; the faith follower; and the clan member.
The Tathāgata, Ānanda, has developed and cultivated the four bases for psychic potency, made them a vehicle and basis, carried them out, consolidated them, and properly undertaken them.
The Tathāgata, Ānanda, has developed and cultivated the four bases for psychic potency, made them a vehicle and basis, carried them out, consolidated them, and properly undertaken them.
The Tathāgatas are immeasurable.”
The Tathāgatas are immeasurable.”
The Tathāgata’s disciple teaches him the Dhamma … reveals a spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
The Tathāgata’s disciple teaches him the Dhamma … reveals a spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The Teacher agreed.
The teacher Araka had many hundreds of disciples to whom he taught a Dhamma for companionship with the brahmā world.
The teacher Araka had many hundreds of disciples to whom he taught such a Dhamma as this: ‘Brahmins, short is the life of human beings, limited and fleeting; it has much suffering, much misery.
The teacher Sunetta had many hundreds of disciples to whom he taught a Dhamma for companionship with the brahmā world.
The teacher Sunetta had many hundreds of disciples to whom he taught a Dhamma for companionship with the brahmā world.
The teacher Sunetta had many hundreds of disciples.
The teaching of the good and the teaching of the bad.
The ten unwholesome courses of kamma.
The ten wholesome courses of kamma.
The third ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The third ground on which he may be criticized is that he does not share the wealth and do meritorious deeds.
The third ground on which he may be praised is that he shares the wealth and does meritorious deeds.
The third ground on which he may be praised is that he shares the wealth and does meritorious deeds.
The third ground on which he may be praised is that he shares the wealth and does meritorious deeds.
The thought of good will is to be developed for abandoning the thought of ill will.
The thought of harmlessness is to be developed for abandoning the thought of harming.
The thought of renunciation is to be developed for abandoning sensual thought.
The thought of renunciation, the thought of good will, the thought of harmlessness, perception of renunciation, perception of good will, and perception of harmlessness.
The thought of renunciation, the thought of good will, the thought of non-harming, and right view.
The three kinds of feelings.
The three kinds of feelings.
The three kinds of good conduct, becoming full, fill up the four establishments of mindfulness.
The three kinds of good conduct, too, I say, have a nutriment; they are not without nutriment.
The three kinds of misconduct, becoming full, fill up the five hindrances.
The three kinds of misconduct, too, I say, have a nutriment; they are not without nutriment.
The time for listening to the Dhamma, the time for discussing the Dhamma, the time for serenity, and the time for insight.
The time for listening to the Dhamma, the time for discussing the Dhamma, the time for serenity, and the time for insight.
The tongue itself as well as those tastes will actually be present, and yet one will not experience that base.
The touch of a man obsesses the mind of a woman.” 
The touch of a woman obsesses the mind of a man.”
The training in the higher virtuous behavior, the training in the higher mind, and the training in the higher wisdom.
The training in the higher virtuous behavior, the training in the higher mind, and the training in the higher wisdom.
The training in the higher virtuous behavior, the training in the higher mind, and the training in the higher wisdom.
The training in the higher virtuous behavior, the training in the higher mind, and the training in the higher wisdom.
The training in the higher virtuous behavior, the training in the higher mind, and the training in the higher wisdom.
The underlying tendency to sensual lust, the underlying tendency to aversion, the underlying tendency to views, the underlying tendency to doubt, the underlying tendency to conceit, the underlying tendency to lust for existence, and the underlying tendency to ignorance.
The underlying tendency to sensual lust, the underlying tendency to aversion, the underlying tendency to views, the underlying tendency to doubt, the underlying tendency to conceit, the underlying tendency to lust for existence, and the underlying tendency to ignorance.
The undertaking of the training in the higher virtuous behavior, the undertaking of the training in the higher mind, and the undertaking of the training in the higher wisdom.
The undertaking of the training in the higher virtuous behavior, the undertaking of the training in the higher mind, and the undertaking of the training in the higher wisdom.
The undertaking of the training in the higher virtuous behavior, the undertaking of the training in the higher mind, and the undertaking of the training in the higher wisdom.
The uninstructed worldling does not understand this as it really is; therefore I say that for the uninstructed worldling there is no development of the mind.”
The unrighteous assembly and the righteous assembly.
The unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, the unsurpassed gain, the unsurpassed training, the unsurpassed service, and the unsurpassed recollection.
The unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, the unsurpassed gain, the unsurpassed training, the unsurpassed service, and the unsurpassed recollection.
The unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, the unsurpassed gain, the unsurpassed training, the unsurpassed service, and the unsurpassed recollection.
The unwholesome root, greed; the unwholesome root, hatred; and the unwholesome root, delusion.
The utterance of another and careful attention.
The utterance of another and careless attention.
The Venerable Anuruddha then paid homage to him and sat down to one side, and the Blessed One said to him: “Good, good, Anuruddha!
The Venerable Anuruddha’s pupil Bāhiya is still fully intent on creating a schism in the Saṅgha, but the Venerable Anuruddha doesn’t think of saying even a single word about it.”
The Venerable Candikāputta said this: “Friends, Devadatta teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus thus: ‘When, friends, a bhikkhu’s mind is consolidated by mind, it is fitting for him to declare: “I understand: Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.”’”
The Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta is wise and capable of engaging with the elder bhikkhus in a discussion pertaining to the Dhamma.”
The Venerable Dhammika then thought: “I am banished by the lay followers from all seven monasteries here.
The Venerable Dhammika then went from that monastery to another one, where again he insulted visiting bhikkhus, reviled them, harmed them, attacked them, and scolded them.
The Venerable Girimānanda recovered from that affliction, and that is how he was cured of his affliction.
The Venerable Khema then said to the Blessed One:
The Venerable Mahācunda said this:
The Venerable Mahācunda said this:
The Venerable Mahācunda said this:
The Venerable Mahākaccāna expounded the meaning to us in these ways, in these terms and phrases.”
The Venerable Mahākaccāna said this:
The Venerable Mahākaccāna said this:
The Venerable Mahākassapa said this:
The Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita then told the Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta:
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna said this:
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna then said to him:
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna then said to him:
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna then said to him:
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna … the Venerable Mahākassapa … the Venerable Mahākaccāyana … the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita … the Venerable Mahācunda … the Venerable Mahākappina … the Venerable Anuruddha … the Venerable Revata … the Venerable Ānanda, too, emerged from seclusion and went to the meeting hall, where he paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
The Venerable Nandaka then said to Sāḷha:
The Venerable Nārada then said to him:
The Venerable Phagguṇa saw the Blessed One coming in the distance and stirred on his bed.
The Venerable Soṇa paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
The Venerable Sāriputta paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta said this:
The Venerable Sāriputta then addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
The Venerable Sāriputta then addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
The Venerable Sāriputta then reported to him the entire conversation that had taken place.
The Venerable Sāriputta then said to him:
The Venerable Sāriputta then said to the Venerable Saviṭṭha:
The Venerable Ānanda consented by silence.
The Venerable Ānanda expounded the meaning to us in these ways, in these terms and phrases.”
The Venerable Ānanda said this:
The Venerable Ānanda said this:
The Venerable Ānanda said this:
The Venerable Ānanda said this:
The Venerable Ānanda said this:
The Venerable Ānanda said this: 
The Venerable Ānanda saw her standing there in such a condition and said to her:
The Venerable Ānanda saw this and approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, the Venerable Udāyī, surrounded by a large assembly of laypeople, is teaching the Dhamma.”
The Venerable Ānanda then said to him:
The Venerable Ānanda then said to them:
The view of gratification, the view of self, and wrong view.
The villages, towns, and capital cities were so close that cocks could fly between them.’
Why is it, Master Gotama, that at present the number of people has declined, depopulation is seen, and villages, towns, cities, and districts have vanished?”
The virtuous behavior, concentration, wisdom, liberation, and knowledge and vision of liberation of one beyond training.
The virūpakkha royal family of snakes, the erāpatha royal family of snakes, the chabyāputta royal family of snakes, and the black gotamaka royal family of snakes.
The volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is dark with dark result, the volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is bright with bright result, and the volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is dark and bright with dark-and-bright result: this is called kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
The volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is dark with dark result, the volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is bright with bright result, and the volition for abandoning the kind of kamma that is dark and bright with dark-and-bright result: this is called kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
The wanderer Kokanada, too, rose as the night was receding and went to the hot springs to bathe.
The wanderers saw the householder Anāthapiṇḍika coming in the distance and silenced one another: “Sirs, be quiet.
The wanderers then said to him:
The wanderers then said to him:
The water left in the great ocean stands at the height of seven fathoms … six fathoms … five fathoms … four fathoms … three fathoms … two fathoms … a fathom … half a fathom … up to the waist … up to the knees … up to the ankles.
The water left in the great ocean stands at the height of seven palm trees, at the height of six palm trees … five palm trees … four palm trees … three palm trees … two palm trees … a mere palm tree.
The water, being shaken, shakes the earth.
The wealth of faith, the wealth of virtuous behavior, the wealth of learning, the wealth of generosity, and the wealth of wisdom.
The wealth of faith, the wealth of virtuous behavior, the wealth of moral shame, the wealth of moral dread, the wealth of learning, the wealth of generosity, and the wealth of wisdom.
The wealth of faith, the wealth of virtuous behavior, the wealth of moral shame, the wealth of moral dread, the wealth of learning, the wealth of generosity, and the wealth of wisdom.
The wealth of faith, the wealth of virtuous behavior, the wealth of moral shame, the wealth of moral dread, the wealth of learning, the wealth of generosity, and the wealth of wisdom.
The wealth of faith, the wealth of virtuous behavior,the wealth of moral shame and moral dread,the wealth of learning and generosity,with wisdom, the seventh kind of wealth: when one has these seven kinds of wealth,whether a woman or a man,they say that one is not poor,that one’s life is not lived in vain.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wearing away is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
The wholesome root, non-greed; the wholesome root, non-hatred; and the wholesome root, non-delusion.
The wise one is a giver of life,strength, beauty, and discernment.The intelligent one is a donor of happinessand in turn acquires happiness.
The wise one who gives to the foremost,concentrated upon the foremost Dhamma,having become a deva or a human being,rejoices, having attained the foremost.
The wise one who gives to the foremost,concentrated upon the foremost Dhamma,having become a deva or human being,rejoices having attained the foremost.
The wise person avoids what is harmful,and takes up what is beneficial.By arriving at what is beneficial,the steadfast one is said to be wise.
The wise person endowed with faith,having sacrificed thus with a generous mind,is reborn in a happy world,in without affliction.
The wise person should eradicatethis one unwholesome.In such a way one should train in the Dhamma:do not yield to recalcitrance.
The wise person, charitable and virtuous,acts for the good of both kinds of relatives,those who have passed awayand those still living in this world.
The wise person, dwelling at home,truly lives for the good of many.Day and night diligent towardhis mother, father, and ancestors,he venerates them in accordance with the Dhamma,recollecting what they did in the past.
The wise, having investigated, censure one.
The wise, having investigated, censure one.
The wise, having investigated, praise one.
The wise, having investigated, praise one.
The woman who fulfills her duties thus,following her husband’s will and wishes,is reborn among the devascalled “the agreeable ones.”
The woman who fulfills her duties thus,following her husband’s will and wishes,is reborn among the devascalled “the agreeable ones.” 
The wonder of psychic potency, the wonder of mind-reading, and the wonder of instruction.
The wonder of psychic potency, the wonder of mind-reading, and the wonder of instruction.
The world has gained the opportunity!’ but he does not know what is an opportunity and what is not an opportunity.
The world would become promiscuous, like goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, dogs and jackals.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worldling remains there all his life, and when he has completed the entire life span of those devas, he goes to hell, to the animal realm, or to the sphere of afflicted spirits.
The worst thing to lose is wisdom.”
The worst thing to lose is wisdom.”
The worst thing to lose is wisdom.”
Their consummation is nibbāna.’
Their disciples toonumbering many hundredswere unspoiled, liberated in compassion,men who had transcended the fetter of sensuality.Having expunged sensual lust,they were reborn in the brahmā world.
Their speed was like that of a light arrow easily shot by a firm-bowed archer—one trained, skillful, and experienced—across the shadow of a palmyra tree.
Their stride was such that it could reach from the eastern ocean to the western ocean.
Then a brahmin of Verañjā approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain affluent brahmin approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached his own preceptor and said to him: “Bhante, my body now seems as if it has been drugged, I have become disoriented, and the teachings are no longer clear to me.
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One … and said to him: “Bhante, it is said: ‘A trainee, a trainee.’
In what way is one a trainee?”
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him: “It is said, Bhante: ‘Equipped with supports, equipped with supports.’
In what way is a bhikkhu equipped with supports?”
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, how many proper occasions are there for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu?”
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, why is it that doubt does not arise in the instructed noble disciple about the undeclared points?”
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Venerable Ānanda and said to him: “Friend Ānanda, was it after full consideration that the Blessed One declared of Devadatta: ‘Devadatta is bound for the plane of misery, bound for hell, and he will remain there for the eon, unredeemable,’ or did he say this only figuratively?”
Then a certain bhikkhunī addressed a man thus: ‘Come, good man, approach Master Ānanda and pay homage to him in my name with your head at his feet.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a certain brahmin approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then a certain brahmin wanderer approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then a certain householder, a disciple of the Ājīvakas, approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then a certain Vajji bhikkhu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and said to him:
Then a man approached King Pasendi and whispered in his ear: “Sire, Queen Mallikā has just died.”
When this was said, King Pasenadi was pained and saddened, and he sat there with slumping shoulders, facing downward, glum, and speechless.
Then a man approached Sīha the general and whispered into his ear: “Sir, you should know that a number of Nigaṇṭhas from street to street and from square to square in Vesālī, thrashing their arms about and crying out: ‘Today Sīha the general has slain a plump animal to prepare a meal for the ascetic Gotama!
Then a man might arrive, afflicted and oppressed by the heat, weary, thirsty, and parched.
Then a man with good sight standing on the bank could not see shells, gravel and pebbles, and shoals of fish swimming about and resting.
Then a man with good sight standing on the bank could see shells, gravel and pebbles, and shoals of fish swimming about and resting.
Then a man would appear desiring his good, welfare, and security, wishing to pull him out from the cesspit.
Then a man would burn them in a fire, reduce them to ashes, and winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
Then a man would close up the irrigation channels on both of its banks.
Then a man would come along bringing a shovel and a basket.
Then a man would come along bringing a shovel and a basket.
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and reported what had happened.
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, a certain bhikkhu here in Sāvatthī was bitten by a snake and died.”
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then a number of brahmins, old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage, approached me and exchanged greetings with me.
Then a number of lay followers from Campā approached the Venerable Sāriputta, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then a number of lay followers from Kajaṅgalā approached the bhikkhunī from Kajaṅgalā, paid homage to her, sat down to one side, and said to her:
Then a number of Licchavis approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then a number of same-minded deities approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, at Migāramātā’s Mansion in the Eastern Park, Venerable Sāriputta is teaching the bhikkhus about the person fettered internally and the person fettered externally.
Then a number of young Koliyans from Sāpūga approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then a person might arrive, afflicted and oppressed by the heat, weary, thirsty, and parched.
Then another person will enter upon the fixed course rightness in wholesome qualities whether or not he gets to see the Tathāgata and whether or not he gets to hear the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata.
Then ask, bhikkhus.
Then Bhaddiya the Licchavi approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then Bharaṇḍu the Kālāma left Kapilavatthu.
Then Cunda, the smith’s son, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then even those devas with long life spans—beautiful, ablaze with glory—become fearful and filled with terror,like beasts who hear the lion’s roar.“It seems that we are impermanent,not beyond personal existence,”,when they hear the word of the Arahant,the Stable One who is fully freed.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.
Then for seven years the teacher Sunetta developed a mind of loving-kindness.
Then from time to time he would blow on it, from time to time sprinkle water over it, and from time to time just look on.
Then Hatthaka of Āḷavī approached the bhikkhu, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Hatthaka of Āḷavī, accompanied by five hundred lay followers, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Hatthaka of Āḷavī, while walking and wandering for exercise, saw the Blessed One sitting there.
Then he approached a certain bhikkhu in the Cock’s Park and asked him: “Bhante, where is the Venerable Ānanda staying now?
Then he approached the Venerable Sāriputta and said: “The Teacher is calling you, friend Sāriputta.’’
Then he asked the Blessed One a further question:
Then he asked the Blessed One a further question:
Then he asked the Blessed One a further question:
Then he created a gross body, paid homage to the Blessed One, and stood to one side.
Then he immersed Queen Bhaddā’s body in an iron vat filled with oil and enclosed it in another iron vat.
Then he returned to the Blessed One and said to him: “I have evicted that person, Bhante.
Then he rose from his seat and entered his dwelling without expounding the meaning in detail.
Then he rose from his seat and went to the Blessed One.
Then he sets out in search of game.
Then he sets out in search of game.
Then he sets out in search of game.
Then he went to Bharaṇḍu’s hermitage, prepared a mat, set out water for washing the feet, returned to the Blessed One, and said:
Then he went to the Venerable Nārada, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, King Muṇḍa’s Queen Bhaddā, who was dear and beloved to him, has died.
Then he would dry the slivers in the wind and sun, burn them in a fire, and reduce them to ashes.
Then he would dry the slivers in the wind and sun, burn them in a fire, reduce them to ashes, and winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
Then he would equip it with oars and a rudder and set out to cross the river.
Then he would swiftly have it brought over, get it pounded, and get the husks removed.
Then he would swiftly have the plants collected.
Then he would swiftly have them transported.
Then he would swiftly pile them up, have them threshed, get the straw removed, get the chaff removed, and winnow it.
Then I dwell pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
Then I say to them: ‘In such a case, it is due to God’s creative activity that you might destroy life … and hold wrong view.’
Then I say to them: ‘In such a case, it is due to past deeds that you might destroy life, take what is not given, indulge in sexual activity, speak falsehood, utter divisive speech, speak harshly, indulge in idle chatter; that you might be full of longing, have a mind of ill will, and hold wrong view.’
Then I say to them: ‘In such a case, it is without a cause or condition that you might destroy life … and hold wrong view.’
Then I understand thus: ‘I have abandoned greed, cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, obliterated it so that it is no more subject to future arising.
Then I was skilled in crookedness, faults, and defects in wood.
Then in the evening the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “Come, Ānanda, let us go to the eastern gate to bathe.”
Then it occurred to Bharaṇḍu: “The ascetic Gotama has contradicted me three times in front of the influential Mahānāma the Sakyan.
Then it occurred to Piyaka: “The Venerable Nārada is dwelling at Pāṭaliputta, in the Cock’s Park.
Then it occurred to the asuras: ‘The devas are still pursuing us.
Then it occurred to the asuras: ‘The devas are still pursuing us.
Then it occurred to the devas: ‘The asuras are still pursuing us.
Then it occurred to the devas: ‘The asuras are still pursuing us.
Then it occurred to the lay followers of the native district: “We serve the Saṅgha of bhikkhus with robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick, but the visiting bhikkhus leave.
Then it occurred to the lay followers … … and said to him: “Bhante, leave this monastery.
Then it occurred to the lay followers: “This Venerable Dhammika insults visiting bhikkhus….
Then it occurred to the lay followers: “We serve the Saṅgha of bhikkhus with robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick, but the visiting bhikkhus leave.
Then it occurred to the treasurer Piyaka: “King Muṇḍa’s Queen Bhaddā has died, and she was dear and beloved to him.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna: “What person was the Blessed One referring to when he said: ‘This assembly, Ānanda, is impure’?”
Then the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna fixed his attention on the entire Saṅgha of bhikkhus, encompassing their minds with his own mind.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna: “Which devas know one who has a residue remaining as ‘one with a residue remaining’ and one who has no residue remaining as ‘one without residue remaining’?”
Then it occurred to the Venerable Sāriputta: “Even when I am in the presence of the Blessed One, the Venerable Udāyī rejects me up to the third time, and not a single bhikkhu expresses agreement with me.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Sāriputta: “The Venerable Udāyī has rejected me up to the third time, and not a single bhikkhu expresses agreement with me.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Sāriputta: “These qualities have been purified and cleansed in me.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Ānanda: “The Blessed One does not allow the going forth of women from the household life into homelessness.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Ānanda: “The Blessed One has just recently recovered from his illness, yet this Mahānāma the Sakyan asks him a very deep question.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Ānanda: “The wanderer Uttiya had better not adopt the evil view: ‘When I ask the ascetic Gotama the most elevated question of all, he falters and does not answer.
Then it occurred to the Venerable Ānanda: “This earthquake was indeed powerful!
Then it occurred to the Venerable Ānanda: “Why did the Blessed One smile?
Then it occurred to them: “This Venerable Dhammika insults visiting bhikkhus, reviles them, harms them, attacks them, and scolds them, and then those visiting bhikkhus leave.
Then it occurred to those bhikkhus: “It is still too early to walk for alms in Sāvatthī.
Then it occurs to him: ‘Secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I should enter and dwell in the first jhāna ….’
But he cannot enter and dwell in the first jhāna ….
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
Then Jīvaka Komārabhacca approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then Kesi the horse trainer approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then King Ajātasattu addressed the chief minister of Magadha, the brahmin Vassakāra: “Come, brahmin, go to the Blessed One and in my name pay homage to him with your head at his feet.
Then King Muṇḍa addressed his treasurer, Piyaka: “Well then, friend Piyaka, immerse Queen Bhaddā’s body in an iron vat filled with oil and enclose it in another iron vat so that we can see Queen Bhaddā’s body still longer.”
Then King Muṇḍa mounted a fine carriage, and along with the other carriages he set out in full royal splendor for the Cock’s Park to see the Venerable Nārada.
Then King Muṇḍa said to the treasurer Piyaka: “Well then, friend Piyaka, have Queen Bhaddā’s body cremated and build a memorial mound for her.
Then King Pacetana addressed a chariotmaker: ‘Friend chariotmaker, six months from now there will be a battle.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala approached those bhikkhus and asked them:
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala entered the dwelling, prostrated himself with his head at the Blessed One’s feet, and covered the Blessed One’s feet with kisses and caressed them with his hands, pronouncing his name: “Bhante, I am King Pasenadi of Kosala!
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala set out for the park.
Then let the Dhamma exposition that I just recited be my guest’s gift to you.”
Then Mahāli the Licchavi approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then Mahānāma the Sakyan approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then Mahānāma the Sakyan approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him:
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute.”
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī had her hair cut off, put on ochre robes, and together with a number of Sakyan women, set out toward Vesālī.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, thinking: “The Blessed One does not allow the going forth of women from the household life into homelessness,” miserable and saddened, wept with a tearful face.
Then many benefits accrue to themand they dwell at ease.Their enemies are saddenedwhen both are the same in virtue.
Then one friend would say to the other: ‘Do you remember this, friend?
Then one of those deities sang, one danced, and one snapped her fingers.
Then Pahārāda, ruler of the asuras, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and stood to one side.
Then Princess Cundī, accompanied by five hundred chariots and five hundred court girls, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Princess Sumanā, accompanied by five hundred chariots and five hundred court girls, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Queen Mallikā approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him: 
Then report your questions to a friend.”
When this was said, the bhikkhus were still silent.
Then right here I see myself purified in both respects.’
Then right here I see myself purified in both respects.’
Then say: ‘Bhante, the bhikkhunī so-and-so is sick, afflicted, gravely ill.
Then Sāḷha the Licchavi and Abhaya the Licchavi approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Sāḷha, Migāra’s grandson, and Rohaṇa, Pekhuniya’s grandson, approached the Venerable Nandaka, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Sīha addressed a man: “Go, good man, find some meat ready for sale.”
Then Sīha the general approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then Sīha the general approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then Sīha went to the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta and said to him: “Bhante, I wish to go see the ascetic Gotama.”
Then Sīha’s determination to go see the Blessed One subsided.
Then take him out through the south gate and behead him south of the city.’
The king’s men would do as instructed and behead that man south of the city.
Then tell us, what is the bhikkhus’ view?”
Then tell us, what is your view?”
Then that bhikkhu rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, prostrated himself with his head at the Blessed One’s feet, and said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I have committed a transgression in that I so foolishly, stupidly, and unskillfully slandered the Venerable Sāriputta on grounds that are untrue, baseless, and false.
Then that bhikkhu, having received almsfood at the residence of Hatthaka of Āḷavī, rose from his seat and departed.
Then that bhikkhu, having received almsfood at the residence of the householder Ugga of Hatthigāma, rose from his seat and departed.
Then that bhikkhu, having received almsfood at the residence of the householder Ugga of Vesālī, rose from his seat and departed.
Then that bhikkhunī got up from her bed, arranged her upper robe over one shoulder, and having prostrated herself with her head at the Venerable Ānanda’s feet, she said to the Venerable Ānanda: “Bhante, I have committed a transgression in that I so foolishly, stupidly, and unskillfully behaved as I did.
Then that deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then that deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then that deity, thinking, “The Teacher agrees with me,” paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and disappeared right there.
Then that deity, thinking, “The Teacher agrees with me,” paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and disappeared right there.
Then that deity, thinking, “The Teacher agrees with me,” paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and disappeared right there.
Then that deity,: “The Teacher agrees with me,” paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and disappeared right there.
Then the bhikkhu Kassapagotta cleaned up his lodging, took his bowl and robe, and set out for Rājagaha.
Then the bhikkhu Kokālika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, Sāriputta and Moggallāna have evil desires and have come under the control of evil desires.”
Then the bhikkhu Kokālika died on account of that illness, and because of his resentment against Sāriputta and Moggallāna, after death he was reborn in the red-lotus hell.
Then the bhikkhu Kokālika rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated the Blessed One keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then the bhikkhunī Jaṭilagāhiyā approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said: ‘Bhante Ānanda, the concentration that does not lean forward and does not bend back, and that is not reined in and checked by forcefully suppressing —by being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, one is not agitated.
Then the Blessed One addressed a certain bhikkhu: “Go, bhikkhu, in my name call Sāriputta,: ‘The Teacher is calling you, friend Sāriputta.’’’
Then the Blessed One addressed Sujātā: “Come here, Sujātā.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, eject this person!
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, where is Cāla?
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Do you remember, bhikkhus, Paṇḍita’s cases?”
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior, concentration, and wisdom might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “It may be the case, bhikkhus, that you do not ask out of respect for the teacher.
Then the Blessed One addressed the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha: “On one occasion, brahmin, I was dwelling at Vesālī at the Sārandada Shrine.
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Udāyī: “Udāyī, how many subjects of recollection are there?”
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Udāyī: “Udāyī, just what do you understand by a mind-made group?”
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “I knew, Ānanda, that this hollow man Udāyī does not devote himself to the higher mind.
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “You may go, Ānanda, at your own convenience.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “Ānanda, do you just look on passively as an elder bhikkhu is being harassed?
Then the Blessed One addressed the young deva Ugga with verses:
Then the Blessed One approached those wanderers, sat down on a seat that was prepared, and asked them: “Wanderers, what discussion were you engaged in just now?
Then the Blessed One entered the Great Wood and sat down to pass the day at the foot of a tree.
Then the Blessed One entered upon the rains residence in Sāvatthī.
Then the Blessed One expressed his appreciation to the householder Ugga of Vesālī thus:
Then the Blessed One folded his outer robe in four and lay down on his right side in the lion’s posture, with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and clearly comprehending, after noting in his mind the idea of rising.
Then the Blessed One gave Sīha the general a progressive discourse, that is, a talk on giving, virtuous behavior, and heaven; he revealed the danger, degradation, and defilement of sensual pleasures and the benefit of renunciation.
Then the Blessed One got up and addressed the Venerable Sāriputta: “Good, good, Sāriputta!
Then the Blessed One got up and addressed the Venerable Sāriputta: “Good, good, Sāriputta!
Then the Blessed One instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened Sīha with a Dhamma talk, after which he rose from his seat and departed.
Then the Blessed One instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened the Venerable Phagguṇa with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
Then the Blessed One left the highway and sat down at the foot of a tree, folding his legs crosswise, straightening his body, and establishing mindfulness in front of him.
Then the Blessed One left the highway and sat down at the foot of a tree.
Then the Blessed One left the highway and sat down on a seat that was prepared for him at the foot of a tree, and those bhikkhus entered Daṇḍakappaka to search for a rest house.
Then the Blessed One said to Hatthaka: “Create a gross body, Hatthaka.”
Then the Blessed One said to the Venerable Visākha Pañcāliputta: “Good, good, Visākha!
Then the Blessed One said to Vappa the Sakyan: “If, Vappa, you would admit what should be admitted and reject what should be rejected; and if, when you do not understand the meaning of my words, you would question me about them further, saying: ‘How is this, Bhante?
Then the Blessed One thought: “Even for a third time the brahmin Saṅgārava, on being asked a legitimate question by Ānanda, falters and does not answer.
Then the Blessed One went to Bharaṇḍu’s hermitage, sat down on the seat that was prepared for him, and washed his feet.
Then the Blessed One, at the Cāpāla Shrine, mindful and clearly comprehending, let go his vital force.
Then the Blessed One, having known the king’s condition, said to him:
Then the Blessed One, having roared his lion’s roar three times in the wanderers’ park on the bank of the Sappinikā, rose up into the air and departed.
Then the Blessed One, having understood that the wanderer Sarabha silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless, said to those wanderers:
Then the Blessed One, having understood the Venerable Nandaka’s embarrassment, said to him: “Good, good, Nandaka!
Then the Blessed One, together with the Venerable Ānanda, went to Migāramātā’s Mansion in the Eastern Park.
Then the Blessed One, together with the Venerable Ānanda, went to the eastern gate to bathe.
Then the brahmin Doṇa approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin householders of Venāgapura approached the Blessed One.
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him … and said to him:
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the brahmin Kaṇḍarāyana approached the Venerable Mahākaccāna and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Piṅgiyānī rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, and having reverently saluted the Blessed One, he said: “An inspiration has come to me, Blessed One!
Then the brahmin Saṅgārava approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Saṅgārava approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Saṅgārava approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Saṅgārava approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Sikhāmoggallāna approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Tikaṇṇa approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Udāyī approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the brahmin Uggatasarīra approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Uggatasarīra said to the Blessed One: “Master Gotama, I want to kindle the sacrificial fire and raise the sacrificial post.
Then the brahmin Ujjaya approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Ujjaya approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him….
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, rose from his seat and departed.
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, rose from his seat and departed.
Then the brahmin Vassakāra, the chief minister of Magadha, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s words, rose from his seat and left.
Then the brahmin Ārāmadaṇḍa approached the Venerable Mahākaccāna and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then the deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then the deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then the deity paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then the elder bhikkhus went to the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and reported to him the entire conversation that had taken place, “Bhante, which of us has spoken well?”
Then the female lay disciple Migasālā approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the female lay disciple Migasālā approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the female lay follower Bojjhā approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the female lay follower Bojjhā … Sirimā … Padumā … Sutanā … Manujā … Uttarā … Muttā … Khemā … Somā … Rucī … Princess Cundī … the female lay follower Bimbī … Princess Sumanā … Queen Mallikā … the female lay follower Tissā … Soṇā the mother of Tissā … the mother of Soṇā … Kāṇā … the mother of Kāṇā … Uttarā Nandamātā … Visākhā Migāramātā … the female lay follower Khujjuttarā … the female lay follower Sāmāvatī … Suppavāsā the Koliyan daughter … the female lay follower Suppiyā … the housewife NakulamātāThen the female lay follower Kāḷī of Kuraraghara approached him, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the female lay follower Nandamātā addressed a man: “Come, good man.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One….
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One….
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One….
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached the Blessed One….
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika approached those wanderers and exchanged greetings with them.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika left Sāvatthī in the middle of the day in order to see the Blessed One.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika went to the park of the wanderers of other sects.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika, accompanied by five hundred lay followers, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika, accompanied by five hundred lay followers, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika, having understood that those wanderers silenced … and speechless, rose from his seat and went to the Blessed One.
Then the householder Dasama of Aṭṭhakanagara assembled the Saṅgha of bhikkhus from Pāṭaliputta and Vesālī, and with his own hands he served and satisfied them with various kinds of good food.
Then the householder Dārukammika approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Nakulapitā and the housewife Nakulamātā approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Tapussa approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the householder Ugga of Hatthigāma approached that bhikkhu, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Ugga of Vesālī approached that bhikkhu, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the householder Ugga of Vesālī approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then the householder Vajjiyamāhita approached those wanderers and exchanged greetings with them.
Then the householder Vajjiyamāhita left Campā in the middle of the day to see the Blessed One.
Then the householder Vajjiyamāhita went to the park of the wanderers of other sects …  Then the householder Vajjiyamāhita, having understood that those wanderers silenced … and speechless, rose from his seat and went to the Blessed One.
Then the housewife Nakulamātā approached the Blessed One….
Then the housewife Nakulamātā said this to him: “Do not die full of concern, householder.
Then the independent brahmā Tudu addressed the bhikkhu Kokālika in verse:
Then the independent brahmā Tudu approached the bhikkhu Kokālika, stood in the air, and said to him: “Place confidence in Sāriputta and Moggallāna, Kokālika.
Then the Koliyan daughter Suppavāsā, with her own hand, served and satisfied the Blessed One with various kinds of delicious food.
Then the Kālāmas of Kesaputta approached the Blessed One.
Then the lay followers of the native district went to the Venerable Dhammika and said to him: “Bhante, depart from all the seven monasteries in the native district.”
Then the lay followers went to the Venerable Dhammika and said to him: “Bhante, leave this monastery.
Then the Licchavi Abhaya and the Licchavi Paṇḍitakumāra approached the Venerable Ānanda, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Licchavis approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and stood to one side.
Then the Licchavis stationed a man on the road and told him: “Good man, when you see the Blessed One coming, you should inform us.”
The man saw the Blessed One coming in the distance, went to the Licchavis, and told them: “Sirs, this Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is coming.
Then the male lay follower Vāseṭṭha approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the owners take a broom and sweep them even further away.
Then the path is generated in him.
Then the person standing in the eastern quarter would say thus: ‘I will reach the end of the world by traveling.’
Having a life span of a hundred years, living for a hundred years, he might travel for a hundred years without pausing except to eat, drink, chew, and taste, to defecate and urinate, and to dispel fatigue with sleep; yet he would die along the way without having reached the end of the world.
Then the person standing in the western quarter would say thus … the person standing in the northern quarter would say thus … the person standing in the southern quarter would say thus: ‘I will reach the end of the world by traveling.’
Having a life span of a hundred years, living for a hundred years, he might travel for a hundred years without pausing except to eat, drink, chew, and taste, to defecate and urinate, and to dispel fatigue with sleep; yet he would die along the way without having reached the end of the world.
Then the preceptor took his pupil to the Blessed One.
Then the preceptor took his pupil to the Blessed One.
Then the Sakyan Mahānāma approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Saṅgha of bhikkhus headed by Sāriputta and Moggallāna dressed, took their bowls and robes, and went to the residence of the female lay follower Nandamātā, where they sat down in the seats that had been prepared.
Then the treasurer Piyaka approached King Muṇḍa and said to him: “Sire, the Venerable Nārada is dwelling at Pāṭaliputta, in the Cock’s Park.
Then the treasurer Piyaka rose from his seat, paid homage to the Venerable Nārada, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and went to King Muṇḍa.
Then the various kinds of shells, the gravel and pebbles, will reappear.”
Then the Venerable Anuruddha approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Now, Bhante, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see that women, with the breakup of the body, after death, are mostly reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
Then the Venerable Anuruddha approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Anuruddha spent the next rains residence right there among the Cetis in the eastern bamboo park.
Then the Venerable Anuruddha thought: “May all these deities become blue, of blue complexion, with blue clothes and blue ornaments.”
Having known the Venerable Anuruddha’s thought, those deities all became blue, of blue complexion, with blue clothes and blue ornaments.
Then the Venerable Anuruddha thought: “May all these deities become yellow … red … white, of white complexion, with white clothes and white ornaments.”
Having known the Venerable Anuruddha’s thought, those deities all became white, of white complexion, with white clothes and white ornaments.
Then the Venerable Bhaddaji approached the Venerable Ānanda and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Bāhuna approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Dhammika went from that monastery to still another one, where again he insulted visiting bhikkhus….
Then the Venerable Khema, thinking, ‘The Teacher agrees with me,’ got up from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and left.
Then the Venerable Kimbila approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Kimbila approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Kimbila approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: 
Then the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “Friend Sāriputta, there are these three kinds of persons found existing in the world….
Then the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and reported all that had happened.
Then the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna approached the Venerable Sāriputta … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna grabbed that person by the arm, evicted him through the outer gatehouse, and bolted the door.
Then the Venerable Meghiya approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Here, Bhante, while I was dwelling in that mango grove, three kinds of bad unwholesome thoughts frequently occurred to me: sensual thoughts, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of harming.
Then the Venerable Meghiya approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “This morning, Bhante, I dressed, took my bowl and robe, and entered Jantugāma for alms….
Then the Venerable Meghiya approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, I would like to enter Jantugāma for alms.”
Then the Venerable Meghiya rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and went to the mango grove.
Then the Venerable Māluṅkyāputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Māluṅkyāputta, exhorted in this way by the Blessed One, rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then the Venerable Puṇṇiya approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Puṇṇiya approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Rāhula approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Samiddhi approached the Venerable Sāriputta, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Sandha approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Saviṭṭha and the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Subhūti together with the bhikkhu Saddha approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Sumana, thinking, ‘The Teacher agrees with me,’ got up from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and left.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, why is it that for one person here, the business he undertakes ends in failure?
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Blessed One….
Then the Venerable Sāriputta approached the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened Nandamātā with a Dhamma talk, after which he rose from his seat and departed.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta neither delighted in nor rejected the statement of those wanderers, but rose from his seat and left,: “I shall find out what the Blessed One has to say about this statement.”
Then the Venerable Sāriputta neither delighted in nor rejected the statement of those wanderers, but rose from his seat and left,: “I shall find out what the Blessed One has to say about this statement.”
Then the Venerable Sāriputta rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Venerable Candikāputta: “Friend Candikāputta, it is not in such a way that Devadatta teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita: “Friend Koṭṭhita, there are these three kinds of persons found existing in the world….
Then the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Venerable Saviṭṭha and the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita: “Friends, we have each explained according to our own ideal.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta went to the park of the wanderers of other sects.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta went to the park of the wanderers of other sects.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta, along with those lay followers, went to the Blessed One.
Then the Venerable Sāriputta, the Venerable Saviṭṭha, and the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Udāyī approached the Venerable Ānanda and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Upavāṇa approached the Venerable Sāriputta … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Upāli approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Upāli approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Upāli approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, I wish to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.”
Then the Venerable Upāli approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute.”
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached that bhikkhunī, sat down in the appointed seat, and said to her:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One … … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī is standing outside the entrance with her feet swollen and her body covered with dust, miserable and saddened, weeping with a tearful face, because the Blessed One does not allow the going forth of women.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, this earthquake was indeed powerful!
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī has accepted the eight principles of respect as things not to be transgressed as long as life lasts.”
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, not long after the Blessed One left, the Venerable Phagguṇa died.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, the Venerable Phagguṇa is sick, afflicted, gravely ill.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and: “When this was said, Bhante, I said to that bhikkhu: ‘It was just in this way, friend, that the Blessed One declared it.’”
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Blessed One….
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Sāriputta … and said to him:
Then the Venerable Ānanda dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the bhikkhunīs’ quarters.
Then the Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, if a woman were to go forth from the household life into homelessness in the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata, would it be possible for her to realize the fruit of stream-entry, the fruit of once-returning, the fruit of non-returning, and the fruit of arahantship?”
Then the Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One: “It is astounding and amazing, Bhante!
Then the Venerable Ānanda said to the Venerable Udāyī: “The Teacher is addressing you, friend Udāyī.”
Then the Venerable Ānanda said to the wanderer Uttiya: “Well then, friend Uttiya, I will give you a simile.
Then the Venerable Ānanda together with a number of bhikkhus went down to the Aciravatī River to bathe.
Then the Venerable Ānanda took Mahānāma the Sakyan by the arm, led him off to one side, and said to him: “The Blessed One has spoken about the virtuous behavior of a trainee and the virtuous behavior of one beyond training, the concentration of a trainee and the concentration of one beyond training, the wisdom of a trainee and the wisdom of one beyond training.
Then the Venerable Ānanda went to the park of the wanderers of other sects….
Then the Venerable Ānanda, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, got up from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and approached the Venerable Sāriputta.
Then the Venerable Ānanda, having learned these eight principles of respect from the Blessed One, went to Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī and said to her:
Then the Venerable Ānanda, thinking, “The Teacher has agreed,” paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and left.
Then the Venerable Ānanda, together with the householder Tapussa, went to the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, this householder Tapussa says: ‘Bhante Ānanda, we laymen enjoy sensual pleasures … renunciation seems like a precipice to us ….
Then the wanderer Ajita approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Channa approached the Venerable Ānanda and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Moliyasīvaka approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Potaliya approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Sajjha approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Sutavā approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Sāmaṇḍakāni approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Sāmaṇḍakāni approached the Venerable Sāriputta and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Uttiya approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then the wanderer Vacchagotta approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then the wardens of hell torture him with the fivefold transfixing.
Then the young deva Kakudha approached the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, such a desire arose in Devadatta: ‘I will take charge of the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.’
And together with the arising of this thought, Devadatta lost that psychic potency.”
This is what the young deva Kakudha said.
Then they approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then they expel him.
Then they expel him.
Then they expel him.
Then they expel him.
Then they prosecute himand he also incurs imprisonment.This imprisonment is indeed sufferingfor one yearning for gain and sensual pleasures.
Then they pull it up by the root and cast it out from the barley field.
Then they rose from their seats, paid homage to her, circumambulated her keeping the right side toward her, and approached the Blessed One.
Then they will behold one another not only in this present life but also in future lives.”
Then they will see one another not only in this present life but also in future lives.”
Then those bhikkhu friends of Citta Hatthisāriputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Bhante, Citta Hatthisāriputta gained such and such meditative dwellings and attainments, yet he gave up the training and returned to the lower life.”
Then those bhikkhus approached the Venerable Mahākaccāna and exchanged greetings with him, after which they sat down to one side and said: “Friend Mahākaccāna, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis….
Then those bhikkhus approached the Venerable Ānanda and exchanged greetings with him, after which they sat down to one side and said: “Friend Ānanda, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis….
Then those bhikkhus neither applauded nor rejected the statement of those wanderers.
Then those bhikkhus went to the park of the wanderers of other sects.
Then those deities, “Master Anuruddha is not enjoying,” disappeared right on the spot.
Then those Licchavis presented the brahmin Piṅgiyānī with five hundred upper robes.
Then those wanderers said to the wanderer Sarabha: “The ascetic Gotama has offered to give you whatever you might ask him for, friend Sarabha.
Then those without confidence do not gain confidence, while some of those with confidence change their minds.
Then those without confidence do not gain confidence, while some of those with confidence change their minds.
Then those without confidence gain confidence and those with confidence increase.
Then those without confidence gain confidence and those with confidence increase.
Then two brahmin cosmologists approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then two brahmins who were old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage, a hundred and twenty years of age, approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Then two brahmins who were old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage, a hundred and twenty years of age, approached the Blessed One … and said to him:
Then Ugga the king’s chief minister approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then Uggaha, having understood that the Blessed One had consented, rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then Uggaha, Meṇḍaka’s grandson, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then Upaka Maṇḍikāputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said:
Then Upaka Maṇḍikāputta, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, and circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him.
Then Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, approached the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Visākhā Migāramātā approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then Visākhā Migāramātā approached the Blessed One….
Then Visākhā Migāramātā approached the Blessed One….
Then Visākhā Migāramātā, on the day of the uposatha, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then whatever kind of ornament one wishes to make from it—whether a bracelet, earrings, a necklace, or a golden garland—one can achieve one’s purpose.
Then whatever kind of ornament the goldsmith wishes to make from it—whether a bracelet, earrings, a necklace, or a golden garland—he can achieve his purpose.
Then whatever kind of ornament the goldsmith wishes to make from it—whether a bracelet, earrings, a necklace, or a golden garland—he can achieve his purpose.
Then when that night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, last night, when the night had advanced, the young deva Rohitassa, of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said:
Then when the night had passed the female lay follower Nandamātā had various kinds of delicious food prepared in her own residence.
Then why have you come back here?
Then, after attaining arahantship, that bhikkhu approached his preceptor and said to him: “Bhante, my body now no longer seems as if it had been drugged, I have become well oriented, and the teachings are clear to me.
Then, after expressing his appreciation to the householder Ugga of Vesālī, the Blessed One rose from his seat and left.
Then, after the Blessed One had instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened Hatthaka of Āḷavī with a Dhamma talk, Hatthaka rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then, after their meal, on returning from their alms round, those elder bhikkhus assembled and were sitting together in the pavilion hall when this conversation arose among them: “What, friends, is the proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu?”
Then, among qualities suitable and unsuitable, inferior and superior, dark and bright along with their counterparts, he has grasped the mark well, attended to it well, reflected upon it well, and penetrated it well with wisdom.
Then, among qualities suitable and unsuitable, inferior and superior, dark and bright along with their counterparts, he took up the mark well, attended to it well, reflected upon it well, and penetrated it well with wisdom.
Then, as the night advanced, when the first watch passed, the Venerable Ānanda rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, reverently saluted the Blessed One, and said to him: “Bhante, the night has advanced; the first watch has passed; the Saṅgha of bhikkhus has been sitting for a long time.
Then, as the night was receding, the Venerable Ānanda rose and went to the hot springs to bathe.
Then, before they had eaten breakfast, the Saṅgha of bhikkhus headed by Sāriputta and Moggallāna arrived in Veḷukaṇṭaka.
Then, being exhorted thus by the Blessed One, that bhikkhu acquired a sense of urgency.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time that bhikkhu realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time that bhikkhu realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time the Venerable Anuruddha realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time the Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time the Venerable Māluṅkyāputta realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time the Venerable Soṇa realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
Then, having acknowledged Brahmā’s request and what was proper for myself, I honored, respected, and dwelled in dependence only on the Dhamma to which I had become fully enlightened.
Then, having delighted and rejoiced in the statement of the brahmā Tissa, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna disappeared from the brahmā world and reappeared in Jeta’s Grove.
Then, having delighted and rejoiced in the words of the brahmā Tissa, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna disappeared from the brahmā world and reappeared on Vulture Peak.
Then, having dwelled at Paṅkadhā as long as he wanted, the Blessed One set out on tour toward Rājagaha.
Then, having exhorted the Venerable Anuruddha, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One disappeared before the Venerable Anuruddha among the Cetis in the eastern bamboo park and reappeared among the Bhaggas at Suṃsumāragira, in the deer park at Bhesakalā Grove.
Then, having known with his own mind the course of thought in the Venerable Soṇa’s mind, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One disappeared on Mount Vulture Peak and appeared in the Cool Grove in the presence of the Venerable Soṇa.
Then, having passed most of the night sitting, the Blessed One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then, having received such an exhortation from the Blessed One, that bhikkhu rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then, having risen from their seats, they paid homage to the Venerable Sāriputta, circumambulated him keeping their right sides toward him, and departed.
Then, having surveyed the utterly silent Saṅgha of bhikkhus, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus:
Then, having understood the meaning of this, the Blessed One on that occasion uttered this inspired utterance: 
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and approached the assembly hall.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and approached the infirmary, where he saw a certain bhikkhu who was frail and sick.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the assembly hall, where he sat down on the prepared seat.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the assembly hall, where he sat down on the prepared seat.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the assembly hall.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the meeting hall, where he sat down in the seat that was prepared.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the meeting hall.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the Venerable Phagguṇa.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the wanderers’ park on the bank of the river Sappinī.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the wanderers’ park on the bank of the Sappinikā.
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the wanderers’ park on the bank of the Sappinī.
Then, in the evening, the Venerable Anuruddha emerged from seclusion and approached the Blessed One.
Then, in the evening, the Venerable Sāriputta emerged from seclusion and approached the Blessed One.
Then, in the morning, a certain bhikkhu dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of Hatthaka of Āḷavī.
Then, in the morning, a certain bhikkhu dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the householder Ugga of Hatthigāma.
Then, in the morning, a certain bhikkhu dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the householder Ugga of Vesālī.
Then, in the morning, a number of bhikkhus dressed, took their bowls and robes, and entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Bārāṇasī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Uruvelakappa for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the householder Anāthapiṇḍika, where he sat down on the seat that was prepared for him.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the householder Nakulapitā, where he sat down in the prepared seat.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the householder Ugga of Vesālī, where he sat down in the appointed seat.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the residence of the Koliyan daughter Suppavāsā, where he sat down in the prepared seat.
Then, in the morning, the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, went to Sīha’s residence along with the Saṅgha of bhikkhus, and sat down on the seat prepared for him.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Meghiya dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Jantugāma for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Sāriputta dressed, took his bowl and robe, and descended from Mount Vulture Peak together with a number of bhikkhus.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Sāriputta dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Sāriputta dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Ānanda dressed, took his bowl and robe, and entered Kosambī for alms.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Ānanda dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the house of the female lay follower Migasālā, where he sat down on the seat prepared for him.
Then, in the morning, the Venerable Ānanda dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to the house of the female lay follower Migasālā, where he sat down on the seat prepared for him.
Then, in the presence of the Blessed One, the brahmin Piṅgiyānī extolled him with an appropriate verse:
Then, just as a clean cloth rid of dark spots would readily absorb dye, so too, while I sat in that same seat, the dust-free, stainless Dhamma-eye arose in me: ‘Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.’
I saw the Dhamma, attained the Dhamma, understood the Dhamma, fathomed the Dhamma, crossed over doubt, got rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and became independent of others in the teaching of the Teacher.
Then, just as a clean cloth rid of dark spots would readily absorb dye, so too, while Sīha the general sat in that same seat, there arose in him the dust-free, stainless Dhamma-eye: ‘Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.’
Sīha the general became one who had seen the Dhamma, attained the Dhamma, understood the Dhamma, fathomed the Dhamma, crossed over doubt, gotten rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and become independent of others in the teaching of the Teacher.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, Sakka disappeared from among the Tāvatiṃsa devas and reappeared at Mahisavatthu, in Dhavajālikā on Mount Saṅkheyya, in front of the Venerable Uttara.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One disappeared from among the Bhaggas at Suṃsumāragira, in the deer park at Bhesakalā Grove, and reappeared before the Venerable Anuruddha among the Cetis in the eastern bamboo park.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared at Migāramātā’s Mansion in the Eastern Park in the presence of the Venerable Sāriputta.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One disappeared from the deer park at Bhesakalā Grove, and reappeared before the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna.
Then, King Pasenadi of Kosala went quietly up to the dwelling with the closed door.
Then, not long after Hatthaka of Āḷavī had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, you should remember Hatthaka of Āḷavī as one who possesses eight astounding and amazing qualities.
Then, not long after he had recovered, the householder Nakulapitā, leaning on a staff, approached the Blessed One.
Then, not long after the Blessed One had left, the bhikkhu Kassapagotta was filled with remorse and regret,: “It is my misfortune and loss that when the Blessed One was instructing, encouraging, inspiring, and gladdening the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with the training rules, I became impatient and bitter,: ‘This ascetic is too stringent.’
Let me now go to the Blessed One and confess my transgression to him.”
Then, not long after the Blessed One had left, the Venerable Nandaka addressed the bhikkhus: “Just now, friends, before he rose from his seat and entered his dwelling, the Blessed One revealed the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life in four terms: ‘Nandaka, a bhikkhu may be endowed with faith but not virtuous….
Then, not long after the Blessed One had left, the Venerable Ānanda approached the Venerable Upavāṇa and said to him: “Here, friend Upavāṇa, they were harassing other elder bhikkhus, but we didn’t question them.
Then, not long after the householder Anāthapiṇḍika had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, if any bhikkhu, even one ordained for a hundred years in this Dhamma and discipline, would thoroughly refute with reasoned argument the wanderers of other sects, he would refute them just as the householder Anāthapiṇḍika has done.”
Then, not long after the householder Vajjiyamāhita had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, if any bhikkhu, even one who has long had little dust in his eyes regarding this Dhamma and discipline, would thoroughly refute with reasoned argument the wanderers of other sects, he would refute them in just such a way as the householder Vajjiyamāhita has done.” 
Then, not long after the Venerable Sāriputta had left, a certain bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, the Venerable Sāriputta struck me and then set out on tour without apologizing.”
Then, not long after the Venerable Ānanda had left, Māra the Evil One said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, let the Blessed One now attain final nibbāna!
Then, not long after the Venerable Ānanda had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, Ānanda is a trainee, but it is not easy to find one equal to him in wisdom.”
Then, on both of its banks, a man would open irrigation channels.
Then, on the uposatha day, a number of Sakyan lay followers approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then, on the uposatha day, those lay followers from Campā approached the Venerable Sāriputta, paid homage to him, and stood to one side.
Then, one morning, a number of bhikkhus dressed, took their bowls and robes, and entered Rājagaha for alms.
Then, over the next six days, the chariotmaker finished the second wheel.
Then, right after the Venerable Khema had left, the Venerable Sumana said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, when a bhikkhu is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the spiritual life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge, it does not occur to him: ‘There is no one better than me,’ or ‘There is no one equal to me,’ or ‘There is no one inferior to me.’”
Then, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I enter and dwell in the first jhāna, which consists of rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by thought and examination.
Then, sitting to one side, he said to the Blessed One:
Then, sitting to one side, he said to the Blessed One:
Then, sitting to one side, he said to the Blessed One:
Then, sitting to one side, he said to the Blessed One:
Then, sitting to one side, the brahmin Saṅgārava said this to the Blessed One:
Then, sitting to one side, the brahmin Tikaṇṇa, in the presence of the Blessed One, spoke praise of the brahmins who had mastered the threefold knowledge: “Such are the brahmins who are masters of the threefold knowledge; thus are the brahmins who are masters of the threefold knowledge.”
Then, some time later, he gains both internal serenity of mind and the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Then, some time later, he gains both internal serenity of mind and the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Then, some time later, he gains both internal serenity of mind and the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Then, some time later, he gains both internal serenity of mind and the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena.
Then, some time later, he gains both the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena and internal serenity of mind.
Then, some time later, he gains both the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena and internal serenity of mind.
Then, some time later, the householder Ugga of Vesālī passed away.
Then, some time later, the Venerable Soṇa resolved on a balance of energy, achieved evenness of the spiritual faculties, and took up the object there.
Then, someone of the white class produces a black state.
Then, sometime later, that bhikkhu trained in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
Then, soon after both monks had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, it is in such a way that clansmen declare final knowledge.
Then, soon after the Blessed One had left, the bhikkhus considered: “Friends, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis: ‘Bhikkhus, what is non-Dhamma and what is the Dhamma should be understood … one should practice in accordance with the Dhamma and with what is beneficial.’
Then he rose from his seat and entered his dwelling without expounding its meaning in detail.
Then, soon after the Blessed One had left, the bhikkhus considered: “Friends, the Blessed One taught this brief synopsis: ‘Bhikkhus, what is non-Dhamma and what is the Dhamma should be understood … one should practice in accordance with the Dhamma and with what is beneficial.’
Then he rose from his seat and entered his dwelling without expounding its meaning in detail.
Then, soon after the Blessed One had left, those wanderers gave the wanderer Sarabha a thorough verbal lashing, “Just as an old jackal in a huge forest might think: ‘I will roar a lion’s roar,’ and yet would only howl and yelp like a jackal, so, friend Sarabha, claiming in the absence of the ascetic Gotama: ‘I will roar a lion’s roar,’ you only howled and yelped like a jackal.
Then, there being a suitable basis, he is capable of realizing any state realizable by direct knowledge toward which he might incline his mind.
Then, there being a suitable basis, he is capable of realizing any state realizable by direct knowledge toward which he might incline his mind.
Then, there being a suitable basis, one is capable of realizing any state realizable by direct knowledge toward which one might incline the mind.
Then, when I have no evil intentions toward anyone, how can suffering afflict me, since I do no evil deed?’
Then, when the Blessed One had finished eating and had put away his bowl, Sīha sat down to one side.
Then, when the householder Anāthapiṇḍika had been instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened by the Blessed One with a Dhamma talk, he rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then, when the householder Vajjiyamāhita had been instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened by the Blessed One with a Dhamma talk, he rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and departed.
Then, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said:
Then, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire lotus pond, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Then, when the night had advanced, Brahmā Sahampati, of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, stood to one side, and said to him: “Bhante, the bhikkhu Kokālika has died, and because of his resentment against Sāriputta and Moggallāna, after death he has been reborn in the red-lotus hell.”
This is what Brahmā Sahampati said.
Then, when the night had advanced, the young deva Hatthaka, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One.
Then, when the night had advanced, the young deva Rohitassa, of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One.
Then, when the night had advanced, the young deva Ugga, of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and stood to one side.
Then, when the night had advanced, two deities of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Vulture Peak, approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and stood to one side.
Then, when the night had passed, in the morning the Blessed One dressed, took his bowl and robe, and went to Uggaha’s residence, where he sat down on the appointed seat.
Then, when the night had passed, Mahānāma approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then, when the night had passed, Sīha the general had various kinds of excellent foods prepared in his own residence, after which he had the time announced to the Blessed One: “It is time, Bhante, the meal is ready.”
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, last night, when the night had advanced, Brahmā Sahampati approached me and said to me … … He then paid homage to me, circumambulated me keeping the right side toward me, and disappeared right there.”
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Last night, bhikkhus, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said to me: ‘Bhante, there are these seven qualities that lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Last night, bhikkhus, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said to me: ‘Bhante, there are these six qualities that lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Last night, bhikkhus, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Jeta’s Grove, approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said: ‘Bhante, there are these six qualities that lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Last night, bhikkhus, when the night had advanced, a certain deity of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire lotus pond, approached me, paid homage to me, stood to one side, and said to me: ‘Bhante, there are these three qualities that lead to the decline of a bhikkhu.
Then, when the night had passed, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Last night, bhikkhus, when the night had advanced, two deities of stunning beauty, illuminating the entire Vulture Peak, approached me, paid homage to me, and stood to one side.
Then, when the night had passed, the brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala took abundant food of various kinds and went to the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
Then, when the night had passed, the brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala took abundant food of various kinds and went to the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
Then, when the night had passed, the brahmin householders of Icchānaṅgala took abundant food of various kinds and went to the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
Then, when the Venerable Sāriputta had walked for alms in Sāvatthī, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then, when the Venerable Sāriputta had walked for alms in Sāvatthī, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
Then, when the Venerable Sāriputta was alone in seclusion, the following course of thought arose in his mind: “What should a bhikkhu honor, respect, and dwell in dependence on so that he might abandon the unwholesome and develop the wholesome?”
Then, when the Venerable Ānanda had learned these ten perceptions from the Blessed One, he went to the Venerable Girimānanda and spoke to him about them.
Then, when the Venerable Ānanda had received almsfood at Migasālā’s house, he rose from his seat and departed.
Then, when the Venerable Ānanda had received almsfood at Migasālā’s house, he rose from his seat and departed.
Then, when this golden nugget of mine has been shown to the goldsmiths, it will be purified and will be more widely known as purified.’
So too these qualities have been purified and cleansed in me.
Then, when those bhikkhus had walked for alms in Sāvatthī, after their meal, on returning from their alms round, they approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said: “Here, Bhante, in the morning, we dressed, took our bowls and robes, and entered Sāvatthī for alms….
Then, while I possessed such speed and such a stride, the wish arose in me: ‘I will reach the end of the world by traveling.’
Having a life span of a hundred years, living for a hundred years, I traveled for a hundred years without pausing except to eat, drink, chew, and taste, to defecate and urinate, and to dispel fatigue with sleep; yet I died along the way without having reached the end of the world.
Then, while I was alone in seclusion, a course of thought arose in my mind thus: ‘It is painful to dwell without reverence and deference.
Then, while the Blessed One was instructing … and gladdening the bhikkhus with a talk on the Dhamma connected with the training rules, the bhikkhu Kassapagotta became impatient and bitter,: “This ascetic is too stringent.”
Then, while the householder Nakulapitā was being exhorted in this way by the housewife Nakulamātā, his ailment subsided on the spot.
Then, while the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna was alone in seclusion, the following course of thought arose in him: “Which devas know: ‘I am a stream-enterer, no longer subject to the lower world, fixed in destiny, heading for enlightenment’?” 
Then, while the Venerable Meghiya was dwelling in that mango grove, three kinds of bad unwholesome thoughts frequently occurred to him: sensual thoughts, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of harming.
Then, while the Venerable Soṇa was alone in seclusion, the following course of thought arose in his mind: “I am one of the Blessed One’s most energetic disciples, yet my mind has not been liberated from the taints by non-clinging.
Then, while traveling along the highway, in a certain spot the Blessed One saw a fish dealer killing fish and selling them.
Then, while traveling along the highway, in a certain spot the Blessed One saw a great mass of fire burning, blazing, and glowing.
Then, while traveling along the highway, the Blessed One saw a large sal-tree grove in a certain place.
Then, with five hundred chariots, Sīha the general set out from Vesālī in the middle of the day in order to see the Blessed One.
Then, with her feet swollen and her body covered with dust, miserable and saddened, weeping with a tearful face, she stood outside the entrance.
Then, with her own hands, the female lay follower Nandamātā served and satisfied with various kinds of delicious food the Saṅgha of bhikkhus headed by Sāriputta and Moggallāna.
Then, with his own hands, Sīha the general served and satisfied the Saṅgha of bhikkhus headed by the Buddha with the various kinds of excellent food.
Then, with his own hands, Uggaha, Meṇḍaka’s grandson, served and satisfied the Blessed One with various kinds of delicious food.
Then,: “The Teacher has agreed,” they paid homage to the Blessed One, circumambulated him keeping the right side toward him, and disappeared right there.
There are beings who are percipient in such a way.
There are beings who assert thus.
There are beings who hold such a view.
There are beings who perceive in such a way.
There are beings who practice in such a way.
There are bhikkhus in this Saṅgha who dwell having attained the imperturbable.
There are bhikkhus in this Saṅgha who dwell having attained the state of brahmās.
There are bhikkhus in this Saṅgha who dwell having attained the state of noble ones.
There are fellow monks of mine who know and see.
There are in the great ocean beings with bodies one hundred yojanas long, two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, and five hundred yojanas long.
There are many hundreds, many thousands, many hundreds of thousands who do so.
There are taints leading to hell; there are taints leading to the animal realm; there are taints leading to the realm of afflicted spirits; there are taints leading to the human world; there are taints leading to the deva world.
There are the devas of refulgent glory.
There are the devas of streaming radiance who are suffused and inundated with happiness.
There are the devas of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception: this is the foremost state of existence.”
There are the devas of the base of nothingness: this is the foremost perception.
There are these four ignoble declarations.”
There are these four ignoble declarations.”
There are these four means of sustaining a favorable relationship: giving, endearing speech, beneficent conduct, and impartiality.
There are these four noble declarations.”
There are these four noble declarations.”
There are these seats that have been prepared.
There are these six bases for contact: the eye as a base for contact, the ear as a base for contact, the nose as a base for contact, the tongue as a base for contact, the body as a base for contact, and the mind as a base for contact.
There are these six elements: the earth element, the water element, the fire element, the air element, the space element, and the consciousness element.
There are these ten qualities that serve as a protector.
There are these ten qualities that serve as a protector.
There are things to be abandoned by direct knowledge.
There are things to be abandoned by speech, not by body.
There are things to be abandoned neither by body nor by speech but by having repeatedly seen with wisdom.
There are things to be developed by direct knowledge.
There are things to be fully understood by direct knowledge.
There are things to be realized by direct knowledge.
There are thirty-six such currents of craving pertaining to the past, thirty-six pertaining to the future, and thirty-six pertaining to the present.
there are very young bhikkhus whose minds … liberated in it, seeing it as peaceful.
There are, bhikkhus, these eight inopportune moments that are not right occasions for living the spiritual life.
There are, bhikkhus, these ten thorns.
There are, brahmin, these four kinds of kamma proclaimed by me after I realized them for myself with direct knowledge.
There are, Sāriputta, these seven bases for ‘ten-less’ that I have proclaimed after realizing them for myself with direct knowledge.
There are, Visākhā, ascetics called Nigaṇṭhas.
There are, Ānanda, these seven bases for ‘ten-less’ that I have proclaimed after realizing them for myself with direct knowledge.
There at Naḷakapāna the Blessed One dwelled in a Judas tree grove.
There comes a time, Ānanda, when strong winds blow and shake the water.
There exists in me too such faith as those deities possessed because of which, when they passed away here, they were reborn there; there exists in me too such virtuous behavior … such learning … such generosity … such wisdom as those deities possessed because of which, when they passed away here, they were reborn there.’
When a noble disciple recollects the faith, virtuous behavior, learning, generosity, and wisdom in himself and in those deities, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight, based on the deities.
There exists in me too such faith as those deities possessed because of which, when they passed away here, they were reborn there; there exists in me too such virtuous behavior … such learning … such generosity … such wisdom as those deities possessed because of which, when they passed away here, they were reborn there.’
When a noble disciple recollects the faith, virtuous behavior, learning, generosity, and wisdom in himself and in those deities, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight, based on the deities.
There he addressed the bhikkhus:
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die so long as that bad kamma is not exhausted.
There he gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.
There he gains food and drink, garlands and various ornaments.
There he gains the five objects of celestial sensual pleasure.
There he gains the five objects of human sensual pleasure.
There he lies down on the bare ground strewn with grass.
There he might have a couch spread with rugs, blankets, and covers, with an excellent covering of antelope hide, with a canopy above and red bolsters at both ends.
There he sees women with their dress in disarray and loosely attired.
There he sees women with their dress in disarray and loosely attired.
There he would see a large sal sapling, straight, fresh, without a fruit-bud core.
There he would see a large sal sapling, straight, fresh, without a fruit-bud core.
There I attained such a state of concentration that I was not percipient of earth in relation to earth; of water in relation to water; of fire in relation to fire; of air in relation to air; of the base of the infinity of space in relation to the base of the infinity of space; of the base of the infinity of consciousness in relation to the base of the infinity of consciousness; of the base of nothingness in relation to the base of nothingness; of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception in relation to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception; of this world in relation to this world; of the other world in relation to the other world, but I was still percipient.”
There I taught the Vajjis these seven principles of non-decline.
There I was Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the vanquisher, the unvanquished, the universal seer, the wielder of mastery.
There I will engage in business and from time to time get to see the Blessed One.”
There in seclusion one should seek delight,having left behind sensual pleasures.Owning nothing, the wise personshould cleanse himself of mental defilements.
There in seclusion one should seek delight,having left behind sensual pleasures.Owning nothing, the wise personshould cleanse himself of mental defilements.
There is a deed that is agreeable to do which will prove beneficial.
There is a deed that is agreeable to do which will prove harmful.
There is a deed that is disagreeable to do which will prove beneficial.
There is a deed that is disagreeable to do which will prove harmful.
There is a development of concentration that leads to dwelling happily in this very life.
There is a development of concentration that leads to mindfulness and clear comprehension.
There is a development of concentration that leads to obtaining knowledge and vision.
There is a development of concentration that leads to the destruction of the taints.
There is a fourfold success of verbal kamma, arisen from wholesome volition, having a pleasant outcome and result.
There is a person who is not to be associated with, followed, and served; a person who is to be associated with, followed, and served; and  a person who is to be associated with, followed, and served with honor and respect.
There is a person who is to be looked upon with disgust, not to be associated with, followed, and served; a person who is to be looked upon with equanimity, not to be associated with, followed, and served; and a person who is to be associated with, followed, and served.
There is a question to be answered categorically; there is a question to be answered after making a distinction; there is a question to be answered with a counter-question; and there is a question to be set aside.
There is a threefold success of mental kamma, arisen from wholesome volition, having a pleasant outcome and result.
There is an acquisition of individuality in which both one’s own volition and the volition of others operate.
There is an acquisition of individuality in which one’s own volition operates, not the volition of others.
There is an acquisition of individuality in which the volition of others operates, not one’s own volition.
There is an offering that is purified through the donor but not through the recipients; there is an offering that is purified through the recipients but not through the donor; there is an offering that is not purified through either the donor or the recipients; there is an offering that is purified through both the donor and the recipients.
There is another.
There is dark kamma with dark result; there is bright kamma with bright result; there is dark-and-bright kamma with dark-and-bright result; and there is kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
There is dark kamma with dark result; there is bright kamma with bright result; there is dark-and-bright kamma with dark-and-bright result; and there is kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, kamma that leads to the destruction of kamma.
There is extreme suffering; there is slight suffering; there is suffering that fades away slowly; there is suffering that fades away quickly.
There is kamma to be experienced in hell; there is kamma to be experienced in the animal realm; there is kamma to be experienced in the realm of afflicted spirits; there is kamma to be experienced in the human world; and there is kamma to be experienced in the deva world.
There is no bodily misconduct on the part of the Tathāgata that he might need to hide,: ‘Let others not find this out about me.’
There is no delight in work, no delight in talk, no delight in sleep, guarding the doors of the sense faculties, and moderation in eating.
There is no delight in work, no delight in talk, no delight in sleep, no delight in company; and he reviews the extent to which the mind is liberated.
There is no mental misconduct on the part of the Tathāgata that he might need to hide,: ‘Let others not find this out about me.’
There is no peril from the wise person; there is no calamity from the wise person; there is no misfortune from the wise person.
There is no satiation by indulging in liquor and wine.
There is no satiation by indulging in sexual intercourse.
There is no satiation by indulging in sleep.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.
There is no such possibility.”
There is no such possibility.”
There is no such possibility.”
There is no such possibility.”
There is no verbal misconduct on the part of the Tathāgata that he might need to hide,: ‘Let others not find this out about me.’
There is no wrong livelihood on the part of the Tathāgata that he might need to hide,: ‘Let others not find this out about me.’
There is one who, by means of some clue, declares: ‘Your thought is thus, such is what you are thinking, your mind is in such and such a state.’
And even if he makes many declarations, they are exactly so and not otherwise.
There is still another.
There is still another.
There is still another.
There is still another.
There is still another.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of person here like a wild colt.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is such a kind of wild colt here.
There is the speaker who exhausts both the meaning and the phrasing.
There is the speaker who exhausts the phrasing but not the meaning.
There is this emetic, bhikkhus; that I do not deny.
There is this gain; this I do not deny.
There is this hearing; this I do not deny.
There is this kind of recollection; this I do not deny.
There is this kind of service; this I do not deny.
There is this possibility.
There is this possibility.
There is this possibility.”
There is this possibility.”
There is this possibility.”
A third time, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “This is impossible, friend Sāriputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu … reborn among a certain group of mind-made … might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
There is this possibility.”
A third time, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “This is impossible, friend Sāriputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made … might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
There is this possibility.”
This is what the Blessed One said.
There is this purgative, bhikkhus; that I do not deny.
There is this seeing; this I do not deny.
There is this training; this I do not deny.
There is this ‘Washing,’ bhikkhus; that I do not deny.
There is wealth in my family, Bhante.
There is worldly pleasant feeling, there is spiritual pleasant feeling; there is worldly painful feeling, there is spiritual painful feeling; there is worldly neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, there is spiritual neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
There it would produce a fire and smoke, and when it has exhausted that large pile of straw or sticks, it would burn up a woods or a grove until it reaches the edge of a field, the edge of a road, the edge of a stone mountain, the edge of water, or some delightful piece of land, and then, if it gets no more fuel, it would be extinguished.
There it would produce a fire and smoke, but when it has exhausted that small pile of straw or sticks, if it gets no more fuel, it would be extinguished.
There it would produce a fire and smoke, but when it has exhausted that wide pile of straw or sticks, if it gets no more fuel, it would be extinguished.
There might be two persons, one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, and another endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity.
There Sakka, ruler of the devas, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior, surpasses the Tāvatiṃsa devas in ten respects: in celestial life span … and tactile objects.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus with reference to Devadatta:
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus with reference to Devadatta: ‘Bhikkhus, it is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to review his own failings….
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus with reference to the bhikkhu Kalandaka: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!”
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!” 
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus….
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus….
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus….
There the Blessed One dwelled in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
There the Blessed One dwelled in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
There the Blessed One dwelled in the Icchānaṅgala woodland thicket.
There the Blessed One instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with the training rules.
There the Blessed One instructed, encouraged, inspired, and gladdened the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with the training rules.
There the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is now dwelling.
There the Blessed One, with reference to Devadatta, addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, Devadatta’s gain, honor, and praise led to his own ruin and destruction.
There the four great kings, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior surpass the devas the four great kings in ten respects: in celestial life span, celestial beauty, celestial happiness, celestial glory, and celestial authority; and in celestial forms, sounds, odors, tastes, and tactile objects.
There the Venerable Candikāputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Dhammika insulted visiting bhikkhus, reviled them, harmed them, attacked them, and scolded them, and then those visiting bhikkhus left.
There the Venerable Mahācunda addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Mahācunda addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Mahākaccāna addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Mahākassapa addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus thus: There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”There the Venerable Sāriputta addressed the bhikkhus….
There the Venerable Sāriputta … said this:
There the Venerable Sāriputta … said this:
There the Venerable Uttara addressed the bhikkhus….
There the Venerable Ānanda addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Ānanda addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Ānanda addressed the bhikkhus:
There the Venerable Ānanda addressed the bhikkhus: “Friends, bhikkhus!”
There the wardens of hell grab him by both arms and show him to King Yama,: ‘This person, your majesty, did not behave properly toward his mother and father; he did not behave properly toward ascetics and brahmins; and he did not honor the elders of the family.
There the young deva Santusita, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior, surpasses the Tusita devas in ten respects: in celestial life span … and tactile objects.
There the young deva Sunimmita, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior, surpasses the devas who delight in creation in ten respects: in celestial life span … and tactile objects.
There the young deva Suyāma, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior, surpasses the Yāma devas in ten respects: in celestial life span … and tactile objects.
There the young deva Vasavattī, who had practiced superlatively the basis of meritorious activity consisting in giving and the basis of meritorious activity consisting in virtuous behavior, surpasses the devas who control what is created by others in ten respects: in celestial life span, celestial beauty, celestial happiness, celestial glory, and celestial authority; and in celestial forms, sounds, odors, tastes, and tactile objects.
There the young Koliyan Dīghajāṇu approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
There they exist mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the skies, living in glory, and they remain thus for a very long time.
There too they knew him as “the brahmā Tissa, powerful and mighty.”
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared in that brahmā world.
There too they knew him as “the brahmā Tissa, powerful and mighty.”
Then, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna disappeared from Mount Vulture Peak and reappeared in that brahmā world.
There we can dwell at ease, without noise and without any crowds.”
Then those venerable ones went to the Gosiṅga Sal Woods, where they dwelt at ease, without noise and crowds.
There will be those who can understand the Dhamma.”
There would be some distress for the boy—this I don’t deny—but the nurse has to do so for his good and welfare, out of compassion for him.
There, at Rājagaha, the Blessed One dwelled on Mount Vulture Peak.
There, the happy ones do not recite passages of the Dhamma to him, but a bhikkhu with psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind teaches the Dhamma to an assembly of devas.
There, the happy ones do not recite passages of the Dhamma to him, nor does a bhikkhu with psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind teach the Dhamma to an assembly of devas, nor does a young deva teach the Dhamma to an assembly of devas.
There, the happy ones do not recite passages of the Dhamma to him, nor does a bhikkhu with psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind teach the Dhamma to an assembly of devas.
There, the happy ones recite passages of the Dhamma to him.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
There, too, there is confinement.
Thereafter, when the fetters of existence are destroyed,for one liberated by final knowledge,the knowledge arises:“My liberation is unshakable.”
Therefore a talk on faith is properly addressed to a person endowed with faith.
Therefore a talk on faith is wrongly addressed to a person devoid of faith.
Therefore a talk on generosity is properly addressed to a generous person.
Therefore a talk on generosity is wrongly addressed to a miser.
Therefore a talk on learning is properly addressed to a learned person.
Therefore a talk on learning is wrongly addressed to a person of little learning.
Therefore a talk on virtuous behavior is properly addressed to a virtuous person.
Therefore a talk on virtuous behavior is wrongly addressed to an immoral person.
Therefore a talk on wisdom is properly addressed to a wise person.
Therefore a talk on wisdom is wrongly addressed to an unwise person.
Therefore a virtuous woman or man,having observed the uposatha complete in eight factorsand having made merit productive of happiness,blameless goes to a heavenly state.
Therefore a wise person should abandon born of greed, hatred, and delusion.A bhikkhu, giving rise to knowledge,should abandon all bad destinations.
Therefore a wise person should revere them,and show them due honor,serve them with food and drink,with clothes and bedding,by massaging and bathing them,and by washing their feet.
Therefore a wise person with mindfulness established,not resorting to sense pleasures and bad deeds,should give up sense pleasures even if it’s painful:they call this person “one who goes against the stream.”
Therefore an intelligent person,remembering the Buddhas’ teaching,should be intent on faith and virtuous behavior,confidence and vision of the Dhamma.
Therefore an intelligent person,remembering the Buddhas’ teaching,should be intent on faith and virtuous behavior,confidence and vision of the Dhamma.
Therefore an intelligent person,remembering the Buddhas’ teaching,should be intent on faith and virtuous behavior,confidence and vision of the Dhamma.
Therefore he does not travel around by elephant or horse, by chariot or vehicle, or enjoy wealth or live off a large accumulation of wealth.
Therefore he does not travel around by elephant or horse, by chariot or vehicle, or enjoy wealth or live off a large accumulation of wealth.
Therefore I am now influential.
Therefore I am now rich, with great wealth and property.
Therefore I am now ugly, ill formed, and unsightly.
Therefore I do not speak praise of such a junior bhikkhu.
Therefore I do not speak praise of such an elder bhikkhu.
Therefore I don’t form intimate ties with people,nor does intimacy with anyone succeed in my case.’”
Therefore I have slept well.
Therefore I have slept well.”
Therefore I speak praise of such a junior bhikkhu.”
Therefore I speak praise of such an elder bhikkhu.
Therefore if one desires excellencelet a person here be accomplished;one should resort to those accomplished in wisdom;thus one’s own accomplishments flourish.
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon renunciation and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the absence of pleasure and pain and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the absence of rapture and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the absence of thought and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the base of nothingness and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the base of the infinity of consciousness and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the base of the infinity of space and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore my mind does not launch out upon the cessation of perception and feeling and become placid, settled, and liberated in it, though I see it as peaceful.’
Therefore that is not the proper occasion for going to see him.
Therefore that is not the proper occasion for going to see him.
Therefore that is not the proper occasion for going to see him.”
Therefore the Blessed One did not answer you.” 
Therefore this fire of delusion should be abandoned and avoided and should not be cultivated.
Therefore this fire of lust should be abandoned and avoided and should not be cultivated.
Therefore this venerable one overestimates himself and imagines that his estimate of himself is valid; he thinks that he has attained what he has not attained, accomplished what he has not accomplished, and achieved what he has not achieved; and by overestimation of himself he declares final knowledge thus: “I understand: ‘Destroyed is birth … there is no more coming back to any state of being.’”’
Therefore those good persons who are praiseworthy,firm in the Dhamma, who do nothing bad,unswayed by desire, hate, and fear,are called an elite assembly.Such is said by the Ascetic who knows.
Therefore, bhikkhu, you should remember Hatthaka of Āḷavī as one who possesses this eighth astounding and amazing quality, that is, fewness of desires.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, become disenchanted with this body.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, in regard to singing and dancing the demolition of the bridge.
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will fear the fault pertaining to the present life; we will fear the fault pertaining to the future life.
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will increase in wisdom.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will increase in wisdom.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will increase in wisdom.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.” 
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will not let hatred toward our fellow monks arise in our minds.’
Thus, bhikkhus, should you train yourselves.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will obtain the taste of the meaning, the taste of the Dhamma, the taste of liberation.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.” 
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will possess the power of faith, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of moral shame, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of moral dread, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of energy, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of wisdom, a trainee’s power.’
Thus, bhikkhus, should you train yourselves.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will possess the power of faith, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of moral shame, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of moral dread, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of energy, a trainee’s power; we will possess the power of wisdom, a trainee’s power.’
Thus, bhikkhus, should you train yourselves.” 
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will strive for the relinquishment of all acquisitions.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will strive indefatigably,: “Willingly, let only my skin, sinews, and bones remain, and let the flesh and blood dry up in my body, but I will not relax my energy so long as I have not attained what can be attained by manly strength, energy, and exertion.”’ It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
Therefore, Brahmin Dhammika, you should train yourself thus: ‘We will not let hatred arise in our minds toward our fellow monks.’
Thus, Brahmin Dhammika, should you train yourself.” 
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
Therefore, seeking happiness,wise persons give gifts,having removed the stain of miserliness.When they are settled in the triple heaven,for a long time they delightin companionship with the devas.
Therefore, Soṇa, resolve on a balance of energy, achieve evenness of the spiritual faculties, and take up the object there.”
Therefore, this fire of those worthy of gifts should be properly and happily maintained, having honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated it.
Therefore, this fire of those worthy of offerings should be properly and happily maintained, having honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated it.
Therefore, this householder’s fire should be properly and happily maintained, having honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated it.
Therefore, with a non-regressing mind,one should give a gift where it yields great fruit.Merits are the support of living beings in the other world.
Therefore, Ānanda, remember this sixth subject of recollection, too.
Therefore, Ānanda, you should train yourselves thus: ‘Striving in successively higher and more sublime ways, we will realize the unsurpassed bliss of liberation.’
Thus, Ānanda, should you train yourselves.” 
Thereupon King Koravya approached Sakka the ruler of the devas and said to him: ‘Listen, respected sir, you should know that the royal banyan tree does not yield fruit.’
Thereupon the brahmin Saṅgārava said to the Venerable Ānanda: “I consider Master Gotama and Master Ānanda worthy of veneration and praise.”
Thereupon the Venerable Anuruddha drew in his sense faculties.
There’s a man in the world who destroys life,speaks falsely, and takes what is not given,who goes to the wives of others,and indulges in liquor and wine.
These are all comprised within these three trainings.
These are all comprised within these three trainings.
These are all comprised within these three trainings.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by avoiding that have been abandoned by avoiding.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by developing that have been abandoned by developing.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by dispelling that have been abandoned by dispelling.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by patiently enduring that have been abandoned by patiently enduring.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by restraint that have been abandoned by restraint.
These are called the taints to be abandoned by using that have been abandoned by using.
These are called the things to be abandoned by direct knowledge.
These are called the things to be developed by direct knowledge.
These are called the things to be fully understood by direct knowledge.
These are called the things to be realized by direct knowledge.
These are called the thirty-six currents of craving.
These are called things to be abandoned by body, not by speech.
These are called things to be abandoned by speech, not by body.
These are four things contrary to the good Dhamma.
These are the crests of the standards in his case.
These are the deeds of the goodwhich the wise person should pursue.The noble one possessed of visiongoes to an auspicious world.
These are the eight accomplishments.”
These are the eight gifts of a good person.”
These are the eight grounds for giving.”
These are the eight ignoble declarations.”
These are the eight noble declarations.”
These are the eight powers.”
These are the feet of trees, these are empty huts.
These are the feet of trees, these are empty huts.
These are the feet of trees, these are empty huts.
These are the five accomplishments.”
These are the five accomplishments.”
These are the five accomplishments.”
These are the five accomplishments.” 
These are the five aggregates subject to clinging ….
These are the five benefits for a family that prepares their meal at the proper time.”
These are the five benefits for a person of judicious speech.”
These are the five benefits for one who falls asleep mindfully and with clear comprehension.” 
These are the five benefits in brushing one’s teeth.” 
These are the five benefits in conduct that inspires confidence.”
These are the five benefits in conduct that inspires confidence.”
These are the five benefits in giving.”
These are the five benefits in good conduct.”
These are the five benefits in good conduct.”
These are the five benefits in listening to the Dhamma.”
These are the five benefits in patience.”
These are the five benefits in patience.” 
These are the five benefits in periodic wandering.”
These are the five benefits in periodic wandering.” 
These are the five benefits in residing for a balanced period.”
These are the five benefits in residing for a balanced period.”
These are the five benefits in rice porridge.”
These are the five benefits in wealth.” 
These are the five benefits of walking meditation.”
These are the five benefits that come to a clansman who has faith.
These are the five dangers for a family that prepares their meal late in the day.
These are the five dangers for a person who speaks much.
These are the five dangers for one who engages in lengthy and unsettled wandering.
These are the five dangers for one who engages in lengthy and unsettled wandering.
These are the five dangers for one who falls asleep with a muddled mind, lacking clear comprehension.
These are the five dangers for one who visits families.”
These are the five dangers in a black snake.
These are the five dangers in a black snake.
These are the five dangers in a charnel ground.
These are the five dangers in conduct that does not inspire confidence.
These are the five dangers in conduct that does not inspire confidence.
These are the five dangers in fire.”
These are the five dangers in impatience.
These are the five dangers in impatience.
These are the five dangers in Madhurā.” 
These are the five dangers in misconduct.
These are the five dangers in misconduct.
These are the five dangers in not brushing one’s teeth.
These are the five dangers in reciting the Dhamma with a drawn-out, song-like intonation.”
These are the five dangers in residing too long.
These are the five dangers in residing too long.
These are the five dangers in wealth.
These are the five dangers in women.”
These are the five dangers in women.”
These are the five dangers when a bhikkhu who visits families bonds too closely with them.”
These are the five declarations of final knowledge.”
These are the five defilements of gold, defiled by which gold is not malleable, wieldy, and luminous, but brittle and not properly fit for work.
These are the five defilements of the mind, defiled by which the mind is not malleable, wieldy, and luminous, but brittle and not properly concentrated for the destruction of the taints.
These are the five destinations ….
These are the five disasters.
These are the five factors that he has abandoned.
These are the five factors that he possesses.
These are the five gifts of a bad person.
These are the five gifts of a good person.”
These are the five gifts of a good person.”
These are the five higher fetters ….
These are the five higher fetters.
These are the five hindrances ….
These are the five incurable lesions that lead to the plane of misery, that lead to hell.” 
These are the five kinds of dwelling at ease.”
These are the five kinds of forest dwellers.
These are the five kinds of happiness for an ascetic.”
These are the five kinds of miserliness ….
These are the five kinds of miserliness.
These are the five kinds of suffering for an ascetic.
These are the five lower fetters ….
These are the five lower fetters.
These are the five objects of sensual pleasure ….
These are the five objects of sensual pleasure.
These are the five obstructions, hindrances, encumbrances of the mind, states that weaken wisdom.
These are the five powers.
These are the five powers.”
These are the five powers.”
These are the five qualities that make for self-confidence in a trainee.” 
These are the five setbacks in the training.
These are the five setbacks in the training.
These are the five setbacks in the training.
These are the five Tathāgata’s powers that the Tathāgata has, possessing which he claims the place of the chief bull, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets in motion the brahma wheel.” 
These are the five things that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and rarely gained in the world.
These are the five things that increase vitality.”
These are the five things that increase vitality.”
These are the five things that reduce vitality.
These are the five things that reduce vitality.
These are the five timely gifts.”
These are the five trainee’s powers.
These are the five trainee’s powers.
These are the five ways of removing resentment by which a bhikkhu should entirely remove resentment when it has arisen toward anyone.”
These are the five who observe the practice of eating only food in the almsbowl.
These are the four acquisitions of individuality.”
These are the four cores.”
These are the four defilements of the sun and moon because of which the sun and moon do not shine, blaze, and radiate.
These are the four factors of stream-entry that he possesses.
These are the four factors of stream-entry that he possesses.
These are the four faculties.”
These are the four ignoble quests.
These are the four illnesses incurred by a monk.
These are the four inconceivable matters that one should not try to conceive; one who tries to conceive them would reap either madness or frustration.”
These are the four inversions of perception, mind, and view.
These are the four kinds of bulls.
These are the four kinds of clouds.
These are the four kinds of kamma proclaimed by me after I realized them for myself with direct knowledge.”
These are the four kinds of mangoes.
These are the four kinds of mice.
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.”
These are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.” 
These are the four kinds of poets.”
These are the four kinds of pools of water.
These are the four kinds of pots.
These are the four kinds of trees.
These are the four kinds of verbal good conduct.”
These are the four kinds of verbal good conduct.”
These are the four kinds of verbal misconduct.
These are the four kinds of verbal misconduct.”
These are the four kinds of vipers.
These are the four lights.
These are the four luminaries.
These are the four lusters.
These are the four means of sustaining a favorable relationship.”
These are the four means of sustaining a favorable relationship.”
These are the four modes of perception.
These are the four modes of practice.
These are the four modes of practice.”
These are the four noble quests.”
These are the four non-inversions of perception, mind, and view.”
These are the four pairs of things extremely far apart.” 
These are the four perils to be expected for one who enters the water.
These are the four perils.”
These are the four perils.”
These are the four powers.”
These are the four powers.”
These are the four powers.”
These are the four powers.”
These are the four powers.” 
These are the four proclamations of those who are foremost.”
These are the four radiances.
These are the four right strivings.”
These are the four sources of craving for a bhikkhu.
These are the four speakers.
These are the four splendors.
These are the four things in accord with the good Dhamma.”
These are the four things that are foremost.”
These are the four things that are foremost.”
These are the four times.”
These are the four ways in which craving arises in a bhikkhu.”
These are the four ways of answering questions.”
These are the four ways of not taking a wrong course.”
These are the four ways of taking a wrong course.”
These are the four wheels.
These are the nine kinds of persons found existing in the world.” 
These are the nine things rooted in craving.”
These are the obstacles to meals: one who is angry does not eat a meal, one in pain does not eat a meal, one who is ill does not eat a meal, one observing the uposatha does not eat a meal, and when not obtaining one does not eat a meal.
These are the seven bases for ‘ten-less.’”
These are the seven bases for ‘ten-less’ that I have proclaimed after realizing them for myself with direct knowledge.
These are the seven bases for ‘ten-less’ that I have proclaimed after realizing them for myself with direct knowledge.
These are the seven fetters.”
These are the seven fetters.” 
These are the seven fires.”
These are the seven kinds of wealth.”
These are the seven powers.”
These are the seven underlying tendencies.”
These are the seven who are not of good character.”
These are the seven who are of good character.”
These are the six benefits in realizing the fruit of stream-entry.”
These are the six cases of incapability.”
These are the six cases of incapability.”
These are the six cases of incapability.” 
These are the six cases of incapability.” 
These are the six qualities that lead to non-decline.
These are the six subjects of recollection.”
These are the six things that lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These are the six unsurpassed things.”
These are the ten abodes of the noble ones in which the noble ones of the past, present, or future abide.”
These are the ten kasiṇa bases.
These are the ten kasiṇa bases.”
These are the ten qualities of one beyond training.”
These are the ten qualities that serve as a protector.”
These are the ten qualities that serve as a protector.”
These are the ten reasons for suspending the Pātimokkha.”
These are the ten right courses.”
These are the ten things that are nutriments for those ten things that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and rarely gained in the world.” 
These are the ten things that are obstructions to those ten things that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and rarely gained in the world.
These are the ten things that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and rarely gained in the world.
These are the ten topics of discussion.
These are the ten wrong courses.”
These are the three accomplishments.”
These are the three ascetic tasks to be practiced by an ascetic.
These are the three characteristics that define the conditioned.
These are the three characteristics that define the unconditioned.”
These are the three factors of the donor.
These are the three factors of the recipients.
These are the three kinds of assemblies.” 
These are the three kinds of excellent thoroughbred horses.
These are the three kinds of excellent thoroughbred horses.
These are the three kinds of good horses.
These are the three kinds of good horses.
These are the three kinds of growth.”
These are the three kinds of high and luxurious beds that at present I gain at will, without trouble or difficulty.”
These are the three kinds of homage.”
These are the three kinds of patients found existing in the world.
These are the three kinds of persons found existing in the world.
These are the three kinds of persons similar to patients found existing in the world.”
These are the three kinds of persons that are like good horses.
These are the three kinds of persons who are like wild colts.
These are the three kinds of teachers found existing in the world.
These are the three kinds of wild colts.
These are the three kinds of wild colts.
These are the three preliminary tasks of a bhikkhu.
These are the three preliminary tasks of a farmer.
These are the three qualities that lead to the decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These are the three qualities that lead to the decline of a bhikkhu.”
These are the three that a bhikkhu should remember all his life.”
These are the three that a head-anointed khattiya king should remember all his life.
These are the three things that flourish when concealed, not when exposed.
These are the three things that give no satiation by indulging in them.”
These are the three things that shine when exposed, not when concealed.”
These are the three things they have abandoned.
These are the three things they have abandoned.
These are the three things they have cultivated.
These are the three things they have cultivated.
These are the three trainings in which all this is comprised.
These are the three trainings in which all this is comprised.
These are the three trainings in which all this is comprised.
These are the three unwholesome roots.
These are the three urgent tasks of a bhikkhu.
These are the three urgent tasks of a farmer.
These are the three who, if they do not abandon this, are bound for the plane of misery, bound for hell.”
These are the three wholesome roots.”
These are the three.
These are the two afflictive qualities.”
These are the two blameless qualities.”
These are the two blameworthy qualities.”
These are the two bright qualities.”
These are the two conditions for the arising of greed.”
These are the two conditions for the arising of hatred.”
These are the two conditions for the arising of right view.”
These are the two conditions for the arising of wrong view.”
These are the two dark qualities.”
These are the two enlightened ones.”
These are the two entering upon the rains.” 
These are the two in the world worthy of offerings and a gift is to be given to them.”
These are the two kinds of accumulation.
These are the two kinds of assistance.
These are the two kinds of compassion.
These are the two kinds of enjoyment.
These are the two kinds of expansion.
These are the two kinds of fools.
These are the two kinds of fools.”
These are the two kinds of fools.”
These are the two kinds of fools.”
These are the two kinds of fools.”
These are the two kinds of fools.”
These are the two kinds of gems.
These are the two kinds of generosity.
These are the two kinds of gifts to present to a guest.
These are the two kinds of gifts.
These are the two kinds of growth.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of happiness.
These are the two kinds of hospitality.
These are the two kinds of munificence.
These are the two kinds of offenses.”
These are the two kinds of offenses.”
These are the two kinds of offenses.”
These are the two kinds of offerings.
These are the two kinds of quest.
These are the two kinds of relinquishment.
These are the two kinds of search.
These are the two kinds of seeking.
These are the two kinds of sharing.
These are the two kinds of success.
These are the two kinds of veneration.
These are the two kinds of wealth.
These are the two kinds of wise people.”
These are the two kinds of wise people.”
These are the two kinds of wise people.”
These are the two kinds of wise people.”
These are the two kinds of wise people.”
These are the two kinds of wise people.” 
These are the two non-afflictive qualities.”
These are the two people arising in the world who are extraordinary humans.”
These are the two people who arise in the world for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.”
These are the two people whose passing away is mourned by many people.”
These are the two qualities that have happiness as their outcome.”
These are the two qualities that have suffering as their outcome.”
These are the two qualities that result in happiness.”
These are the two qualities that result in suffering.” 
These are the two qualities.”
These are the two qualities.”
These are the two qualities.”
These are the two qualities.”
These are the two strivings that are hard to achieve in the world.
These are the two that are not terrified by a bursting thunderbolt.”
These are the two that are not terrified by a bursting thunderbolt.”
These are the two that are not terrified by a bursting thunderbolt.”
These are the two things that lead to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.”
These are the two things that lead to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
These are the two things.”
These are the two things.”
These are the two things.”
These are the two things.”
These are the two things.”
These are the two unwholesome qualities.”
These are the two ways of sustaining a favorable relationship.
These are the two who are worthy of a stupa.”
These are the two wholesome qualities.”
These are three causes for the origination of kamma.
These are three causes for the origination of kamma.”
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These are three things.
These bhikkhus generate much demerit and cause the good Dhamma to disappear.
These bhikkhus generate much demerit and cause this good Dhamma to disappear.”
These bhikkhus generate much demerit and cause this good Dhamma to disappear.”
These bhikkhus generate much demerit and cause this good Dhamma to disappear.”
These bhikkhus generate much demerit and cause this good Dhamma to disappear.”
These bhikkhus generate much merit and sustain the good Dhamma.” 
These bhikkhus generate much merit and sustain this good Dhamma.”
These bhikkhus generate much merit and sustain this good Dhamma.”
These bhikkhus generate much merit and sustain this good Dhamma.”
These bhikkhus generate much merit and sustain this good Dhamma.” 
These eight persons, bhikkhus, are worthy of gifts … an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
These eight persons, bhikkhus, are worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
These eight qualities lead to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
These eight qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.” 
These eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions.
These eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions.”
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculties of faith … and wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculties of faith … and wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, and the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him feebly: the faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, and the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculties of faith … and wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculties of faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five faculties arise in him prominently: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
These five gain the goal having left this world.
These five gain the goal having left this world.
These five gain the goal here in this world.
These five gain the goal in this world.
These five objects of sensual pleasure are called ‘the world’ in the Noble One’s discipline.
These five objects of sensual pleasureare seen in a woman’s body:forms, sounds, tastes, and odors,and also delightful touches.
These five perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.”
These five perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.”
These five qualities lead to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
These five qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.”
These five sleep little at night but mostly keep awake.”
These five things lead to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.”
These five things lead to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
These five things lead to the decline of a temporarily liberated bhikkhu.
These five things lead to the decline of a temporarily liberated bhikkhu.
These five things lead to the non-decline of a temporarily liberated bhikkhu.”
These five things lead to the non-decline of a temporarily liberated bhikkhu.”
These five things, once arisen, are hard to dispel.”
These five things, when developed and cultivated, have liberation of mind as their fruit, liberation of mind as their fruit and benefit; they have liberation by wisdom as their fruit, liberation by wisdom as their fruit and benefit.
These five things, when developed and cultivated, have liberation of mind as their fruit, liberation of mind as their fruit and benefit; they have liberation by wisdom as their fruit, liberation by wisdom as their fruit and benefit.
These five things, when developed and cultivated, lead exclusively to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to nibbāna.”
These five things, when developed and cultivated, lead to the destruction of the taints.” 
These four are adornments of an assembly.”
These four are blemishes of an assembly.
These four are worthy of a stupa.”
These four bases for psychic potency are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five aggregates subject to clinging.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five bondages of the mind.” 
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five destinations.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five higher fetters.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five hindrances.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five kinds of mental barrenness.” 
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five kinds of miserliness.” 
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five lower fetters.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five objects of sensual pleasure.”
These four establishments of mindfulness are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.”
These four qualities of his promote his fame.
These four qualities of his promote his liberation.
These four right strivings are to be developed for abandoning these five setbacks in the training.”
These four things are helpful to a human being.”
These four things lead to the growth of wisdom.”
These four times, rightly developed and coordinated, gradually culminate in the destruction of the taints.
These nine perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.”
These nine persons are worthy of gifts … an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
These pathways of doctrine,formulated in diverse ways,relied upon by ascetics and brahmins,do not reach the Tathāgata,the self-confident one who has passedbeyond the pathways of doctrine.
These qualities, rightly saidto conform to the ascetic life,are acquired by a bhikkhuwho is content and heedful.
These seven kinds of wealth cannot be taken away by fire, water, kings, thieves, and displeasing heirs.”
These seven perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.
These seven perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.”
These seven persons are worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
These seven qualities lead to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.”
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These seven qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.”
These seven teachers were founders of spiritual sects, men without lust for sensual pleasures who had retinues of many hundreds of disciples.
These seven things lead to the decline of a lay follower.
These seven things lead to the non-decline of a lay follower.” 
These six qualities lead to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
These six qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.”
These six qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These six qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.’
This is what that deity said.
These six qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.”
These six qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu.”
These six teachers were founders of spiritual sects, men without lust for sensual pleasures who had retinues of many hundreds of disciples.
These six things pertain to true knowledge.”
These surely could not be the footprints of a human being!” 
These ten perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.”
These ten perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit, culminating in the deathless, having the deathless as their consummation.” 
These ten persons are worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
These ten things are purified and cleansed nowhere else but in the Fortunate One’s discipline.”
These ten things subsist through the body.”
These ten things, when developed and cultivated, lead to the destruction of the taints.”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….”
These ten things….” 
These then grew to the size of mung beans; then to the size of chickpeas; then to the size of jujube pits; then to the size of jujube fruits; then to the size of myrobalans; then to the size of unripe belli fruits; then to the size of ripe belli fruits.
These three fragrances spread with the wind but not against the wind.
These three qualities do not lead to one’s own affliction, the affliction of others, and the affliction of both.” 
These three qualities lead to one’s own affliction, the affliction of others, and the affliction of both.
These three things are prescribed by the wise, prescribed by good people.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.”
These three things are to be developed for abandoning the former three things.” 
These too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
These too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
These too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
These too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
These training rules, I say, are not barren.”
These training rules, I say, are not barren.”
These training rules, I say, are not barren.”
These two desires are hard to abandon.” 
These two do not misrepresent the Tathāgata.”
These two do not misrepresent the Tathāgata.”
These two kinds of persons are easy to satisfy.”
These two kinds of persons are hard to satisfy.”
These two kinds of persons are rare in the world.”
These two kinds of persons are rare in the world.”
These two misrepresent the Tathāgata.
These two misrepresent the Tathāgata.”
These two misrepresent the Tathāgata.”
These two qualities lead to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.”
These two qualities lead to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.”
These vassals of King Eḷeyya—Yamaka, Moggalla, Ugga, Nāvindakī, Gandhabba, and Aggivessa—are fools as well, for they, too, have complete confidence in the ascetic Rāmaputta and show him supreme honor by paying homage to him, rising up for him, reverentially saluting him, and observing proper etiquette toward him.’
Thereupon the brahmin Todeyya led them around by this method: ‘What do you think, sirs, in matters pertaining to tasks and administrative duties, to edicts and proclamations, isn’t King Eḷeyya wise and more astute even than those who are very astute?’
These words were uttered, Bhante, by the Blessed One:‘I will not attain final nibbāna, Evil One, until there are bhikkhu disciples of mine who are competent, disciplined, self-confident, attained to security from bondage, learned, upholders of the Dhamma, practicing in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing in the proper way, conducting themselves accordingly; who have learned their own teacher’s teaching and can explain it, teach it, proclaim it, establish it, disclose it, analyze it, and elucidate it; who can thoroughly refute in reasoned ways the current tenets of others and teach the antidotal Dhamma.’
Now at present the Blessed One has bhikkhu disciples who are competent … and who can teach the antidotal Dhamma.
These, bhikkhus, are the eight stains.”
These, bhikkhus, are the five elements of escape.” 
These, bhikkhus, are the five means of dwelling at ease.”
These, bhikkhus, are the four inspiring places that should be seen by a clansman endowed with faith.”
These, bhikkhus, are the nine grounds for resentment.”
These, bhikkhus, are the nine progressive cessations.” 
These, bhikkhus, are the nine progressive dwellings.”
These, bhikkhus, are the nine ways of removing resentment.”
These, bhikkhus, are the ten fetters.”
These, bhikkhus, are the ten grounds for resentment.”
These, bhikkhus, are the ten ways of removing resentment.”
These, bhikkhus, are the three kinds of excellent thoroughbred persons.”
These, bhikkhus, are the two things.”
These, Upāli, are the ten roots of disputes.”
These, Upāli, are the ten roots of disputes.”
They abstain from the destruction of life … … and hold right view.
They are always plundering any sweets that are left as gifts among families, whether sugar cane, jujube fruits, cakes, pies, or sugarballs, and then they devour them.
They are contented and unstirred,having conquered Māra and his mount;those happy ones have overcomeall Namuci’s armies.
They are deceivers, have evil desires, and hold wrong views.
They are headed by concentration.
They are headed by concentration.
They are heroes; they are mindful; and there is the living of the spiritual life here.
They are impatient and do not accept instruction respectfully.
They are impatient and do not accept instruction respectfully.
They are impure, foul-smelling, frightening, dangerous, and they betray friends.
They are not heedless about the deathless who are not heedless about mindfulness directed to the body.”
They are patient and accept instruction respectfully.
They are patient and accept instruction respectfully.
They are standing outside the entrance, to the Blessed One and the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.”
They are standing outside the entrance, to the Blessed One and the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.”
They are standing outside the entrance, to the Blessed One and the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.”
They are without selfishness and possessiveness; their life span is fixed; and their living conditions are exceptional.
They are wrathful, hostile, of virulent venom, double-tongued, and they betray friends.
They as superior or inferior,nor do they rank themselves as equal.Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived;they continue on, freed from fetters.
They bind one whose mind is muddledwith a glance and a smile,with their dress in disarray,and with gentle speech.It is not safe to approach such a personthough she is swollen and dead.
They call any womanwho has these eight qualities,virtuous, firm in Dhamma,a speaker of truth.
They can go and ask him.
They can go and ask him.
They can go and ask him.
They come into being through attention.
They come into being through attention.
They converge upon feeling.
They converge upon feeling.
They culminate in the deathless.
They develop mindfulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.
They develop mindfulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.
They develop mindfulness of death sluggishly for the destruction of the taints.
They develop mindfulness of death sluggishly for the destruction of the taints.
They did not settle down but vacated the monastery.
They did not settle down but vacated the monastery.
They did not settle down but vacated the monastery.
They directly knew: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
They do not hide what they have from one.
They do not hide what they have from one.
They do not offer a seat in an agreeable way.
They do not offer a seat in an agreeable way.
They do not pay homage in an agreeable way.
They do not pay homage in an agreeable way.
They do not perform legal acts separately or recite the Pātimokkha separately.
They do not perform legal acts separately or recite the Pātimokkha separately.
They do not rise up in an agreeable way.
They do not rise up in an agreeable way.
They do not savor the flavor of one’s words.
They do not seek what has been lost; they do not repair what has become decrepit; they overindulge in eating and drinking; or they appoint an immoral woman or man to be their chief.
They do not settle down but vacate the monastery.
They do not settle down but vacate the monastery.
They do not settle down but vacate the monastery.
They do not settle down but vacate the monastery.
They do not sit close by to listen to the Dhamma.
They don’t think they should listen to me as if I were poor.”
They drink liquor and wines,indulge in sexual activity;the ignorant acceptsilver and gold.
They drive a red-hot iron stake through one hand and another red-hot iron stake through the other hand; they drive a red-hot iron stake through one foot and another red-hot iron stake through the other foot; they drive a red-hot iron stake through the middle of his chest.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward concentration.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward each other.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward heedfulness.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward heedfulness.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward hospitality.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward hospitality.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the training.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the training.
They dwell with reverence and deference toward the training.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward concentration.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward each other.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward heedfulness.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward heedfulness.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward hospitality.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward hospitality.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Dhamma.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the Saṅgha.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the training.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the training.
They dwell without reverence and deference toward the training.
They enjoin their disciples thus: ‘Come, good man, lay down the rod toward living beings dwelling more than a hundred yojanas’ distance in the eastern quarter.
They exchanged greetings with those wanderers and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, sat down to one side.
They explain a coarse offense as not a coarse offense, and an offense that is not coarse as a coarse offense.
They explain a light offense as a grave offense, and a grave offense as a light offense.
They explain a remediable offense as an irremediable offense, and an irremediable offense as a remediable offense.
They explain and elucidate their own doctrines, but disparage, denigrate, deride, and denounce the doctrines of others.
They explain non-discipline as discipline, and discipline as non-discipline.
They explain non-discipline as non-discipline, and discipline as discipline.
They explain what has not been practiced by the Tathāgata as having been practiced by him, and what has been practiced by the Tathāgata as not having been practiced by him.
They explain what has not been practiced by the Tathāgata as not having been practiced by him, and what has been practiced by the Tathāgata as having been practiced by him.
They explain what has not been prescribed by the Tathāgata as having been prescribed by him, and what has been prescribed by the Tathāgata as not having been prescribed by him.
They explain what has not been prescribed by the Tathāgata as not having been prescribed by him, and what has been prescribed by the Tathāgata as having been prescribed by him.
They explain what has not been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as having been stated and uttered by him, and what has been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as not having been stated and uttered by him.
They explain what has not been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as not having been stated and uttered by him, and what has been stated and uttered by the Tathāgata as having been stated and uttered by him.
They extol themselves and disparage others.
They give respectfully, not without respect.
They give respectfully, not without respect.
They give without respect, not respectfully.
They give without respect, not respectfully.
They give women and girls of respectable families blows on their backs.
They grasp their own views, hold to them tightly, and relinquish them with difficulty.
They grow in branches, leaves, and foliage; they grow in bark and shoots; and they grow in softwood and heartwood.
They grow in branches, leaves, and foliage; they grow in bark; they grow in shoots; they grow in softwood; and they grow in heartwood.
They grow in faith; they grow in virtuous behavior; and they grow in wisdom.
They grow in faith; they grow in virtuous behavior; they grow in learning; they grow in generosity; and they grow in wisdom.
They have cultivated the deathless who have cultivated mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have developed the deathless who have developed mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have directly known the deathless who have directly known mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have fully understood the deathless who have fully understood mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have not fallen away from the deathless who have not fallen away from mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have not forgotten the deathless who have not forgotten mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have not strayed from this Dhamma and discipline, and they achieve growth, progress, and maturity in this Dhamma and discipline.”
They have pursued the deathless who have pursued mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have realized the deathless who have realized mindfulness directed to the body.”
They have seen what is non-selfas non-self and the unattractive as unattractive.By the acquisition of right view,they have overcome all suffering.
They have strayed from this Dhamma and discipline, and they do not achieve growth, progress, and maturity in this Dhamma and discipline.
They have undertaken the deathless who have undertaken mindfulness directed to the body.”
They hide what they have from one.
They hide what they have from one.
They in turn will give dependence to others but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
They in turn will give full ordination to others but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
They might force a cut on him against his will, saying: ‘Good man, you must eat this piece of meat and pay for it.’
In the same way, without the consent of those ascetics and brahmins, Pūraṇa Kassapa has described these six classes in a foolish, incompetent, inexpert, and unskilled way.
They mutually delight when their opponentspeaks badly and makes a mistake, in his bewilderment and defeat;but noble ones don’t engage in such talk.
They offer a seat in an agreeable way.
They offer a seat in an agreeable way.
They often wanted to see one another, the mother often wanting to see her son, and the son his mother.
They originate from contact.
They originate from contact.
They paid homage to the Blessed One and silently stood in attendance upon him with their hands joined in reverential salutation.
They paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and reported to the Blessed One their entire discussion with the bhikkhunī of Kajaṅgalā.
They paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and the Venerable Sāriputta said to him: 
They partake of the deathless who partake of mindfulness directed to the body.”
They pay homage in an agreeable way.
They pay homage in an agreeable way.
They perform legal acts separately and recite the Pātimokkha separately.
They perform legal acts separately and recite the Pātimokkha separately.
They rise up in an agreeable way.
They rise up in an agreeable way.
They savor the flavor of one’s words.
They see even from a distance but are not seen themselves even when close; they too know the minds with their own mind.
They see things from a distance but they are not themselves seen even when they’re close; they know the minds with their own mind.
They seek what has been lost; they repair what has become decrepit; they are moderate in eating and drinking; and they appoint a virtuous woman or man to be their chief.
They sit close by to listen to the Dhamma.
They sometimes utter the inspired utterance: ‘Oh, what happiness!
They state the meaning but don’t bring themselves into the picture.
They stood outside the entrance making an uproar and a racket.
They stood outside the entrance making an uproar and a racket.
They stood outside the entrance making an uproar and a racket.
They subsist on forest roots and fruits; they feed on fallen fruits.
They teach him the Dhammathat dispels all suffering,having understood whichthe taintless one here attains nibbāna.
They teach one the Dhammathat dispels all suffering,having understood whichthe taintless one here attains nibbāna.
They teach their Dhamma for the direct knowledge and realization of this.
They then heard the wanderer Sarabha making such a statement to an assembly in Rājagaha.
They then smear the ground with wet cow dung, cover this with green kusa grass, and lie down between the boundary and the fire house.
They then smear the ground with wet cow dung, cover this with green kusa grass, and lie down between the boundary and the fire house.
They think: ‘No one else has entered here except the monk.
They too become luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they too do not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They too do not become luxurious and lax but discard backsliding and take the lead in solitude; they too arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They too do not become luxurious and lax, but discard backsliding and take the lead in solitude; they too arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They too would know me thus: “Look at this clansman: though he has gone forth from the household life into homelessness out of faith, he is tarnished by bad unwholesome states.”’ He then reflects thus: ‘Energy will be aroused in me without slackening; mindfulness will be established without confusion; my body will be tranquil without disturbance; my mind will be concentrated and one-pointed.’
Having taken the world as his authority, he abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome; he abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless; he maintains himself in purity.
They use old cloth from Kāsi as a wrapping for gems or they deposit it in a fragrant casket.
They use old cloth made of bark fabric for cleaning pots or they discard it on a rubbish heap.
They usually present him what is agreeable, seldom what is disagreeable.
They usually present him what is agreeable, seldom what is disagreeable.
They usually present me what is agreeable, seldom what is disagreeable.
They usually present me what is agreeable, seldom what is disagreeable.
They will be Vajjis!’?”
They will be Vajjis!”
They will give dependence to others but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
They will give full ordination to others but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
They will give up dwelling at the foot of a tree, will give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there; and they will engage in many kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of lodgings.
They will give up going on alms round, give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there, seeking the finest delicacies with the tips of their tongues; and they will engage in many kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of almsfood.
They will give up the use of rag robes, give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there; and they will engage in many kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of a robe.
They will meet with distress later.”
They will never stop misrepresenting the Blessed One with what is untrue, baseless, false, and contrary to fact, and we would never intentionally deprive a living being of life, even for the sake of our life.”
They would first approach the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity.”
They would first receive alms from the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity.”
They would first show compassion to the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity.”
They would first teach the Dhamma to the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity.”
They would have me flogged with whips … they would have my head cut off with a sword.’
Afraid of the fault pertaining to the present life, he does not plunder the belongings of others.
They would have me flogged with whips … they would have my head cut off with a sword.’
Afraid of the peril of punishment, he does not go about plundering the belongings of others.
They would know me thus: “Look at this clansman: though he has gone forth from the household life into homelessness out of faith, he is tarnished by bad unwholesome states.”
There are deities, too, with psychic potency and the divine eye who know the minds of others.
They would usually present him what is agreeable, seldom what is disagreeable.
They, too, become luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they, too, do not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They, too, become luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they, too, do not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They, too, do not become luxurious and lax, but discard backsliding and take the lead in solitude; they, too, arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They, too, do not become luxurious and lax, but they discard backsliding and take the lead in solitude; they, too, arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They, too, will be luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they, too, will not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thinking, ‘I am one who gains the markless mental concentration,’ he bonds with bhikkhus … he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.”
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu gains robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu gains robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu is of long standing and has long gone forth,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu is of long standing and has long gone forth,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu is well known and famous and has a retinue of many people, including householders and monastics,’ they follow his example.
Thinking, ‘The elder bhikkhu is well known and famous and has a retinue of many people, including householders and monastics,’ they follow his example.
This bhikkhu can be expected to attain the breaking up of ignorance.
This bhikkhu can be expected to attain the breaking up of ignorance.
This bhikkhu can be expected to attain the cessation of personal existence.
This bhikkhu can be expected to attain the cessation of personal existence.
This bhikkhu cannot be expected to attain the breaking up of ignorance.
This bhikkhu cannot be expected to attain the breaking up of ignorance.
This bhikkhu cannot be expected to attain the cessation of personal existence.
This bhikkhu cannot be expected to attain the cessation of personal existence.
This body has originated from conceit; in dependence on conceit, conceit is to be abandoned.
This body has originated from craving; in dependence on craving, craving is to be abandoned.
This body has originated from sexual intercourse, but in regard to sexual intercourse the Blessed One has declared the demolition of the bridge.
This deed is considered one that should be done on both grounds.
This deed is considered one that should be done on both grounds: because it is agreeable to do and because it proves beneficial.
This Dhamma is for one who delights in non-proliferation, who takes delight in non-proliferation, not for one who delights in proliferation, who takes delight in proliferation.
This Dhamma is for one who is concentrated, not for one who is unconcentrated.
This Dhamma is for one who is concentrated, not for one who is unconcentrated.
This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.
This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.
This Dhamma is for one who is energetic, not for one who is lazy.
This Dhamma is for one who is energetic, not for one who is lazy.
This Dhamma is for one who is wise, not for one who is unwise.
This Dhamma is for one who is wise, not for one who is unwise.’
Therefore, Anuruddha, also reflect on this eighth thought of a great person: ‘This Dhamma is for one who delights in non-proliferation, who takes delight in nonproliferation, not for one who delights in proliferation, who takes delight in proliferation.’
This Dhamma is for one who is wise, not for one who is unwise.”
This Dhamma is for one who resorts to solitude, not for one who delights in company.
This Dhamma is for one who resorts to solitude, not for one who delights in company.
This Dhamma is for one with few desires, not for one with strong desires.
This Dhamma is for one with mindfulness established, not for one who is muddle-minded.
This Dhamma is for one with mindfulness established, not for one who is muddle-minded.
This earthquake was indeed very powerful, frightening and terrifying, and peals of thunder shook the sky!
This earthquake was indeed very powerful, frightening and terrifying, and peals of thunder shook the sky!
This exposition of the Dhamma is beneficial; it pertains to the fundamentals of the spiritual life.”
This fifth great dream appeared to him that his awakening.
This first great dream appeared to him that his awakening.
This foolish evildoer, knowinghis own misdeeds, is a poor personwho falls into debt,troubled while enjoying himself.
This foolish evildoer,knowing his own misdeeds,goes to a certain realmor is even bound in hell.
This fourth great dream appeared to him that his awakening.
This indeed is the suffering of bondagefrom which the wise person is freed,giving with wealth righteously gained,settling his mind in confidence.
This is a breach, flaw, blemish, and blotch of the celibate life.
This is a designation for happiness, that is, merit.
This is a directly visible fruit of giving.
This is a fruit of giving pertaining to future lives.”
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself accomplished in concentration….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself accomplished in liberation….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself accomplished in the knowledge and vision of liberation and speaks to the bhikkhus on accomplishment in the knowledge and vision of liberation.’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself accomplished in wisdom….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself content….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself energetic….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself given to solitude….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself not bound up with others….’
This is a ground for praise: ‘The bhikkhu is himself of few desires and speaks to the bhikkhus on fewness of desires.’
This is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed on the basis of which he can claim: ‘My taints have been destroyed.’
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed on the basis of which he can claim: ‘My taints have been destroyed.’
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed on the basis of which he claims the destruction of the taints: ‘My taints have been destroyed.’
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed on the basis of which he claims the destruction of the taints: ‘My taints have been destroyed.’
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed….
This is a power of a bhikkhu with taints destroyed….
This is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect and conduces to cohesiveness, non-dispute, concord, and unity.
This is a principle of cordiality.
This is a quality that serves as a protector.
This is a reason why at present the number of people has declined, depopulation is seen, and villages, towns, cities, and districts have vanished.
This is a rebirth not shared with worldlings.
This is a rebirth not shared with worldlings.
This is a rebirth not shared with worldlings.
This is a rebirth not shared with worldlings.
This is a right occasion, when the gift is of benefit to one living there.”
This is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.
This is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
This is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
This is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
This is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
This is another reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One….
This is another reason why at present the number of people has declined, depopulation is seen, and villages, towns, cities, and districts have vanished.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who does not rouse himself, strive, and make an effort to acquire gain, and getting it, becomes intoxicated and heedless: he has fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who does not rouse himself, strive, and make an effort to acquire gain, and getting it, does not become intoxicated and heedless: he has not fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who does not rouse himself, strive, and make an effort to acquire gain, and not getting it, does not sorrow and lament: he has not fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who does not rouse himself, strive, and make an effort to acquire gain, and not getting it, sorrows and laments: he has fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who rouses himself, strives, and makes an effort to acquire gain, and getting it, becomes intoxicated and heedless: he has fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who rouses himself, strives, and makes an effort to acquire gain, and getting it, does not become intoxicated and heedless: he has not fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who rouses himself, strives, and makes an effort to acquire gain, and not getting it, does not sorrow and lament: he has not fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu desirous of gain who rouses himself, strives, and makes an effort to acquire gain, but not getting it, sorrows and laments: he has fallen away from the good Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who delights in nibbāna, who has abandoned personal existence to completely make an end of suffering.”
This is called a bhikkhu who delights in nibbāna, who has abandoned personal existence to completely make an end of suffering.”
This is called a bhikkhu who delights in personal existence, who has not abandoned personal existence to completely make an end of suffering.
This is called a bhikkhu who delights in personal existence, who has not abandoned personal existence to completely make an end of suffering.
This is called a bhikkhu who has dropped away from both, fallen away from both.
This is called a bhikkhu who has given up the training and reverted to the lower life because of the peril of crocodiles.
This is called a bhikkhu who has given up the training and reverted to the lower life because of the peril of fierce fish.
This is called a bhikkhu who has given up the training and reverted to the lower life because of the peril of waves.
This is called a bhikkhu who has given up the training and reverted to the lower life because of the peril of whirlpools.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in communication, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in communication, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in learning, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in learning, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in recitation, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in recitation, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in thought, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who is absorbed in thought, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
This is called a bhikkhu who, having come to the end of the world, dwells at the end of the world, one who has crossed over attachment to the world.”
This is called a bhikkhu who, having come to the end of the world, dwells at the end of the world.
This is called a bhikkhu who, having come to the end of the world, dwells at the end of the world.
This is called a bhikkhu who, having come to the end of the world, dwells at the end of the world.
This is called a bhikkhu who, having come to the end of the world, dwells at the end of the world.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who dwells in balance amid an unbalanced population, who dwells unafflicted amid an afflicted population.
This is called a noble disciple who observes the uposatha of Brahmā, who dwells together with Brahmā, and it is by considering Brahmā that his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
This is called a noble disciple who observes the uposatha of the deities, who dwells together with the deities, and it is by considering the deities that his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
This is called a noble disciple who observes the uposatha of the Dhamma, who dwells together with the Dhamma, and it is by considering the Dhamma that his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
This is called a noble disciple who observes the uposatha of the Saṅgha, who dwells together with the Saṅgha, and it is by considering the Saṅgha that his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
This is called a noble disciple who observes the uposatha of virtuous behavior, who dwells together with virtuous behavior, and it is by considering virtuous behavior that his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
This is called a person fettered externally, who is a non-returner, one who does not return to this state of being.”
This is called accomplishment in activity.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
This is called accomplishment in initiative.
This is called accomplishment in initiative.
This is called accomplishment in livelihood.
This is called accomplishment in mind.
This is called accomplishment in virtuous behavior.
This is called accomplishment in virtuous behavior.
This is called accomplishment in virtuous behavior.
This is called accomplishment in virtuous behavior.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
This is called an instructed noble disciple who has drawn out the poisonous dart of sorrow pierced by which the uninstructed worldling only torments himself.
This is called an instructed noble disciple who has drawn out the poisonous dart of sorrow pierced by which the uninstructed worldling only torments himself.
This is called an uninstructed worldling pierced by the poisonous dart of sorrow who only torments himself.
This is called an uninstructed worldling pierced by the poisonous dart of sorrow who only torments himself.
This is called attainment of nibbāna through non-clinging.
This is called bad.
This is called bad.
This is called bad.
This is called bad.
This is called bodily purity.
This is called bodily purity.
This is called bodily sagacity.
This is called bright kamma with bright result.
This is called bright kamma with bright result.
This is called bright kamma with bright result.
This is called dark kamma with dark result.
This is called dark kamma with dark result.
This is called dark kamma with dark result.
This is called dark-and-bright kamma with dark-and-bright result.
This is called dark-andbright kamma with dark-and-bright result.
This is called decline by the Blessed One.’
This is called decline by the Blessed One.’
What four?
This is called failure in activity.
This is called failure in livelihood.
This is called failure in mind.
This is called failure in virtuous behavior.
This is called good friendship.
This is called good friendship.
This is called good.
This is called good.
This is called good.”
This is called good.”
This is called mental purity.
This is called mental purity.
This is called mental sagacity.
This is called non-decline by the Blessed One.’
What four?
This is called non-decline by the Blessed One.’”
This is called one of bad character.
This is called one of bad character.
This is called one of good character.
This is called one of good character.
This is called one of still better character.”
This is called one of still better character.”
This is called one of still worse character.
This is called one of still worse character.
This is called oneself as one’s authority.
This is called practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is painful with quick direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is painful with sluggish direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is pleasant with quick direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge.
This is called practice that is pleasant with sluggish direct knowledge.
This is called purity of liberation.
This is called purity of mind.
This is called purity of virtuous behavior.
This is called striving by abandonment.
This is called striving by abandonment.
This is called striving by development.
This is called striving by development.
This is called striving by protection.
This is called striving by protection.
This is called striving by restraint.
This is called striving by restraint.
This is called the assembly of the foremost.
This is called the assembly of the foremost.
This is called the assembly of the inferior.
This is called the assembly that values the good Dhamma, not worldly things.
This is called the assembly that values worldly things, not the good Dhamma.
This is called the assembly trained in interrogation, not in vain talk.
This is called the assembly trained in vain talk, not in interrogation.
This is called the bad person.
This is called the bad person.
This is called the bad person.
This is called the bad person.
This is called the bad person.
This is called the blind person.
This is called the blistering way of practice.
This is called the bond of existence.
This is called the bond of ignorance.
This is called the bond of sensuality.
This is called the bond of views.
This is called the calming practice.
This is called the coarse way of practice.
This is called the concentration of a trainee.
This is called the corpse’s posture.
This is called the development of concentration that leads to dwelling happily in this very life.
This is called the Dhamma as one’s authority.
This is called the Dhamma not to be realized.
This is called the Dhamma not to be realized.
This is called the Dhamma that results in happiness.”
This is called the Dhamma that results in happiness.” 
This is called the Dhamma that results in suffering.
This is called the Dhamma that results in suffering.
This is called the Dhamma to be realized.”
This is called the Dhamma to be realized.”
This is called the diversity of feelings.
This is called the diversity of kamma.
This is called the diversity of perceptions.
This is called the diversity of sensual pleasures.
This is called the diversity of suffering.
This is called the diversity of the taints.
This is called the fault pertaining to the future life.
This is called the fault pertaining to the present life.
This is called the good person.
This is called the good person.
This is called the good person.
This is called the good person.
This is called the good person.
This is called the good person.
This is called the happiness of blamelessness.
This is called the happiness of enjoyment.
This is called the happiness of freedom from debt.
This is called the happiness of ownership.
This is called the ignoble path.
This is called the ignoble path.
This is called the impatient practice.
This is called the impatient practice.
This is called the lion’s posture.
This is called the middle way of practice.
This is called the middle way of practice.
This is called the noble paccorohaṇī festival.”
This is called the noble paccorohaṇī festival.”
This is called the noble path.”
This is called the noble path.”
This is called the noble truth of suffering.
This is called the noble truth of the cessation of suffering.
This is called the noble truth of the origin of suffering.
This is called the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
This is called the one-eyed person.
This is called the patient practice.
This is called the patient practice.
This is called the perception of abandoning.
This is called the perception of danger.
This is called the perception of impermanence in all conditioned phenomena.
This is called the perception of impermanence.
This is called the perception of non-delight in the entire world.
This is called the perception of non-self.
This is called the perception of unattractiveness.
This is called the peril of a bad destination.
This is called the peril of crocodiles.
This is called the peril of fierce fish.
This is called the peril of punishment.
This is called the peril of reproach by others.
This is called the peril of self-reproach.
This is called the peril of waves.
This is called the peril of whirlpools.
This is called the person fettered externally, who is a non-returner, one who does not return to this state of being.
This is called the person fettered internally, who is a returner, one who returns to this state of being.
This is called the person inferior to the bad person.
This is called the person inferior to the bad person.
This is called the person inferior to the bad person.
This is called the person inferior to the bad person.
This is called the person inferior to the bad person.
This is called the person superior to the good person.”
This is called the person superior to the good person.”
This is called the person superior to the good person.”
This is called the person superior to the good person.”
This is called the person superior to the good person.”
This is called the person superior to the good person.” 
This is called the person who goes against the stream.
This is called the person who goes along with the stream.
This is called the person who has crossed over and gone beyond, the brahmin who stands on high ground.
This is called the person who has overcome expectation.
This is called the person who has overcome expectation.
This is called the person who is easily measured.
This is called the person who is hard to measure.
This is called the person who is immeasurable.
This is called the person who is inwardly firm.
This is called the person who is like a line etched in stone.
This is called the person who is like a line etched in the ground.
This is called the person who is like a line etched in water.
This is called the person whose speech is like dung.
This is called the person whose speech is like flowers.
This is called the person with inverted wisdom.
This is called the person with lap-like wisdom.
This is called the person with wide wisdom.
This is called the power of blamelessness.
This is called the power of concentration.
This is called the power of concentration.
This is called the power of development.
This is called the power of development.
This is called the power of development.
This is called the power of energy.
This is called the power of energy.
This is called the power of energy.
This is called the power of energy.
This is called the power of mindfulness.
This is called the power of mindfulness.
This is called the power of moral dread.
This is called the power of moral dread.
This is called the power of moral shame.
This is called the power of moral shame.
This is called the power of reflection.
This is called the power of reflection.
This is called the power of reflection.
This is called the power of sustaining a favorable relationship.
This is called the power of wisdom.
This is called the power of wisdom.
This is called the power of wisdom.
This is called the power of wisdom.
This is called the result of feelings.
This is called the result of kamma.
This is called the result of sensual pleasures.
This is called the result of suffering.
This is called the result of the taints.
This is called the sensualist’s posture.
This is called the severance of the bond of existence.
This is called the severance of the bond of ignorance.
This is called the severance of the bond of sensuality.
This is called the severance of the bond of views.
This is called the taming practice.
This is called the Tathāgata’s posture.
This is called the training in the higher mind.
This is called the training in the higher mind.
This is called the training in the higher virtuous behavior.
This is called the training in the higher virtuous behavior.
This is called the two-eyed person.
This is called the unsurpassed gain.
This is called the unsurpassed hearing.
This is called the unsurpassed recollection.
This is called the unsurpassed service.
This is called the unsurpassed sight.
This is called the unsurpassed training.
This is called the virtuous behavior of a trainee.
This is called the wealth of generosity.
This is called the wealth of generosity.
This is called the wealth of learning.
This is called the wealth of moral dread.
This is called the wealth of moral shame.
This is called the wealth of virtuous behavior.
This is called the wealth of virtuous behavior.
This is called the wealth of wisdom.
This is called the wealth of wisdom.
This is called the wonder of mind-reading.
This is called the wonder of psychic potency.
This is called the world as one’s authority.
This is called verbal purity.
This is called verbal purity.
This is called verbal sagacity.
This is called what is better than that good.”
This is called what is better than that good.”
This is called what is worse than that bad.
This is called what is worse than that bad.
This is declared to be the escape from form.
This is declared to be the escape from harming.
This is declared to be the escape from ill will.
This is declared to be the escape from personal existence.
This is declared to be the escape from sensual pleasures.
This is for the harm of many people, for the unhappiness of many people, for the ruin, harm, and suffering of many people, of devas and human beings.
This is for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, for the good, welfare, and happiness of many people, of devas and human beings.”
This is how a person attains nibbāna through exertion in this very life.
This is how a person attains nibbāna through exertion with the breakup of the body.
This is how a person attains nibbāna without exertion in this very life.
This is how a person attains nibbāna without exertion with the breakup of the body.
This is how women are double-tongued: for the most part they utter divisive speech.
This is how women betray friends: for the most part they are adulterous.
This is like the head-anointed khattiya king’s being powerful.
This is like the head-anointed khattiya king’s being rich, with great wealth and property, with full treasuries and storerooms.
This is like the head-anointed khattiya king’s being well born.
This is like the head-anointed khattiya king’s having a good counselor.
This is not proper, Master Gotama.’
This is not proper, Master Gotama.”
This is not proper, Master Gotama.”
This is not proper, Master Kaccāna.”
This is now the time for the Blessed One to consent.
This is now the time for the Blessed One to consent.
This is now the time for the Blessed One to consent.
This is one reason I show such supreme honor toward the Blessed One and display such an offering of loving-kindness to him.
This is one subject to death who is frightened and terrified of death.
This is one subject to death who is not frightened and terrified of death.
This is our instruction to you.”
This is our instruction to you.” 
This is our instruction to you.” 
This is that celestial high and luxurious bed that at present I can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty.”
This is that divine high and luxurious bed that at present I can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty.” 
This is that noble high and luxurious bed that at present I can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty.”
This is that one person arising in the world who is … the foremost of bipeds.”
This is that one person who arises in the world for the harm of many people, the unhappiness of many people, for the ruin, harm, and suffering of many people, of devas and human beings.”
This is that one person who arises in the world for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, for the good, welfare, and happiness of many people, of devas and human beings.”
This is that one person who arises in the world … for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and human beings.”
This is that one person whose manifestation is the manifestation of great vision … the realization of the fruit of arahantship.”
This is that one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads exclusively to disenchantment … to nibbāna.”
This is that one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads exclusively to disenchantment … to nibbāna.”
This is the blow in his case.
This is the cause and condition for the doing of bad kamma, for the occurrence of bad kamma.”
This is the cause and condition for the doing of good kamma, for the occurrence of good kamma.
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma continues long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.”
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma continues long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.” 
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma continues long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.” 
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma does not continue long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma does not continue long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.”
This is the cause and reason why the good Dhamma does not continue long after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna.”
This is the cloud of dust in his case.
This is the development of concentration that leads to mindfulness and clear comprehension.
This is the development of concentration that leads to obtaining knowledge and vision.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling, that is, when there is future destination and rebirth.
This is the eighth abode of beings.
This is the eighth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the eighth astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean because of which they take delight in it.
This is the eighth astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean because of which they take delight in it.
This is the eighth astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline because of which they take delight in it.
This is the eighth astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline because of which they take delight in it.
This is the eighth cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the eighth emancipation.
This is the eighth fault of a horse.
This is the eighth fault of a person.
This is the eighth ground for arousing energy.
This is the eighth ground for laziness.
This is the eighth inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the eighth person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell … the lower world.
This is the eighth stream of merit … that leads to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to one’s welfare and happiness.
This is the fifth abode of beings.
This is the fifth ancient brahmin practice that is now seen among dogs but not among brahmins.
This is the fifth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the fifth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the fifth astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the fifth astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the fifth basis of liberation, by means of which, if a bhikkhu dwells heedful, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind is liberated, his undestroyed taints are utterly destroyed, and he reaches the as-yet-unreached unsurpassed security from bondage.
This is the fifth benefit in timely listening to the Dhamma, in timely discussion on the Dhamma.”
This is the fifth benefit of listening to the Dhamma at the proper time.
This is the fifth benefit….
This is the fifth cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the fifth cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the fifth danger in basing one’s confidence on a person.
This is the fifth danger….
This is the fifth development of noble five-factored right concentration.
This is the fifth emancipation.
This is the fifth fault of a horse.
This is the fifth fault of a person.
This is the fifth favorable occasion for striving.
This is the fifth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the fifth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the fifth gift, a great gift, primal, of long standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated and never before adulterated, which is not being adulterated and will not be adulterated, not repudiated by wise ascetics and brahmins.
This is the fifth ground for laziness.
This is the fifth inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the fifth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the fifth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the fifth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the fifth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the fifth kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the fifth kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the fifth obstacle to rain….
This is the fifth person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell … the lower world.
This is the fifth proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the fifth proximate cause for the development of the aids to enlightenment.’
This is the fifth station for consciousness.
This is the fifth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the fifth unfavorable occasion for striving.
This is the fifth utilization of wealth.
This is the first abode of beings.
This is the first ancient brahmin practice that is now seen among dogs but not among brahmins.
This is the first ascetic.
This is the first astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the first astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the first astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean because of which they take delight in it.
This is the first astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean because of which they take delight in it….
This is the first astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline because of which they take delight in it.
This is the first astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline because of which they take delight in it….
This is the first astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
This is the first basis of liberation, by means of which, if a bhikkhu dwells heedful, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind is liberated, his undestroyed taints are utterly destroyed, and he reaches the as-yet-unreached unsurpassed security from bondage.
This is the first benefit for a virtuous person because of his accomplishment in virtuous behavior.
This is the first benefit in timely listening to the Dhamma, in timely discussion on the Dhamma.
This is the first benefit of listening to the Dhamma at the proper time.
This is the first benefit to be expected when one has followed the teachings by ear, recited them verbally, examined them with the mind, and penetrated them well by view.
This is the first case of wealth that has gone to good use, that has been properly utilized and used for a worthy cause.
This is the first cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the first cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life when it has not been obtained and to its increase, maturation, and fulfillment by development after it has been obtained.
This is the first danger for an immoral person because of his deficiency in virtuous behavior.
This is the first danger in basing one’s confidence on a person.
This is the first defilement of ascetics and brahmins because of which some ascetics and brahmins do not shine, blaze, and radiate.
This is the first development of noble five-factored right concentration.
This is the first emancipation.
This is the first fault of a horse.
This is the first fault of a person.
This is the first favorable occasion for striving.
This is the first future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the first future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the first gift, a great gift, primal, of long standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated and never before adulterated, which is not being adulterated and will not be adulterated, not repudiated by wise ascetics and brahmins.
This is the first ground for arousing energy.
This is the first ground for laziness.
This is the first inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the first kind of excellent thoroughbred horse found existing in the world.
This is the first kind of excellent thoroughbred person found existing in the world.
This is the first kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the first kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the first kind of person worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
This is the first kind of person worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
This is the first kind of person worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
This is the first kind of person worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
This is the first kind of person worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
This is the first kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the first kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the first obstacle to rain that the forecasters do not know about, where their eyes do not tread.
This is the first peril that separates mother and son of which the uninstructed worldling speaks.
This is the first peril when mother and son reconnect that the uninstructed worldling speaks of as a peril that separates mother and son.
This is the first person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell, the animal realm, and the sphere of afflicted spirits; freed from the plane of misery, the bad destination, the lower world.
This is the first proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the first proximate cause for the development of the aids to enlightenment.
This is the first station for consciousness.
This is the first stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, nutriment of happiness—heavenly, ripening in happiness, conducive to heaven—that leads to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to one’s welfare and happiness.
This is the first thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the first thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the first thing that leads to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the first thing that leads to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the first unfavorable occasion for striving.
This is the first utilization of wealth.
This is the Fortunate One.
This is the Fortunate One’s discipline.
This is the fourth abode of beings.
This is the fourth ancient brahmin practice that is now seen among dogs but not among brahmins.
This is the fourth ascetic.
This is the fourth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the fourth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the fourth astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the fourth astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the fourth astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
This is the fourth basis of liberation, by means of which, if a bhikkhu dwells heedful, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind is liberated, his undestroyed taints are utterly destroyed, and he reaches the as-yet-unreached unsurpassed security from bondage.
This is the fourth benefit of listening to the Dhamma at the proper time.
This is the fourth benefit to be expected when one has followed the teachings by ear, recited them verbally, examined them with the mind, and penetrated them well by view.
This is the fourth benefit….
This is the fourth case of wealth that has gone to good use, that has been properly employed and used for a worthy cause.
This is the fourth cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the fourth cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the fourth danger….
This is the fourth defilement of ascetics and brahmins because of which some ascetics and brahmins do not shine, blaze, and radiate.
This is the fourth development of noble five-factored right concentration.
This is the fourth emancipation.
This is the fourth fault of a horse.
This is the fourth fault of a person.
This is the fourth favorable occasion for striving.
This is the fourth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the fourth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the fourth ground for laziness.
This is the fourth inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the fourth kind of excellent thoroughbred horse found existing in the world.
This is the fourth kind of excellent thoroughbred person found existing in the world.
This is the fourth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the fourth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the fourth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the fourth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the fourth kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the fourth kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the fourth obstacle to rain….
This is the fourth pleasant visible dwelling that pertains to the higher mind, which he has achieved for the purification of the impure mind, for the cleansing of the unclean mind.
This is the fourth proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the fourth proximate cause….
This is the fourth station for consciousness.
This is the fourth stream of merit … that leads to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to one’s welfare and happiness.
This is the fourth stream of merit….
This is the fourth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the fourth unfavorable occasion for striving.
This is the fourth utilization of wealth.
This is the majesty of the pāricchattaka coral tree.
This is the method by which you can sustain a large retinue.
This is the ninth abode of beings.
This is the ninth factor it possesses.
This is the ninth person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell, the animal realm, and the sphere of afflicted spirits; freed from the plane of misery, the bad destination, the lower world.
This is the one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads to differentiation by wisdom … leads to nibbāna through non-clinging.”
This is the one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads to penetrativeness of wisdom.”
This is the one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads to realization of the fruit of knowledge and liberation.”
This is the one thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads to realization of the fruit of stream-entry … to realization of the fruit of once-returning … to realization of the fruit of non-returning … to realization of the fruit of arahantship.”
This is the path and way that leads to the abandoning and overcoming of these three perils when mother and son reconnect and of these three perils that separate mother and son.”
This is the path of the great beings,the path followed by the great seers.Those who practice itas taught by the Buddha,acting upon the Teacher’s guidance,will make an end of suffering.
This is the path, the way to the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion.”
This is the person inferior to the bad person.
This is the person whose speech is like honey.
This is the reason why sometimes even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited.”
This is the second abode of beings.
This is the second ancient brahmin practice that is now seen among dogs but not among brahmins.
This is the second ascetic.
This is the second astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the second astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the second astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the second astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the second astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
This is the second basis of liberation, by means of which, if a bhikkhu dwells heedful, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind is liberated, his undestroyed taints are utterly destroyed, and he reaches the as-yet-unreached unsurpassed security from bondage.
This is the second benefit in timely listening to the Dhamma, in timely discussion on the Dhamma.
This is the second benefit of listening to the Dhamma at the proper time.
This is the second benefit to be expected when one has followed the teachings by ear, recited them verbally, examined them with the mind, and penetrated them well by view.
This is the second benefit….
This is the second case of wealth that has gone to good use … for a worthy cause.
This is the second cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the second cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the second danger in basing one’s confidence on a person.
This is the second danger….
This is the second defilement of ascetics and brahmins because of which some ascetics and brahmins do not shine, blaze, and radiate.
This is the second development of noble five-factored right concentration.
This is the second emancipation.
This is the second fault of a horse.
This is the second fault of a person.
This is the second favorable occasion for striving.
This is the second future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the second future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the second ground for laziness.
This is the second inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the second kind of excellent thoroughbred horse found existing in the world.
This is the second kind of excellent thoroughbred person found existing in the world.
This is the second kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the second kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the second kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the second kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the second kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the second kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the second obstacle to rain….
This is the second peril that separates mother and son of which the uninstructed worldling speaks.
This is the second peril when mother and son reconnect that the uninstructed worldling speaks of as a peril that separates mother and son.
This is the second proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the second proximate cause….
This is the second station for consciousness.
This is the second stream of merit … that leads to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to one’s welfare and happiness.
This is the second thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the second thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the second thing that leads to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the second thing that leads to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the second unfavorable occasion for striving.
This is the second utilization of wealth.
This is the seventh abode of beings.
This is the seventh astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the seventh astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the seventh astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the seventh astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the seventh cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the seventh cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the seventh emancipation.
This is the seventh fault of a horse.
This is the seventh fault of a person.
This is the seventh ground for laziness.
This is the seventh inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the seventh kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the seventh kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the seventh person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell … the lower world.
This is the seventh station for consciousness.
This is the seventh thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the sixth abode of beings.
This is the sixth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the sixth astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the sixth astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the sixth astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the sixth benefit of examining the meaning at the proper time.
This is the sixth cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the sixth cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the sixth emancipation.
This is the sixth fault of a horse.
This is the sixth fault of a person.
This is the sixth ground for laziness.
This is the sixth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the sixth kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the sixth person, passing away with a residue remaining, who is freed from hell … the lower world.
This is the sixth proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the sixth proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.’
This is the sixth station for consciousness.
This is the sixth thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the spiritual majesty of a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed.”
This is the supreme knowledge;this is unsurpassed happiness.Sorrowless, dust-free, and secure,this is the highest freedom from debt.
This is the tenth danger in entering the king’s inner palace.
This is the third abode of beings.
This is the third ancient brahmin practice that is now seen among dogs but not among brahmins.
This is the third ascetic.
This is the third astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the third astounding and amazing quality found in me.
This is the third astounding and amazing quality that the asuras see in the great ocean….
This is the third astounding and amazing quality that the bhikkhus see in this Dhamma and discipline….
This is the third astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
This is the third basis of liberation, by means of which, if a bhikkhu dwells heedful, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind is liberated, his undestroyed taints are utterly destroyed, and he reaches the as-yet-unreached unsurpassed security from bondage.
This is the third benefit in timely listening to the Dhamma, in timely discussion on the Dhamma.
This is the third benefit of examining the meaning at the proper time.
This is the third benefit to be expected when one has followed the teachings by ear, recited them verbally, examined them with the mind, and penetrated them well by view.
This is the third benefit….
This is the third case of wealth that has gone to good use … for a worthy cause.
This is the third cause and condition for a powerful earthquake.
This is the third cause and condition that leads to obtaining the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life….
This is the third danger….
This is the third defilement of ascetics and brahmins because of which some ascetics and brahmins do not shine, blaze, and radiate.
This is the third development of noble five-factored right concentration.
This is the third fault of a horse.
This is the third fault of a person.
This is the third favorable occasion for striving.
This is the third future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the third future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
This is the third ground for laziness.
This is the third inopportune moment that is not the right occasion for living the spiritual life.
This is the third kind of excellent thoroughbred horse found existing in the world.
This is the third kind of excellent thoroughbred person found existing in the world.
This is the third kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the third kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
This is the third kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the third kind of person worthy of gifts….
This is the third kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the third kind of warrior found in the world.
This is the third obstacle to rain….
This is the third peril that separates mother and son of which the uninstructed worldling speaks.
This is the third peril when mother and son reconnect that the uninstructed worldling speaks of as a peril that separates mother and son.
This is the third proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
This is the third proximate cause….
This is the third station for consciousness.
This is the third stream of merit … that leads to what is wished for, desired, and agreeable, to one’s welfare and happiness.
This is the third thing gratifying and advantageous to an enemy that comes upon an angry man or woman.
This is the third thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
This is the third thing that leads to the decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the third thing that leads to the non-decline of a bhikkhu who is a trainee.
This is the third unfavorable occasion for striving.
This is the third utilization of wealth.
This is the time for it, Fortunate One!
This is the time for it, Fortunate One!
This is the uproar in his case.
This is what is said to be non-Dhamma and harmful.
This is what is said to be non-Dhamma and harmful.
This is what is said to be the Dhamma and beneficial.
This is what is said to be the Dhamma and beneficial.
This is what that deity said.
This is what that deity said.
This is what that deity said.
This is what that deity said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Blessed One said.
This is what the Venerable Khema said.
This is what the Venerable Sumana said.
This is what the Venerable Ānanda said.
This is what those deities said.
This is why some are beautiful, attractive, and graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion; rich, with great wealth and property; and influential.”
This is why some are ugly, ill formed, and unsightly; but rich, with great wealth and property; and influential.
This is why some women here are beautiful, attractive, and graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion; but poor, destitute, and indigent; and lacking in influence.
This is why women do not sit in council, engage in business, or go to Kamboja.”
This is yet another reason why at present the number of people has declined, depopulation is seen, and villages, towns, cities, and districts have vanished.”
This mode of practice is declared to be inferior for both reasons.
This mode of practice is declared to be superior for both reasons.
This noble disciple dwells with a mind entirely like space: vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity and ill will.
This noble disciple dwells with a mind entirely like space: vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity and ill will.
This noble disciple whose mind is in this way without enmity, without ill will, undefiled, and pure, has won four assurances in this very life.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be criticized on these three grounds.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be criticized on these two grounds and praised on this one ground.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be criticized on this one ground and praised on these two grounds.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on these four grounds.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on these three grounds and criticized on this one ground.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on these three grounds and criticized on this one ground.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on these two grounds and criticized on these two grounds.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on these two grounds and criticized on this one ground.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on this one ground and criticized on these three grounds.
This one enjoying sensual pleasures may be praised on this one ground and criticized on these two grounds.
This person does not inflict suffering upon another under a false pretext—by killing, imprisonment, confiscation, censure, or banishment—thinking: ‘I am powerful, I want power.’
Thus when spoken to in accordance with fact, he admits; he does not despise.
This person has abandoned the lower fetters and the fetters for obtaining rebirth but not the fetters for obtaining existence.
This person has abandoned the lower fetters but not the fetters for obtaining rebirth or the fetters for obtaining existence.
This person has not abandoned the lower fetters, the fetters for obtaining rebirth, or the fetters for obtaining existence.
This person inflicts suffering upon another under a false pretext—by killing, imprisonment, confiscation, censure, or banishment—thinking: ‘I am powerful, I want power.’
Thus when spoken to in accordance with fact, he despises; he does not admit.
This person is helpful to the other person.
This person is helpful to the other person.
This person is said to have a mind like a diamond.
This person is said to have a mind like an open sore.
This person of the best intentions,his mind undivided, retains.Practicing in accordance with the Dhamma,he can make an end of suffering.
This person possesses exclusively black, unwholesome qualities.
This person possesses exclusively black, unwholesome qualities.
This person possesses exclusively bright, blameless qualities.
This person possesses exclusively bright, blameless qualities.
This person should be banished.
This person, I say, is just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle, and whose foes slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle.
This person, I say, is just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, enters the fray of battle, is wounded by his foes while he strives and exerts himself in the battle, and is then carried off and brought to his relatives but dies along the way even before he arrives.
This person, I say, is just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, enters the fray of battle, is wounded by his foes while he strives and exerts himself in the battle, and is then carried off and brought to his relatives, who nurse him and look after him, but who dies from that injury.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts….
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This principle, too, should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and should not be transgressed as long as life lasts.
This quality is found in me.’
If I know: ‘There is no such quality in me,’ I tell him: ‘It doesn’t exist.
This quality isn’t found in me.’
This seat has been prepared.”
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna sat down on the prepared seat.
This seat has been prepared.”
The Venerable Mahāmoggallāna sat down on the prepared seat.
This second great dream appeared to him that his awakening.
This should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Having seen this thus as it really is with correct wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the air element; one detaches the mind from the air element.
This should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Having seen this thus as it really is with correct wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the earth element; one detaches the mind from the earth element.
This should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Having seen this thus as it really is with correct wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the fire element; one detaches the mind from the fire element.
This should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Having seen this thus as it really is with correct wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the water element; one detaches the mind from the water element.
This subject of recollection, developed and cultivated in this way, leads to mindfulness and clear comprehension.”
This subject of recollection, developed and cultivated in this way, leads to obtaining knowledge and vision.
This subject of recollection, developed and cultivated in this way, leads to the penetration of numerous elements.
This third great dream appeared to him that his awakening.
This too is a directly visible fruit of giving.
This venerable one does not speak about matters that are deep, peaceful, sublime, beyond the sphere of reasoning, subtle, comprehensible to the wise.
This venerable one does not understand in such a way that he would have no hatred … no delusion … no anger … no hostility … no denigration … no insolence … no miserliness … no evil envy … no evil desire; thus evil desire overcomes him and continues on.’
This venerable one does not understand in such a way that he would have no hatred … no delusion … no anger … no hostility … no denigration … no insolence … no miserliness … no evil envy … no evil desire; thus evil desire overcomes him and persists.’
This venerable one does not understand in such a way that he would have no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire overcomes him and persists.’
This venerable one does not understand in such a way that he would have no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire overcomes him and persists.’
This venerable one does not understand in such a way that he would have no hatred … … no evil desire; thus evil desire overcomes him and persists.’ “Friends, making a declaration of knowledge, a bhikkhu says: ‘I know this Dhamma, I see this Dhamma.’
If greed does not overcome that bhikkhu and persist; if hatred … delusion … anger … hostility … denigration … insolence … miserliness … evil envy … evil desire does not overcome that bhikkhu and persist, he should be understood thus: ‘This venerable one understands in such a way that he has no greed; thus greed does not overcome him and persist.
This venerable one is immoral, not virtuous.’
This venerable one is immoral.
This venerable one is impure in his dealings with others, not pure in such dealings.’
This venerable one is pure in his dealings with others, not impure in such dealings.’
This venerable one is unwise, not wise.’
Just as if a man with good sight, standing on the bank of a pond, were to see a small fish emerging, he would think: ‘Judging from the way this fish emerges, from the ripples it makes, and from its force, this is a small fish, not a big one,’ so too, when conversing with a person, one comes to know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is unwise, not wise.’
This venerable one is virtuous, not immoral.’
This venerable one is wise, not unwise.’
Just as if a man with good sight, standing on the bank of a pond, were to see a big fish emerging, he would think: ‘Judging from the way this fish emerges, from the ripples it makes, and from its force, this is a big fish, not a small one,’ so too, when conversing with someone, one comes to know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is wise, not unwise.’
This venerable one speaks about matters that are deep, peaceful, sublime, beyond the sphere of reasoning, subtle, comprehensible to the wise.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one surely knows and sees.’
This quality, too, leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
This venerable one understands in such a way that he has no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire does not overcome him and persist.’
This venerable one understands in such a way that he has no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire does not overcome him and persist.’
This venerable one understands in such a way that he has no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire does not overcome him and persist.’
This venerable one understands in such a way that he has no hatred … no evil desire; thus evil desire does not overcome him and persist.’” 
This venerable one understands in such a way that he would have no hatred … no delusion … no anger … no hostility … no denigration … no insolence … no miserliness … no evil envy … no evil desire; thus evil desire does not overcome him and continue on.’”
This was my first legitimate refutation of those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view.
This was my second legitimate refutation of those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view.
This was my third legitimate refutation of those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view.
This was the fifth great dream that appeared to the Tathāgata … while he was just a bodhisatta, not fully enlightened.
This was the first great dream that appeared to the Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One before his enlightenment, while he was just a bodhisatta, not fully enlightened.
This was the fourth great dream that appeared to the Tathāgata … while he was just a bodhisatta, not fully enlightened.
This was the second great dream that appeared to the Tathāgata … while he was just a bodhisatta, not fully enlightened.
This was the third great dream that appeared to the Tathāgata … while he was just a bodhisatta, not fully enlightened.
This will lead to his harm and suffering for a long time.
This wonder seems to me like a magical trick.
This wonder, too, seems to me like a magical trick.
This world, sir, which has kamma as its substance, continues through the undertaking of kamma.’”
This, Bhante, is a subject of recollection.”
This, bhikkhus, is called the righteous assembly.
This, bhikkhus, is called the unrighteous assembly.
This, bhikkhus, is the one unique opportune moment that is the right occasion for living the spiritual life.”
This, brahmin, was my first breaking out, like that of the chick breaking out of the eggshell.
This, brahmin, was my second breaking out, like that of the chick breaking out of the eggshell.
This, brahmin, was my third breaking out, like that of the chick breaking out of the eggshell.”
This, friend, is what one has not known, seen, attained, realized, and penetrated, and it is for the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, and penetrating this that one lives the spiritual life under the Blessed One.”
This, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion arises and arisen delusion increases and expands.’
This, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion does not arise and arisen delusion is abandoned.’”
This, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred arises and arisen hatred increases and expands.’
This, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred does not arise and arisen hatred is abandoned.’
This, friends, is the reason unarisen lust arises and arisen lust increases and expands.’
This, friends, is the reason unarisen lust does not arise and arisen lust is abandoned.’
This, I say, counts as his being of great value.
This, I say, counts as his being of little value.
This, I say, counts as his comfortableness.
This, I say, counts as his uncomfortableness.
This, I say, is a standstill rather than deterioration or growth in wholesome qualities.
This, I say, is deterioration rather than a standstill or growth in wholesome qualities.
This, I say, is false speech.
This, I say, is growth rather than a standstill or deterioration in wholesome qualities.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his beauty.
This, I say, is his getting into debt.
This, I say, is his lack of beauty.
This, I say, is his lack of beauty.
This, I say, is his lack of beauty.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his lack of the right proportions.
This, I say, is his prosecution.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his right proportions.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is his speed.
This, I say, is how he is an abode of wild.
This, I say, is how he is dangerous.
This, I say, is how he is foul-smelling.
This, I say, is how he is impure.
This, I say, is taking what has not been given.
This, Kesi, is the gentle method: ‘Such is bodily good conduct, such the result of bodily good conduct; such is verbal good conduct, such the result of verbal good conduct; such is mental good conduct, such the result of mental good conduct; such are the devas, such are human beings.’
This is the stern method: ‘Such is bodily misconduct, such the result of bodily misconduct; such is verbal misconduct, such the result of verbal misconduct; such is mental misconduct, such the result of mental misconduct; such is hell, such the animal realm, such the sphere of afflicted spirits.’
This is the gentle and stern method: ‘Such is bodily good conduct, such the result of bodily good conduct; such is bodily misconduct, such the result of bodily misconduct.
This, too, is a breach, flaw, blemish, and blotch of the celibate life.
This, too, is a directly visible fruit of giving.
This, too, is a directly visible fruit of giving.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.
This, too, is a manifestation of faith in one endowed with faith.”
This, too, is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect….
This, too, is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect….
This, too, is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect….
This, too, is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect….
This, too, is a principle of cordiality that creates affection and respect….
This, too, is a principle of cordiality.
This, too, is a principle of cordiality.
This, too, is a principle of cordiality.
This, too, is a principle of cordiality.
This, too, is a principle of cordiality.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a quality that serves as a protector.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.
This, too, is a wrong occasion, when the gift is not of benefit to one living there.
This, too, is one subject to death who is frightened and terrified of death.
This, too, is one subject to death who is frightened and terrified of death.
This, too, is one subject to death who is frightened and terrified of death.
This, too, is one subject to death who is not frightened and terrified of death.
This, too, is one subject to death who is not frightened and terrified of death.
This, too, is one subject to death who is not frightened and terrified of death.
This, Upāli, is why arguments, quarrels, contention, and disputes arise in the Saṅgha and bhikkhus do not dwell at ease.”
Those ancient seers described these five kinds of brahmins: the one similar to Brahmā, the one similar to a deva, the one who remains within the boundary, the one who has crossed the boundary, and the caṇḍāḷa of a brahmin as the fifth.
Those ancient seers described these five kinds of brahmins: the one similar to Brahmā, the one similar to a deva, the one who remains within the boundary, the one who has crossed the boundary, and the caṇḍāḷa of a brahmin as the fifth.
Those are the three qualities that lead to decline.
Those ascetics and brahmins who refrain from intoxication and heedlessness, who are settled in patience and mildness, who tame themselves, calm themselves, and train themselves for nibbāna are called the fire of those worthy of offerings.
Those beings are thoroughly bound who are bound by touch.”
Those beings are thoroughly bound who are bound by touch.”
Those beings who engage in good conduct by body, speech, and mind in the afternoon have a good afternoon.
Those beings who have been reborn there perceive one another by this radiance and say: ‘Indeed, it seems there are other beings who have been reborn here.’
This is the first astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
Those beings who have been reborn there perceive one another by this radiance and say: ‘Indeed, it seems there are other beings who have been reborn here.’
This is the fourth astounding and amazing thing that becomes manifest with the manifestation of a Tathāgata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
Those beings, like oneself,each hold their self most dear;yet those who are angry kill themselves in various wayswhen they are distraught about diverse matters.
Those bhikkhus with whom I dwell usually behave toward me in agreeable ways by body, speech, and mind, seldom in disagreeable ways.
Those bhikkhus with whom I dwell usually behave toward me in agreeable ways by body, speech, and mind, seldom in disagreeable ways.
Those devas know him thus: ‘Through non-attention to all marks, this venerable one enters and dwells in the markless mental concentration.
Those devas of Brahmā’s company who are content with a brahmā’s life span, a brahmā’s beauty, a brahmā’s happiness, a brahmā’s glory, a brahmā’s authority, and who do not understand as it really is an escape higher than this, do not have such knowledge.
Those families dwell with the first deities where at home the mother and father are revered by their children.
Those families dwell with the first teachers where at home the mother and father are revered by their children.
Those families dwell with the first teachers where at home the mother and father are revered by their children.
Those families dwell with the gift-worthy where at home the mother and father are revered by their children.
Those families dwell with the gift-worthy where at home the mother and father are revered by their children.
Those great disciples spoke rightly when they said that I have called noise a thorn to the jhānas.
Those in the next generation will follow their example.
Those in the world who have removed the coverings,transcenders of time and destination,the Buddhas who are proficient in sacrifice,praise this kind of sacrifice.
Those people uncontrolled in sensual pleasures,who are unrighteous, not revering the Dhamma,gone through desire, hate, and fearare called a stained assembly.Such is said by the Ascetic who knows.
Those people who are uncontrolled in sense pleasures,not rid of lust, enjoying sense pleasures here,repeatedly coming back to birth and old age,immersed in craving, are “the ones who go along with the stream.”
Those possessed of discernment,seeing that virtuous man’s good conduct,his generosity and good deeds,emulate his example.
Those possessed of discernment,seeing that virtuous man’s good conduct,his generosity and good deeds,emulate his example.
Those qualities of his do not deteriorate or increase.
Those qualities of his do not remain the same or deteriorate.
Those qualities of his do not remain the same or increase.
Those recollecting such generositydwell in the world inspired by joy.Having removed the stain of miserliness and its root,blameless, they go to the heavenly abode.
Those royal sages who conquered the earthwith its multitudes of beingstraveled around performing sacrifices:the horse sacrifice, the person sacrifice,sammāpāsa, vājapeyya, niraggaḷa.
Those swept up by the flood of sensuality,who do not fully understand sense pleasures,are plunged headlong into saṃsāra, time,destination, and existence upon existence.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who does not avoid do not arise in one who avoids them.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who does not develop do not arise in one who develops them.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who does not dispel do not arise in one who dispels them.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who does not make use do not arise in one who uses them.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who does not patiently endure do not arise in one who patiently endures them.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who dwells unrestrained do not occur in one who dwells restrained.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who dwells unrestrained over the eye faculty do not occur in one who dwells restrained over the eye faculty.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who dwells unrestrained over the mind faculty do not occur in one who dwells restrained over the mind faculty.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who has not overcome arisen gain do not occur in one who has overcome it.
Those taints, distressful and feverish, that might arise in one who has not overcome arisen loss … arisen fame … arisen disrepute … arisen honor … arisen lack of honor … arisen evil desires … arisen bad friendship do not occur in one who has overcome it.
Those taints, distressing and feverish, that might arise because of bodily undertakings do not occur when one refrains from them.
Those taints, distressing and feverish, that might arise because of mental undertakings do not occur when one refrains from them.
Those taints, distressing and feverish, that might arise because of verbal undertakings do not occur when one refrains from them.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning … he has penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning … with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated mentally, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, investigated with the mind, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those teachings that are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, which proclaim the perfectly complete and pure spiritual life—such teachings as these he has learned much of, retained in mind, recited verbally, mentally investigated, and penetrated well by view.
Those wanderers then said to them:
Those who are deceivers, stubborn, talkers,imposters, haughty, unconcentrated,do not make progress in the Dhammathat the Perfectly Enlightened One has taught.
Those who are upset by this think: ‘The king has close ties with the monk.
Those who are upset by this think: ‘The king has close ties with the monk.
Those who are upset by this think: ‘The king has close ties with the monk.
Those who are upset by this think: ‘The king has close ties with the monk.
Those who do not possess unwavering confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and who lack the virtuous behavior loved by the noble ones, do not have such knowledge.
Those who do not possess unwavering confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and who lack the virtuous behavior loved by the noble ones, do not have such knowledge.
Those who fulfill the virtuous behavior loved by the noble ones fulfill the foremost, and for those who fulfill the foremost, the result is foremost.”
Those who have confidence in the Buddha have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the Buddha have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the Dhamma have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the Dhamma, in dispassion, have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the noble eightfold path have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the noble eightfold path have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the Saṅgha have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have confidence in the Saṅgha have confidence in the foremost, and for those who have confidence in the foremost, the result is foremost.
Those who have practiced the path,proclaimed by the Tathāgata,have penetrated the right moment in the worldthe unsurpassed spiritual life.
Those who judge on the basis of formand those who follow because of speechhave come under the control of desire and lust;those people do not understand.
Those who live in holes enter their holes; those who live in the water enter the water; those who live in the woods enter the woods; and the birds resort to the sky.
Those who pass judgment on people harm themselves.
Those who pass judgment on people harm themselves.
Those who pass judgment on people harm themselves.
Those who pass judgment on people harm themselves.
Those who rejoice in such deedsor who provide servicedo not miss out on the offering;they too partake of the merit.
Those who speak with quarrelsome intent,settled in their opinions, swollen with pride,ignoble, having assailed virtues,look for openings one another.
Those who strive rightlyovercome the realm of Māra;they are unattached,gone beyond fear of birth and death.
Those who will be the Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones in the future—those Blessed Ones, too, will honor, respect, and dwell in dependence only on the Dhamma.
Those whose minds are rightly well developedin the enlightenment factors,who through non-clinging find delightin the relinquishment of grasping:luminous, with taints destroyed,they are the quenched ones in the world.
Those whose minds are rightly well developedin the enlightenment factors,who through non-clinging find delightin the relinquishment of grasping:luminous, with taints destroyed,they are the quenched ones in the world.
Those without confidence do not gain confidence; some of those with confidence change their minds; the teaching of the Teacher is not carried out; the next generation follow one’s example; and one’s own mind does not become placid.
Those without confidence gain confidence; those with confidence increase; the teaching of the Teacher is carried out; the next generation follow one’s example; and one’s own mind becomes placid.
Though he is devious, a speaker of lies,you should know him as he truly is;then you should all meet in harmonyand firmly drive him away.
Though he, ‘Let me do merit,’ he does demerit.
Though he, ‘Let me do what is wholesome,’ he does what is unwholesome.
Though he, ‘Let me do what is wholesome,’ he does what is unwholesome.
Though he, ‘Let me do what is wholesome,’ he does what is unwholesome.
Though he, ‘Let me seek the path to a good destination,’ he seeks the path to a bad destination.
Though he, ‘Let me seek the path to a good destination,’ he seeks the path to a bad destination.
Though he, ‘Let me seek the path to a good destination,’ he seeks the path to a bad destination.
Though his mind had not yet been liberated from the five lower fetters, when he heard that discourse on the Dhamma, his mind was liberated from them.
Though people had such long life spans and lived so long, and though their afflictions were so few, still, the teacher Araka gave his disciples such a teaching: ‘Brahmins, short is the life of human beings … for none who are born can escape death.’
Though warned by the divine messengers,those people who remain heedlesssorrow for a long time,having fared on to a lower realm.
Thought and examination are a thorn to the second jhāna.
Thoughts of renunciation, thoughts of good will, and thoughts of non-harming.
Thoughts of renunciation, thoughts of good will, and thoughts of non-harming.
Three months from now the Tathāgata will attain final nibbāna.”
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Three things are to be developed for abandoning these three things.
Through liberation one experiences those teachings in just the way that I have taught them to my disciples for the utterly complete destruction of suffering.
Through the destruction of feeling, all suffering will be worn away.
Through the destruction of suffering, feeling is destroyed.
Through the pursuit of unwholesome qualities and the non-pursuit of wholesome qualities, unarisen unwholesome qualities arise and arisen wholesome qualities decline.”
Through the pursuit of wholesome qualities and the non-pursuit of unwholesome qualities, unarisen wholesome qualities arise and arisen unwholesome qualities decline.”
Through what do they come into being?
Through what do they come into being?
Through which of these four modes of practice was your mind liberated from the taints by non-clinging?”
Through which of these four modes of practice was your mind liberated from the taints by non-clinging?” 
Thus a being is reborn from a being; one is reborn through one’s deeds.
Thus a being is reborn from a being; one is reborn through one’s deeds.
Thus a being is reborn from a being; one is reborn through one’s deeds.
Thus a being is reborn from a being; one is reborn through one’s deeds.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with altruistic joy, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with compassion, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he dwells pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to myself, I dwell pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with equanimity, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus above, below, across, and everywhere, and to all as to myself, I dwell pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, vast, exalted, measureless, without enmity, without ill will.
Thus death’s snare hidden in the hearthas taken the form of anger.One should cut it off by self-control,wisdom, energy, and view.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus have I heard.
Thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
Thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
Thus he is one who divides those who are united, a creator of divisions, one who enjoys factions, rejoices in factions, delights in factions, a speaker of words that create factions.
Thus he is one who divides those who are united, a creator of divisions, one who enjoys factions, rejoices in factions, delights in factions, a speaker of words that create factions.
Thus he is one who divides those who are united, a creator of divisions, one who enjoys factions, rejoices in factions, delights in factions, a speaker of words that create factions.
Thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of unity, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord.
Thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of unity, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord.
Thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of unity, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord.
Thus in such a variety of ways he dwells pursuing the practice of tormenting and mortifying the body.
Thus in such a variety of ways he dwells pursuing the practice of tormenting and mortifying the body.
Thus in this case I was the one who incurred a transgression, just as a traveler does when he evades the customs duty on his goods.’
It is in this way that the bhikkhu who has committed an offense thoroughly reflects upon himself.
Thus in this case I was the one who incurred a transgression, just as a traveler does when he evades the customs duty on his goods.’
It is in this way that the reproving bhikkhu thoroughly reflects upon himself.
Thus indeed they pay him homage,the great one free from diffidence.In this world together with its devas,there is no one who can rival you.
Thus involved with attraction and repulsion, he is not freed from birth, from old age and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, dejection, and anguish; he is not freed from suffering, I say.
Thus it is because of what has been done and what has not been done that some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Thus it is because of what has been done and what has not been done that some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
Thus numerous bad unwholesome qualities originate in him born of delusion, caused by delusion, arisen from delusion, conditioned by delusion.
Thus numerous bad unwholesome qualities originate in him born of greed, caused by greed, arisen from greed, conditioned by greed.
Thus numerous bad unwholesome qualities originate in him born of hatred, caused by hatred, arisen from hatred, conditioned by hatred.
Thus numerous wholesome qualities originate in him born of non-delusion, caused by non-delusion, arisen from non-delusion, conditioned by non-delusion.
Thus numerous wholesome qualities originate in him born of non-greed, caused by non-greed, arisen from non-greed, conditioned by non-greed.
Thus numerous wholesome qualities originate in him born of non-hatred, caused by non-hatred, arisen from non-hatred, conditioned by non-hatred.
Thus the shadow that depended on that stump would be cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.
Thus there is a standstill—not deterioration or growth—in wholesome qualities.
Thus there is deterioration—not a standstill or growth—in wholesome qualities.
Thus there is growth—not a standstill or deterioration—in wholesome qualities.
Thus there is nutriment for craving for existence, and in this way it becomes full.
Thus there is nutriment for craving for existence, and in this way it becomes full.
Thus there is nutriment for ignorance, and in this way it becomes full.
Thus there is nutriment for ignorance, and in this way it becomes full.
Thus there is nutriment for true knowledge and liberation, and in this way they become full.
Thus there is nutriment for true knowledge and liberation, and in this way they become full.
Thus there is nutriment for true knowledge and liberation, and in this way they become full.”
Thus there is nutriment for true knowledge and liberation, and in this way they become full.”
Thus there is the unsurpassed sight, the unsurpassed hearing, the unsurpassed gain, the unsurpassed training, and the unsurpassed service.
Thus these eight qualitiesof the faithful seeker of the household lifeare said by the one who is truly namedto lead to happiness in both states:to good and welfare in this very life,and to happiness in future lives.Thus for those dwelling at home,their generosity and merit increase.
Thus these qualities will be purified in me and will be more widely known as purified.Suppose a man would find a gold nugget, purified and cleansed.
Thus these qualities will be purified in me and will be more widely known as purified.”
Thus this person will be subject to decline in the future.’
In this way, Ānanda, the Tathāgata knows a person by encompassing his mind with his own mind.
Thus this person will be subject to decline in the future.’
In this way, Ānanda, the Tathāgata knows a person by encompassing his mind with his own mind.
Thus this person will be subject to decline in the future.’
Suppose, Ānanda, coals that are burning, blazing, and glowing were deposited on a wide rock.
Thus this person will be subject to decline in the future.’
Suppose, Ānanda, seeds that are intact, unspoiled, not damaged by wind and the sun’s heat, fecund, well preserved, were deposited on a wide rock.
Thus this person will not be subject to decline in the future.’
In this way, Ānanda, the Tathāgata knows a person by encompassing his mind with his own mind.
Thus this person will not be subject to decline in the future.’
In this way, Ānanda, the Tathāgata knows a person by encompassing his mind with his own mind.
Thus this person will not be subject to decline in the future.’
Suppose seeds that are intact, unspoiled, not damaged by wind and the sun’s heat, fecund, well preserved, were deposited in well-prepared soil in a good field.
Thus this person will not be subject to decline in the future.’
Suppose, Ānanda, coals that are burning, blazing, and glowing were deposited on a heap of dry grass or firewood.
Thus those devas and human beingswho have gone for refuge to the Buddhaassemble and pay homage to him,the great one free from diffidence:
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better.
Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even in a famine.’
This is the third future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even in time of peril.’
This is the fourth future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though I am ill.’
This is the second future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though I am old.’
This is the first future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though there is a schism in the Saṅgha.’
This is the fifth future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus while the Fortunate One or the Fortunate One’s discipline remains in the world, this is for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
Thus, bhikkhus, the fool brings peril, the wise person brings no peril; the fool brings calamity, the wise person brings no calamity; the fool brings misfortune, the wise person brings no misfortune.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
Thus, bhikkhus, through the fading away of lust there is liberation of mind, and through the fading away of ignorance there is liberation by wisdom.”
Thus, through the destruction of kamma, suffering is destroyed.
Thus, Ānanda, wholesome virtuous behavior progressively leads to the foremost.”
Thus, Ānanda, wholesome virtuous behavior progressively leads to the foremost.”
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.”
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To die full of concern is painful.
To the utmost of one’s ability,one should not injure living beings;one should not knowingly speak falsely;one should not take what is not given.
To this extent the Blessed One has spoken of a body witness in a provisional sense.
To this extent the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated by wisdom in a provisional sense.
To this extent the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated in both respects in a provisional sense.
To this extent the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of a body witness in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of directly visible nibbāna in a non-provisional sense.” 
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of nibbāna in this very life in a non-provisional sense.” 
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated by wisdom in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated in both respects in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of progressive cessation in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of security in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, friend, the Blessed One has spoken of the directly visible Dhamma in a non-provisional sense.”
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of a body witness in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of a body witness in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of directly visible nibbāna in a provisional sense ….
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of nibbāna in this very life in a provisional sense ….
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated by wisdom in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated by wisdom in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated in both respects in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of one liberated in both respects in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of progressive cessation in a provisional sense ….
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of security in a provisional sense ….
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the achievement of an opening amid confinement in a provisional sense.
To this extent, too, the Blessed One has spoken of the directly visible Dhamma in a provisional sense ….
To what extent is it extraordinarily brilliant and pervasive?
To what extent is it extraordinarily brilliant and pervasive?
To whom would the arahants first show compassion: to the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or to the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
To whom would the arahants first teach the Dhamma: to the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or to the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from false speech; I shall be a speaker of truth, an adherent of truth, trustworthy and reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from false speech; I shall be a speaker of truth, an adherent of truth, trustworthy and reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from false speech; I shall speak truth, adhere to truth; I shall be trustworthy and reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from taking what is not given; I shall accept only what is given, expect only what is given, and be honest at heart, devoid of theft.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from taking what is not given; I shall accept only what is given, expect only what is given, and dwell honestly without thoughts of theft.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from taking what is not given; I shall accept only what is given, expect only what is given, and dwell honestly without thoughts of theft.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the destruction of life; with the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, I too shall dwell compassionate toward all living beings.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the destruction of life; with the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, I too shall dwell compassionate toward all living beings.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the destruction of life; with the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, I too shall dwell compassionate toward all living beings.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the destruction of life; with the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, I too shall dwell compassionate toward all living beings.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds; I shall lie down on a low resting place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds; I shall lie down on a low resting place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds; I shall lie down on a low resting place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon and abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds; I shall lie down on a low resting place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon sexual activity and observe celibacy, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon sexual activity and observe celibacy, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abandon sexual activity and observe celibacy, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abstain from dancing, singing, instrumental music, and unsuitable shows, and from adorning and beautifying myself by wearing garlands and applying scents and unguents.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abstain from dancing, singing, instrumental music, and unsuitable shows, and from adorning and beautifying myself by wearing garlands and applying scents and unguents.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall abstain from dancing, singing, instrumental music, and unsuitable shows, and from adorning and beautifying myself by wearing garlands and applying scents and unguents.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall eat once a day, abstaining from eating at night and from food outside the proper time.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall eat once a day, abstaining from eating at night and from food outside the proper time.
Today, for this night and day, I too shall eat once a day, abstaining from eating at night and from food outside the proper time.
Tomorrow I will eat this and that food; tomorrow I will eat a meal of this and that kind.’
He thereby passes the day with greed and longing in his mind.
Tomorrow the cows will graze in such and such a place and drink water in such and such a place.’
So too, someone here observing the uposatha reflects thus: ‘Today I ate this and that food; today I ate a meal of this and that kind.
Tracking the Blessed One’s footprints, the brahmin Doṇa saw the Blessed One sitting at the foot of the tree—graceful, inspiring confidence, with peaceful faculties and peaceful mind, one who had attained to the highest taming and serenity, a tamed and guarded bull elephant with controlled faculties.
Trading in weapons, trading in living beings, trading in meat, trading in intoxicants, and trading in poisons.
Training in what is conduciveto serenity of mind, always mindful,they call such a bhikkhuone constantly resolute.
True knowledge and conduct.
True knowledge and liberation.
Truly propitious and auspicious,a happy daybreak and a joyful rising,a precious moment and a blissful hourwill come for those who offer almsto those leading the spiritual life.Upright acts of body and speech,upright thoughts and aspirations:when one does what is uprightone gains upright benefits.Those happy ones who have gained such benefitscome to growth in the Buddha’s teaching.May you and all your relativesbe healthy and happy!
Truly, one has good reason to give alms and do meritorious deeds, since they will be helpful if one becomes a deva, becomes a human being, or goes forth.”
Truly, one has good reason to give alms and do meritorious deeds, since they will be helpful if one becomes a deva, becomes a human being, or goes forth.”
Truthful speech, non-divisive speech, gentle speech, and judicious speech.
Truthful speech, non-divisive speech, gentle speech, and judicious speech.
Udāyī, if Ānanda were to die without being free of lust, then because of his confidence he would exercise celestial kingship among the devas seven times and great kingship in this Jambudīpa seven times.
Unafflictive bodily action, unafflictive verbal action, and unafflictive mental action.
Unrighteous bodily action, unrighteous verbal action, and unrighteous mental action.
Unspoiled, liberated by compassion,these men had transcended the fetter of sensuality.Having expunged sensual lust,they were reborn in the brahmā world.
Unwavering confidence in the Buddha, unwavering confidence in the Dhamma, unwavering confidence in the Saṅgha, noble virtuous behavior, noble knowledge, and noble liberation.
Unwavering confidence in the Buddha, unwavering confidence in the Dhamma, unwavering confidence in the Saṅgha, noble virtuous behavior, noble knowledge, and noble liberation.
Unwholesome bodily action, unwholesome verbal action, and unwholesome mental action.
Unwholesome bodily action, unwholesome verbal action, and unwholesome mental action.
Unwholesome bodily action, unwholesome verbal action, and unwholesome mental action.
Unwillingness to listen and not asking questions are obstructions to wisdom.
Upon what do they converge?
Upon what do they converge?
Valuing anger, not the good Dhamma; valuing denigration, not the good Dhamma; valuing gain, not the good Dhamma; and valuing honor, not the good Dhamma.
Valuing the good Dhamma, not anger; valuing the good Dhamma, not denigration; valuing the good Dhamma, not gain; and valuing the good Dhamma, not honor.
Veneration with material goods and veneration with the Dhamma.
Verbal good conduct is to be developed for abandoning verbal misconduct.
Villages or towns should be understood to be twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to.
Villages or towns too, I say, are twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to.
Wandering on tour, he eventually arrived at Vesālī, where he dwelled in the hall with the peaked roof in the Great Wood.
Wandering on tour, the Blessed One eventually arrived at Rājagaha.
We agreeable-bodied deities exert mastery and exercise control over these three things.”
We are busy and have much to do.”
We are busy and have much to do.”
We are busy and have much to do.”
We are perplexed and in doubt, Bhante, as to which of these good ascetics speak truth and which speak falsehood.”
We consider Master Gotama to be one who can perform these three wonders.
We consider the Venerable Ānanda to be one who possesses these five qualities: ‘The Venerable Ānanda is skilled in meaning, skilled in Dhamma, skilled in language, skilled in phrasing, and skilled in sequence.’” 
We descend in honor of the revered one.’
They offer abundant ghee, oil, and butter to the fire.
We descend in honor of the revered one.’
They offer abundant ghee, oil, and butter to the fire.
We describe someone who possesses these four qualities as a great man with great wisdom.
We immediately acquire whatever color we want.
We immediately acquire whatever pleasure we want.
We now go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the Dhamma, and to the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.
We rose up for them and paid homage to them, but we did not offer them seats.
We rose up for them but did not pay homage to them.
We rose up for them, paid homage to them, and offered them seats, but we did not share things with them to the best of our ability and capacity … … we shared things with them to the best of our ability and capacity, but we did not sit close by to listen to the Dhamma … … we sat close by to listen to the Dhamma, but we did not listen to it with eager ears … … we listened to it with eager ears, but having heard it, we did not retain the Dhamma in mind … … having heard it, we retained the Dhamma in mind but we did not examine the meaning of the teachings that had been retained in mind … … we examined the meaning of the teachings that had been retained in mind but we did not understand the meaning and the Dhamma and then practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
We rose up for them, paid homage to them, offered them seats, and  shared things with them to the best of our ability and capacity.
We sat close by to listen to the Dhamma and listened to it with eager ears; having heard it, we retained the Dhamma in mind; we examined the meaning of the teachings that had been retained in mind; and we understood the meaning and the Dhamma and then practiced in accordance with the Dhamma.
We should retain the Blessed One’s explanation in mind.”
We use sandalwood from Kāsi; we wear garlands, scents, and unguents; we receive gold and silver.
We will be fearful of faults and see peril in faults.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.
We will develop mindfulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.’
Thus should you train yourselves.”
We will develop mindfulness of death keenly for the destruction of the taints.’
Thus should you train yourselves.” 
We will know the coming into being and extermination of the world, and our minds will be strengthened in this perception.
We will know the even and uneven ways of the world, and our minds will be strengthened in this perception.
We will know the origination and passing away of the world, and our minds will be strengthened in this perception.
We will not arouse ourselves, strive, and make an effort to obtain recognition and gain, honor, and praise.
We will not submit to evil desires for recognition and for gain, honor, and praise.
We will overcome loss … fame … disrepute … honor … lack of honor … evil desires … bad friendship whenever it arises.’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.” 
We will patiently endure cold and heat, hunger and thirst; contact with flies, mosquitoes, wind, the burning sun, and serpents; rude and offensive ways of speech; we will bear up with arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable, sapping one’s vitality.’
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that you should train yourselves.”
We will retain it in mind as he explains it to us.’
Let the Venerable Mahākaccāna expound it to us.”
We will retain it in mind as he explains it to us.’
Let the Venerable Ānanda expound it to us.”
We will retain it in mind as he explains it to us.”
We will retain it in mind as he explains it to us.”
We will retain it in mind as he explains it to us.”
We wish, Bhante, to see one another not only in this present life but also in future lives.”
We wish, Bhante, to see one another not only in this present life but also in future lives.” 
Wealth is wished for, desired, agreeable, and rarely gained in the world.
Welcome, respected Moggallāna!
Welcome, respected Moggallāna!
Well-set down words and phrases and well-interpreted meaning.
We’ll know the right time for this.
What are the crests of the standards in his case?
What are the five?
What are the four?
What are the ten?
What are the three kinds of craving that are to be abandoned?
What are the three kinds of existence that are to be abandoned?
What are the three?
What are they intent on?
What are they intent on?
What are they intent on?
What are they intent on?
What are they intent on?
What are they intent on?
What are they?”
What are they?”
What ascetic or brahmin can King Muṇḍa visit, so that, having heard his Dhamma, he might abandon the dart of sorrow?”
What can be said if they observe all seven?
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred horse here.
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred horse.
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred horse.
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Such is one kind of excellent thoroughbred horse.
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Tied up by the feeding trough, he does not meditate: ‘Fodder, fodder!’ For that excellent thoroughbred horse regards the application of the goad as a debt, a bond, a loss, and failure.
What can I do to satisfy him?’
Tied up by the feeding trough, he just meditates: ‘Fodder, fodder!’ So too, Sandha, a person who is like a wild colt, when gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, dwells with a mind obsessed and oppressed by sensual lust, and he does not understand as it really is the escape from arisen sensual lust.
What can the Nigaṇṭhas do to me whether or not I obtain their permission?
What do you know?’
What do you know?’
What do you think, bhikkhus?
What do you think, bhikkhus?
What do you think, brahmin?
What do you think, brahmin?
What do you think, isn’t that a completely foolish type of amusement?”
What do you think, isn’t this amusement more excellent and sublime than the former kind?”
What do you think, isn’t this amusement more excellent and sublime than the former kind?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, prince?
What do you think, Sakyans?
What do you think, Sāriputta?
What do you think, Sāriputta?
What do you think, Sāḷha?
What do you think, Sāḷha?
What do you think, Sīha?
What do you think, Sīvaka?
What do you think, Upāli, isn’t this dwelling more excellent and sublime than those that precede it?”
What do you think, would he sleep well or not, or what do you think about this?”
What do you think?
What does the Blessed One say about this?”
What does the Blessed One say about this?”
What eight factors?
What eight factors?
What eight factors?
What eight factors?
What eight things?
What eight things?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?
What eight?”
What eight?”
What eight?”What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What eleven?
What exercises authority over them?
What exercises authority over them?
What five things?
What five things?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What five?
What forty?
What forty?
What four things?
What four things?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?
What four?”
What is given to such a bhikkhu, I say, is not of great fruit.
What is given to such a bhikkhu, I say, is of great fruit.
What is happening today with the brahmin clan?”
What is happening today with the brahmin clan?”
What is in the middle?
What is it?
What is suffering?” “Rebirth, friend, is suffering.
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is that one thing?
What is the basis for this?
What is the basis for this?
What is the blow in his case?
What is the cause and condition for a powerful earthquake?”
What is the cloud of dust in his case?
What is the danger in it?
What is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between an instructed noble disciple and an uninstructed worldling with regard to this?”
What is the escape from it?’
What is the far shore?”
What is the far shore?”
What is the foremost among states of existence?”
What is the foremost happiness?
What is the foremost kind of hearing?
What is the foremost perception?
What is the meaning of this?’ disclose to what is obscure and elucidate what is unclear, and dispel their perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
So let’s discuss this.”
What is the meaning of this?’
They do not disclose what is obscure and elucidate what is unclear, or dispel their perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones do not then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
What is the meaning of this?’
Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.”
What is the meaning of this?’; then we might discuss this.”
What is the second end?
What is the uproar in his case?
What is the victory in his case?
What is the ‘stench’?
What is their consummation?’
If you are asked thus, how would you answer them?”
What is their core?
What is their core?’
If you are asked thus, how would you answer them?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their final goal?”
What is their quest?
What is their quest?
What is their quest?
What is their quest?
What is their quest?
What is their quest?
What is their supervisor?
What is their supervisor?
What is their support?
What is their support?
What is their support?
What is their support?
What is their support?
What is their support?
What kind of Dhamma should one have confidence in, so that, with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn only in a good destination, not in a bad destination?
What kind of Saṅgha should one have confidence in, so that, with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn only in a good destination, not in a bad destination?
What kind of virtuous behavior should one fulfill so that, with the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn only in a good destination, not in a bad destination?”
What nine things?
What nine things?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What nine?
What one thing?
What one thing?
What qualities does a woman possess on account of which, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell?”
What seven things?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What seven?
What six things?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?
What six?What ten things?
What ten things?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?
What ten?”
What ten?”
What then can be said about one who looks on cruelly at a condemned human being brought up for slaughter?
What thirty?
What thirty?
What three things?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What three?
What twenty?
What twenty?
What two things?
What two things?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What two?
What was the conversation that was underway?”
What was the conversation that was underway?”
What was the conversation that was underway?”
What was the conversation that was underway?”
What, Bhante, is the cause and condition for a powerful earthquake?”
What, friends, is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between them?’
If you are asked this, how would you answer?”
Whatever a deluded person performs by body, speech, and mind is also unwholesome.
Whatever a greedy person performs by body, speech, and mind is also unwholesome.
Whatever a person full of hate performs by body, speech, and mind is also unwholesome.
Whatever calamities arise all arise on account of the fool, not on account of the wise person.
Whatever danger there is in the world—that I found.
Whatever escape there is from the world—that I found.
Whatever families do not last long after attaining abundance of wealth, all do not last long for these four reasons, or a particular one among them.
Whatever families last long after attaining abundance of wealth, all last long for these four reasons, or a particular one among them.” 
Whatever flows out from them is impure, foul-smelling, and disgusting.
Whatever gratification there is in the world—that I found.
Whatever he gives, he expects something in return.
Whatever he gives, he expects something in return.
Whatever he gives, he expects something in return.
Whatever he gives, he expects something in return.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Whatever is suffering is not mine; I am not this; this is not my self.
Whatever kamma an ignorant person born of greed, hatred, and delusion,whether what was fashioned by him be little or much,it is to be experienced right here:there exists no other site.
Whatever kind of form there is—whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—a noble disciple with right concentration sees all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Whatever kind of feeling there is … Whatever kind of perception there is … Whatever kind of volitional activities there are … Whatever kind of consciousness there is—whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—a noble disciple with right concentration sees all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Whatever misfortunes arise all arise on account of the fool, not on account of the wise person.
Whatever noble ones at present abide in noble abodes, all abide in these same ten noble abodes.
Whatever noble ones in the future will abide in noble abodes, all will abide in these same ten noble abodes.
Whatever nutrients it takes up from the soil and from the water would all lead to its bitter, pungent, and disagreeable flavor.
Whatever nutrients it takes up from the soil and from the water would all lead to its sweet, agreeable, and delectable flavor.
Whatever nutrients it would take up from the soil and from the water would all lead to its agreeable, sweet, and delectable flavor.
Whatever nutrients it would take up from the soil and from the water would all lead to its bitter, pungent, and disagreeable flavor.
Whatever one who is undeluded performs by body, speech, and mind is also wholesome.
Whatever one without greed performs by body, speech, and mind is also wholesome.
Whatever one without hate performs by body, speech, and mind is also wholesome.
Whatever oozes out from them is impure, foul-smelling, and disgusting.
Whatever perception of form has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever perception of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever perception of the base of nothingness has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever perception of the base of the infinity of consciousness has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever perception of the base of the infinity of space has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever pleasure equanimity has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever rapture has not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever should be done by a compassionate teacher out of compassion for his disciples, seeking their welfare, that I have done for you.
Whatever should be done by a compassionate teacher out of compassion for his disciples, seeking their welfare, that I have done for you.
Whatever thought and examination have not ceased there is the confinement in this case.
Whatever timidity there is in one who is immoral does not exist in one who is virtuous; therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
Whatever timidity there is in one who is lazy does not exist in one who is energetic; therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
Whatever timidity there is in one who is unlearned does not exist in one who is learned; therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
Whatever timidity there is in one who is unwise does not exist in one who is wise; therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
Whatever timidity there is in one without faith does not exist in one endowed with faith; therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
Whatever wealth exists in this sphere—pearls, gems, and excellent beryl,horn gold and mountain gold,and the natural gold called haṭaka— those are not worth a sixteenth partof an uposatha complete in the eight factors,just as all the hosts of stars the moon’s radiance.
Whatever wealth exists in this sphere—pearls, gems, and excellent beryl,horn gold and mountain gold,and the natural gold called haṭaka— those are not worth a sixteenth partof an uposatha complete in the eight factors,just as all the hosts of stars the moon’s radiance.Therefore a virtuous woman or man,having observed the uposatha complete in eight factors,and having made merit productive of happiness,goes blameless to a heavenly state.
Whatever would flow out from them would be impure, foul-smelling, and disgusting.
Whatever would ooze out from them would be impure, foul-smelling, and disgusting.
Whatever, bhikkhus, should be done by a compassionate teacher out of compassion for his disciples, seeking their welfare, that I have done for you.
When a bhikkhu adheres to his own views, holds to them tenaciously, and relinquishes them with difficulty, he dwells without respect and deference toward the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and he does not fulfill the training.
When a bhikkhu desires training … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu does not desire training … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu does not show hospitality to his fellow monks and he does not speak in praise of one who shows hospitality, this, too, is a quality that does not lead to affection, respect, esteem, accord, or unity.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using a bed and chair, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using a dwelling, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using almsfood, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using almsfood, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using medicines and provisions for the sick, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using medicines and provisions for the sick, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads to one’s welfare and happiness.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in five things, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in four things, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in ten things, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in these eight things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in these four things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has a mind completely well developed in these ten things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu has evil desires … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu has few desires … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is a maker of arguments, quarrels, disputes, contentious talk, and disciplinary issues in the Saṅgha, these five dangers can be expected for him.”
When a bhikkhu is a maker of disciplinary issues and does not speak in praise of the settlement of disciplinary issues, this is a quality that does not lead to affection, respect, esteem, accord, or unity.
When a bhikkhu is angry and hostile, he dwells without respect and deference toward the Teacher, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and he does not fulfill the training.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with eight things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with five things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with four things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with nine things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with nine things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with one thing, completely dispassionate toward it, completely liberated from it, completely sees its delimitations, and completely breaks through its meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with one thing, completely dispassionate toward it, completely liberated from it, completely sees its delimitations, and completely breaks through its meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with seven things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with six things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with ten things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these eight things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these five things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these four things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these nine things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these nine things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these seven things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these six things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these ten things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these three things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these three things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with these two things … in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with this one thing, completely dispassionate toward it, completely liberated from it, completely sees its delimitations, and completely breaks through its meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with this one thing, completely dispassionate toward it, completely liberated from it, completely sees its delimitations, and completely breaks through its meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with three things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with two things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is completely disenchanted with two things, completely dispassionate toward them, completely liberated from them, completely sees their delimitations, and completely breaks through their meaning, in this very life he makes an end of suffering.
When a bhikkhu is crafty … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is deceitful … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is devoid of lust for sensual pleasures, devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for them, his mind inclines to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior but does not exhort others in regard to virtuous behavior, and he examines himself but does not examine others, and he is not well known but is not agitated by lack of renown, to this extent he can dwell at ease while living in the Saṅgha.”
When a bhikkhu is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior but does not exhort others in regard to virtuous behavior, and he examines himself but does not examine others, to this extent he can dwell at ease while living in the Saṅgha.”
When a bhikkhu is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior but does not exhort others in regard to virtuous behavior; and he examines himself but does not examine others; and he is not well known but is not agitated by lack of renown; and he gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life, to this extent he can dwell at ease while living in the Saṅgha.”
When a bhikkhu is himself accomplished in virtuous behavior but does not exhort others in regard to virtuous behavior; and he examines himself but does not examine others; and he is not well known but is not agitated by lack of renown; and he gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life; and, with the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it, to this extent he can dwell at ease while living in the Saṅgha.
When a bhikkhu is inclined to attend to teachings … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is inclined to seclusion … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, aggressive toward them, ill disposed toward them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, aggressive toward them, ill disposed toward them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, resentful toward them, ill disposed toward them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not a maker of disciplinary issues and speaks in praise of the settlement of disciplinary issues, this is a quality that leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
When a bhikkhu is not crafty … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is not deceitful … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for form, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for sensual pleasures, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for sensual pleasures, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for sensual pleasures, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for them, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for the body, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not inclined to pay attention to teachings … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is not inclined to seclusion … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is not irritated by his fellow monks … well disposed toward them, his mind inclines to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not one who denigrates … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is not perplexed about the Teacher, does not doubt him, is convinced about him and places confidence in him, his mind inclines to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is not prone to anger … this, too, is a quality that leads to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is one who denigrates … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is one who insults and disparages his fellow monks, a reviler of the noble ones, it is impossible and inconceivable that he will not incur at least one of these eleven disasters.”
When a bhikkhu is one who insults and disparages his fellow monks, a reviler of the noble ones, it is impossible and inconceivable that he will not incur at least one of these ten disasters.” 
When a bhikkhu is one who insults and disparages his fellow monks, a reviler of the noble ones, these five dangers can be expected for him.”
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Dhamma, doubts it, is not convinced about it and does not place confidence in it, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Saṅgha, doubts it, is not convinced about it and does not place confidence in it, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Teacher, doubts him, is not convinced about him and does not place confidence in him, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Teacher, doubts him, is not convinced about him and does not place confidence in him, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Teacher, doubts him, is not convinced about him, and does not place confidence in him, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is perplexed about the training, doubts it, is not convinced about it, and does not place confidence in it, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a bhikkhu is prone to anger … this, too, is a quality that does not lead to … unity.
When a bhikkhu is satisfied with what is trifling and easily gained, I say that he has one of the factors of the ascetic life.”
When a bhikkhu knows how to answereach type in the appropriate way,they say that he is skilledin the four kinds of questions.
When a bhikkhu passes his time in such a way he dies with regret.
When a bhikkhu passes his time in such a way he dies without regret.
When a bhikkhu passes his time in such a way he does not have a good death.
When a bhikkhu passes his time in such a way he has a good death.
When a bhikkhu possesses these eight qualities, lay followers, if they wish, may proclaim their confidence in him.”
When a bhikkhu possesses these eight qualities, lay followers, if they wish, may proclaim their lack of confidence in him.
When a bhikkhu possesses these eight qualities, the Saṅgha, if it wishes, may enjoin an act of reconciliation on him.
When a bhikkhu possesses these eight qualities, the Saṅgha, if it wishes, may revoke an act of reconciliation.”
When a bhikkhu possesses these five qualities, it is fitting for his fellow monks to hold a discussion with him.”
When a bhikkhu possesses these five qualities, it is fitting for his fellow monks to live together with him.”
When a bhikkhu possesses these six qualities, whether night or day comes, only deterioration in wholesome qualities, not growth, is to be expected for him.
When a bhikkhu possesses these six qualities, whether night or day comes, only growth in wholesome qualities, not deterioration, is to be expected for him.” 
When a bhikkhu shows hospitality to his fellow monks and he speaks in praise of one who shows hospitality, this, too, is a quality that leads to affection, respect, esteem, accord, and unity.
When a bhikkhu … yields to the pleasure of rest, the pleasure of sloth, the pleasure of sleep, his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
When a clansman has forsaken the sickle and carrying-pole and gone forth from the household life into homelessness, he can be described as a clansman who has gone forth out of faith.
When a deluded person, overcome by delusion, with mind obsessed by it, inflicts suffering upon another under a false pretext …: ‘I am powerful, I want power,’ that too is unwholesome.
When a disciple of the Buddha is highly learned,an expert on the Dhamma, endowed with wisdom,like a coin of refined mountain gold,who is fit to blame him?Even the devas praise such a one;by Brahmā too he is praised.
When a forest-dwelling bull elephant has emerged from the pool and female elephants go by brushing against his body, the forest-dwelling bull elephant is repelled, humiliated, and disgusted with this.
When a forest-dwelling bull elephant has entered the pool and other elephants—males, females, young ones, and babies—precede him and stir up the water with their trunks, the bull elephant is repelled, humiliated, and disgusted with this.
When a forest-dwelling bull elephant is heading for its feeding ground, and other elephants—males, females, young ones, and babies—eat the bent and twisted bundle of branches, the bull elephant is repelled, humiliated, and disgusted with this.
When a greedy person, overcome by greed, with mind obsessed by it, inflicts suffering upon another under a false pretext—by killing, imprisonment, confiscation, censure, or banishment—: ‘I am powerful, I want power,’ that too is unwholesome.
When a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus has arrived including bhikkhus from various states, he approaches laypeople and informs them: ‘Friends, a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus has arrived including bhikkhus from various states.
When a lay follower possesses these eight qualities, the Saṅgha, if it so wishes, may overturn the almsbowl on him.
When a lay follower possesses these eight qualities, the Saṅgha, if it so wishes, may turn the almsbowl upright on him.”
When a noble disciple possesses these four powers, he has transcended five fears.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned in the same way that a dirty mirror is cleansed by exertion.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, his mind becomes placid, joy arises, and the defilements of the mind are abandoned.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight, based on virtuous behavior.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight, based on virtuous behavior.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight.
When a noble disciple recollects his virtuous behavior, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight.
When a noble disciple recollects the faith, virtuous behavior, learning, generosity, and wisdom in himself and in those deities, on that occasion his mind is not obsessed by lust, hatred, or delusion; on that occasion his mind is simply straight, based on the deities.
When a person dwells in a suitable localityand makes friends with the noble ones,when he has formed right resolutions,and done deeds of merit in the past,grain, riches, fame, and reputation,along with happiness accrue to him.
When a person full of hate, overcome by hatred, with mind obsessed by it, inflicts suffering upon another under a false pretext …: ‘I am powerful, I want power,’ that too is unwholesome.
When a sacrifice is timely and allowable,well prepared and nonviolent, the self-controlled followers of the spiritual lifeattend such a sacrifice as this.
When a talk on faith is being given, a person devoid of faith loses his temper and becomes irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he displays anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on faith is being given, a person endowed with faith does not lose his temper and become irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he does not display anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on generosity is being given, a generous person does not lose his temper and become irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he does not display anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on generosity is being given, a miser loses his temper and becomes irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he displays anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on learning is being given, a learned person does not lose his temper and become irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he does not display anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on learning is being given, a person of little learning loses his temper and becomes irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he displays anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on virtuous behavior is being given, a virtuous person does not lose his temper and become irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he does not display anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on virtuous behavior is being given, an immoral person loses his temper and becomes irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he displays anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on wisdom is being given, a wise person does not lose his temper and become irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he does not display anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a talk on wisdom is being given, an unwise person loses his temper and becomes irritated, hostile, and stubborn; he displays anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When a wild colt is tied up near the feeding trough he meditates: ‘Fodder, fodder!’ For what reason?
When an angry person causes damage,whether easily or with difficulty,later, when the anger has vanished,he is tormented as if burnt by fire.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, he engages in misconduct by body, speech, and mind.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, he loses whatever fame he had acquired through heedfulness.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, his friends and companions, relatives and family members, avoid him from afar.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, if he gets what is harmful, he thinks: ‘I have gotten what is beneficial,’ and if he gets what is beneficial, he thinks: ‘I have gotten what is harmful.’
When, overcome by anger, he gets these things that are diametrically opposed, they lead to his harm and suffering for a long time.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, kings appropriate for the royal treasury any wealth he has acquired by energetic striving, amassed by the strength of his arms, earned by the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, though he may be well bathed, well anointed, with trimmed hair and beard, dressed in white clothes, still, he is ugly.
When an angry person is overcome and oppressed by anger, though he may sleep on a couch spread with rugs, blankets, and covers, with an excellent covering of antelope hide, with a canopy and red bolsters at both ends, still, he sleeps badly.
When an esteemed bhikkhu has risen as the night begins to fade and he is sitting with his legs crossed, holding his body straight, having established mindfulness before him, on that occasion his body is fresh; it is easy for him to attend to the teaching of the Buddhas.
When an excellent thoroughbred horse is tied up near the feeding trough he does not meditate: ‘Fodder, fodder!’ For what reason?
When an object to be given is present, a clansman endowed with faith generates much merit.
When another person confesses a transgression to him, he accepts it in accordance with the Dhamma.
When another person confesses a transgression to him, he does not accept it in accordance with the Dhamma.
When anyone exhausts wealth on anything apart from these four worthy deeds, that wealth is said to have gone to waste, to have been squandered, to have been used frivolously.
When being reproved, that bhikkhu answered evasively, diverted the discussion to an irrelevant subject, and displayed anger, hatred, and resentment.
When both are immoral,miserly and abusive,husband and wifelive together as wretches.
When both the one who teaches the Dhamma and the one who hears the Dhamma experience the meaning and the Dhamma.
When brahmins and householders are righteous, the people of the towns and countryside become righteous.
When brahmins and householders are unrighteous, the people of the towns and countryside become unrighteous.
When cattle are crossing if the chief bull goes straight across,all the others go straight acrossbecause their leader has gone straight.
When cattle are crossing,if the chief bull goes crookedly,all the others go crookedlybecause their leader has gone crookedly.
When delusion arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When desire springs up, one is fettered by those things.
When desire springs up, one is fettered by those things.
When desire springs up, one is fettered by those things.
When faith is present, a clansman endowed with faith generates much merit.
When greed arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When greed arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When hatred arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When hatred … … delusion … … vehemence arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When he arrived, he sat down on the seat that was prepared for him.
When he arrived, he sat down on the seat that was prepared for him.
When he arrived, he sat down on the seat that was prepared for him.
When he awakens, he raises his front quarters and looks back at his hind quarters.
When he bonds with them, they become intimate.
When he died, the Blessed One also declared: ‘He attained to the state of a once-returner and has been reborn in the Tusita group.’
Bhante Ānanda, just how should this teaching of the Blessed One be understood, where one who is celibate and one who is not celibate both have exactly the same destination in their future life?”
When he died, the Blessed One also declared: ‘He attained to the state of a once-returner and has been reborn in the Tusita group.’
Bhante Ānanda, just how should this teaching of the Blessed One be understood, where one who is celibate and one who is not celibate both have exactly the same destination in their future life?”
When he died, the Blessed One declared: ‘He attained to the state of a once-returner and has been reborn in the Tusita group.’
My paternal uncle Isidatta was not celibate but lived a contented married life.
When he died, the Blessed One declared: ‘He attained to the state of a once-returner and has been reborn in the Tusita group.’
My paternal uncle Isidatta was not celibate but lived a contented married life.
When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands … ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’”
When he had concluded his greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When he had concluded his greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: “I have heard, Master Gotama: ‘The ascetic Gotama does not pay homage to brahmins who are old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage; nor does he stand up for them or offer them a seat.’
This is indeed true, for Master Gotama does not pay homage to brahmins who are old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage; nor does he stand up for them or offer them a seat.
When he had spoken, another bhikkhu told him: “Friend, that isn’t the proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
When he had spoken, another bhikkhu told him: “Friend, that isn’t the proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
When he had spoken, another bhikkhu told him: “Friend, that isn’t the proper occasion for going to see an esteemed bhikkhu.
When he had spoken, King Ajātasattu became angry and displeased and said to Upaka Maṇḍikāputta: “How bold indeed is this salt-maker’s boy!
When he had walked for alms in Jantugāma, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he went to the bank of the Kimikālā River.
When he had walked for alms in Sāvatthī, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “Come, Ānanda, let us go to Migāramātā’s Mansion in the Eastern Park to pass the day.”
When he had walked for alms in Uruvelakappa, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “You stay right here, Ānanda, while I enter the Great Wood to pass the day.”
When he had walked for alms in Vesālī, after his meal, on returning from his alms round, he addressed the Venerable Ānanda: “Take a sitting cloth, Ānanda.
When he has engaged in sexual activity, he shaves off his hair and beard, puts on ochre robes, and goes forth from the household life into homelessness.
When he has engaged in sexual activity, out of attachment to his sons he remains settled on his property and does not go forth from the household life into homelessness.
When he has gone forth, he dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
When he has gone forth, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states … he enters and dwells in the first jhāna … … the fourth jhāna.
When he has thus gone forth, he abandons the five hindrances, defilements of the mind, things that weaken wisdom; and then, with his mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, he correctly develops the seven factors of enlightenment and produces nibbāna, which is neither black nor white.
When he has thus gone forth, he abandons the five hindrances, defilements of the mind, things that weaken wisdom; and then, with his mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, he correctly develops the seven factors of enlightenment and produces nibbāna, which is neither black nor white.
When he has understood thus: ‘Doubt is a defilement of the mind,’ he abandons it.
When he has understood thus: ‘Dullness and drowsiness are a defilement of the mind,’ he abandons them.
When he has understood thus: ‘Ill will is a defilement of the mind,’ he abandons it.
When he has understood thus: ‘Restlessness and remorse are a defilement of the mind,’ he abandons them.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he does not think: ‘Alas, the sensual pleasures dear to me will leave me, and I will have to leave those sensual pleasures.’
He does not sorrow, languish, and lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he does not think: ‘Alas, this body dear to me will leave me, and I will have to leave this body.’
He does not sorrow, languish, and lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘Alas, I am perplexed, doubtful, and undecided about the good Dhamma.’
He sorrows, languishes, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘Alas, I have not done anything good and wholesome, nor have I made a shelter for myself, but I have done what is evil, cruel, and defiled.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘Alas, the sensual pleasures dear to me will leave me, and I will have to leave those sensual pleasures.’
He sorrows, languishes, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘Alas, this body dear to me will leave me, and I will have to leave this body.’
He sorrows, languishes, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘I am unperplexed, doubt-free, and decided about the good Dhamma.’
He does not sorrow, languish, and lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become confused.
When he incurs a severe and debilitating illness, he thinks: ‘Indeed, I have not done anything evil, cruel, and defiled, but I have done what is good and wholesome and made a shelter for myself.
When he is alone, the woods steal the mind of a bhikkhu who does not gain concentration.
When he is being closely questioned by me, interrogated, and cross-examined, it is impossible and inconceivable that he would not incur one or another of three consequences: he would either answer evasively and divert the discussion to an irrelevant subject, display anger, hatred, and bitterness, or would sit silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless, just like the wanderer Sarabha.”
When he is being closely questioned by me, interrogated, and cross-examined, it is impossible and inconceivable that he would not incur one or another of three consequences: he would either answer evasively and divert the discussion to an irrelevant subject; display anger, hatred, and bitterness; or would sit silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless, just like the wanderer Sarabha.
When he is being closely questioned by me, interrogated, and cross-examined, it is impossible and inconceivable that he would not incur one or another of three consequences: he would either answer evasively and divert the discussion to an irrelevant subject; display anger, hatred, and bitterness; or would sit silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless, just like the wanderer Sarabha.
When he is being questioned, interrogated, and cross-examined by the Tathāgata or by his disciple, he comes to an impasse and is flustered.
When he is being questioned, interrogated, and cross-examined by the Tathāgata or his disciple, he comes to an impasse and is flustered.
When he is being questioned, interrogated, and cross-examined by the Tathāgata or his disciple, he comes to an impasse and is flustered.
When he is joyful, rapture arises.
When he is reborn in a world that is both afflictive and unafflictive, both afflictive and unafflictive contacts touch him.
When he is reborn in an afflictive world, afflictive contacts touch him.
When he is reborn in an unafflictive world, unafflictive contacts touch him.
When he is reborn in such a world, afflictive contacts touch him.
When he is reborn in such a world, contacts that are both afflictive and non-afflictive touch him.
When he is reborn in such a world, contacts that are both afflictive and non-afflictive touch him.
When he is reborn in such a world, non-afflictive contacts touch him.
When he knew that the talk was finished, he cleared his throat and tapped on the bolt.
When he left Kapilavatthu, he left for good and never returned.
When he meets with loss … … fame … … disrepute … … blame … … praise … … pleasure … … pain, he does not reflect thus: ‘This pain that I have met is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change.’
He does not understand it as it really is.
When he meets with loss … … fame … … disrepute … … blame … … praise … … pleasure … … pain, he reflects thus: ‘This pain that I have met is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change.’
He thus understands it as it really is.
When he often gets to see them, he bonds with them.
When he passes away from there he is a non-returner who does not come back to this state of being.
When he passes away from there he is a returner who comes back to this state of being.
When he passes away from there, if he comes back to this world, whatever business he undertakes does not fulfill his expectations.
When he passes away from there, if he comes back to this world, whatever business he undertakes ends in failure.
When he passes away from there, if he comes back to this world, whatever business he undertakes fulfills his expectations.
When he passes away from there, if he comes back to this world, whatever business he undertakes surpasses his expectations.
When he possessed these seven qualities, Sāriputta realized for himself with direct knowledge the four analytical knowledges and acquired mastery over them.” 
When he possesses these seven qualities, a bhikkhu might soon realize for himself with direct knowledge the four analytical knowledges and acquire mastery over them.”
When he saw me committing a particular unwholesome misdeed with the body, he became displeased.
When he saw the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna coming in the distance, the brahmā Tissa said to him:
When he sees a transgression as a transgression, he makes amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma.
When he sees his transgression as a transgression, he does not make amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma.
When he sees them, lust invades his mind.
When he sees them, lust invades his mind.
When he thinks, ‘I am endowed with blameless bodily, verbal, and mental action,’ he experiences happiness and joy.
When he thinks, ‘I have acquired wealth by energetic striving … righteously gained,’ he experiences happiness and joy.
When he thinks, ‘I have no debts to anyone, whether large or small,’ he experiences happiness and joy.
When he thinks, ‘With wealth acquired by energetic striving … righteously gained, I enjoy my wealth and do meritorious deeds,’ he experiences happiness and joy.
When he was teaching such a Dhamma, those who did not place confidence in him were, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but those who placed confidence in him were reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
When he was teaching such a Dhamma, those who did not place confidence in him were, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but those who placed confidence in him were reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
When he was teaching such a Dhamma, those who did not place confidence in him were, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but those who placed confidence in him were reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
When he was teaching such a Dhamma, those who did not place confidence in him were, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but those who placed confidence in him were reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
When he was teaching, those who understood his teaching completely were, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in a good destination, in the brahmā world.
When his mind is in the grip of lust, it can be expected that he will lead the spiritual life dissatisfied, commit a certain defiled offense, or give up the training and return to the lower life.
When I hear your question, I’ll know.”
When I know and see this, why should I say: ‘I do not know and see.’
I know, friend, I see.”
When I know: ‘This one is to be sustained by a gift,’ I sustain him by a gift.
When I know: ‘This one is to be sustained by beneficent conduct,’ I sustain him by beneficent conduct.
When I know: ‘This one is to be sustained by endearing speech,’ I sustain him by endearing speech.
When I know: ‘This one is to be sustained by impartiality,’ I sustain him by impartiality.
When I pass on, I will meet the appropriate fate.’
He does not sorrow, languish, and lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become confused.
When I pass on, I will meet the appropriate fate.’
He sorrows, languishes, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes confused.
When I saw him committing a particular unwholesome misdeed with the body, I became displeased.
When I speak to them in such a way, they do not respectfully accept what I say.
When I speak to them in such a way, they respectfully accept what I say.”
When insight is developed, what benefit does one experience?
When it has been worn, cloth from Kāsi is beautiful, comfortable, and of great value.
When it has been worn, cloth made of bark fabric is ugly, uncomfortable, and of little value.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘ liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘ liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘ liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
When it is liberated, there comes the knowledge: ‘ liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
This is his victory in battle.
When it is old, cloth from Kāsi is beautiful, comfortable, and of great value.
When it is old, cloth made of bark fabric is still ugly, uncomfortable, and of little value.
When it was liberated there came the knowledge: ‘ liberated.’
I directly knew: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
When it was said: ‘Almsfood too, I say, is twofold: that to be used and that not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Almsfood, friends, should be understood to be twofold: that to be used and that not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Countries or regions too, I say, are twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to,’ it is because of this that this was said.”
When it was said: ‘Countries or regions, friends, should be understood to be twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to,’ it is because of this that this was said.”
When it was said: ‘Lodgings too, I say, are twofold: those to be used and those not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Lodgings, friends, should be understood to be twofold: those to be used and those not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Persons too, I say, are twofold: those to be associated with and those not to be associated with,’ it is because of this that this was said.”
When it was said: ‘Robes, friends, should be understood to be twofold: those to be used and those not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Robes, I say, are twofold: to be used and not to be used,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This body has originated from conceit; in dependence on conceit, conceit is to be abandoned,’ it was because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This body has originated from craving; in dependence on craving, craving is to be abandoned,’ it was because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This body, sister, has originated from nutriment; in dependence on nutriment, nutriment is to be abandoned,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who delights in non-proliferation, who takes delight in non-proliferation, not for one who delights in proliferation, who takes delight in proliferation,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.”
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who is concentrated, not for one who is unconcentrated,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who is energetic, not for one who is lazy,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who is wise, not for one who is unwise,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one who resorts to solitude, not for one who delights in company,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘This Dhamma is for one with mindfulness established, not for one who is muddle-minded,’ it is with reference to this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Villages or towns too, I say, are twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘Villages or towns, friends, should be understood to be twofold: those to be resorted to and those not to be resorted to,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘“These are the eighteen mental examinations”: this, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma taught by me that is unrefuted … uncensured by wise ascetics and brahmins,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘“These are the six bases for contact”: this, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma taught by me that is unrefuted … uncensured by wise ascetics and brahmins,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When it was said: ‘“These are the six elements”: this, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma taught by me that is unrefuted … uncensured by wise ascetics and brahmins,’ it is because of this that this was said.
When its strings were too tight, was your lute well tuned and easy to play?”
When liberation of mind has not matured, this is the fifth thing that leads to its maturation.
When liberation of mind has not matured, this is the first thing that leads to its maturation.
When liberation of mind has not matured, this is the fourth thing that leads to its maturation.
When liberation of mind has not matured, this is the second thing that leads to its maturation.
When liberation of mind has not matured, this is the third thing that leads to its maturation.
When life is endangered by sorrow and death, you observe the uposatha complete in eight factors sometimes, and sometimes you don’t.
When life is endangered by sorrow and death, you observe the uposatha complete in eight factors sometimes, and sometimes you don’t.”
When living for three hundred seasons, one lives just for twelve hundred months: four hundred winter months, four hundred summer months, and four hundred months of the rains.
When living for twelve hundred months, one lives just for twenty-four hundred fortnights: eight hundred fortnights of winter, eight hundred fortnights of summer, and eight hundred fortnights of the rains.
When my husband died, he was reborn in the yakkha realm.
When non-delusion arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When non-greed arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When non-greed arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When non-hatred arises in a person, is it for his welfare or for his harm?”
When non-hatred … … non-delusion … … non-vehemence arises in a person, is it for his welfare or his harm?”
When one departs,self-control over body, speech, and mind,and the deeds of merit one did while living,lead to one’s happiness.
When one desires to see those of virtuous behavior; when one desires to hear the good Dhamma; and when one dwells at home with a mind devoid of the stain of miserliness, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in relinquishment, devoted to charity, delighting in giving and sharing.
When one does not understand these things as they really are, then lust for existence, delight in existence, affection for existence, infatuation with existence, thirst for existence, passion for existence, attachment to existence, and craving for existence lie deep within one in regard to states of existence.
When one does not understand these things as they really are, then lust for views, delight in views, affection for views, infatuation with views, thirst for views, passion for views, attachment to views, and craving for views lie deep within one in regard to views.
When one does not understand these things as they really are, then sensual lust, sensual delight, sensual affection, sensual infatuation, sensual thirst, sensual passion, sensual attachment, and sensual craving lie deep within one in regard to sensual pleasures.
When one does not understand these things as they really are, then, ignorance and unknowing lie deep within one in regard to the six bases for contact.
When one gives well-prepared food,pure, delicious, and flavorful,to the upright ones who areexalted and of excellent conduct,that offering, which links merit with merit,is praised as very fruitfulby the world-knowers.
When one has been reborn, contacts affect one.
When one has been reborn, contacts affect one.
When one has been reborn, contacts affect one.
When one has been reborn, contacts affect one.
When one has faith in the Tathāgata,unshakable and well established,and virtuous behavior that is good,loved and praised by the noble ones;when one has confidence in the Saṅghaand one’s view has been straightened out,they say that one is not poor,that one’s life is not lived in vain.
When one has faith in the Tathāgata,unshakable and well established,and virtuous behavior that is good,loved by the noble ones and praised;when one has confidence in the Saṅghaand one’s view has been straightened out,they say that one is not poor,that one’s life is not lived in vain.
When one has observed the uposatha in the way of the Nigaṇṭhas, the uposatha is not of great fruit and benefit, nor is it extraordinarily brilliant and pervasive.
When one has observed the uposatha in the way of the noble ones it is of great fruit and benefit, extraordinarily brilliant and pervasive.
When one is content with what is blameless,trifling and easily gained;when one’s mind is not distressedbecause of a lodging,robe, drink, and food,one is not hindered anywhere.
When one is guarded in the doors of the sense faculties, moderate in eating, and intent on wakefulness; when one has insight into wholesome qualities and dwells intent on the endeavor to develop the aids to enlightenment in the earlier and later phases of the night, one’s body does not seem as if it had been drugged, one becomes well oriented, and the teachings are clear to one.
When one is joyful, rapture arises.
When one is joyful, rapture arises.
When one is thus percipient one does not experience that base.
When one is thus percipient one does not experience that base.
When one is thus percipient one does not experience that base.
When one is unguarded in the doors of the sense faculties, immoderate in eating, and not intent on wakefulness; when one lacks insight into wholesome qualities and does not dwell intent on the endeavor to develop the aids to enlightenment in the earlier and later phases of the night, one’s body seems as if it had been drugged, one becomes disoriented, and the teachings are no longer clear to one.
When one protects oneself,the other person is also protected.Therefore one should protect oneself;the wise person is always unhurt.
When one understands these things as they really are, then ignorance and unknowing do not lie within one in regard to the six bases for contact.
When one understands these things as they really are, then lust for existence, delight in existence, affection for existence, infatuation with existence, thirst for existence, passion for existence, attachment to existence, and craving for existence do not lie within one in regard to states of existence.
When one understands these things as they really are, then lust for views, delight in views, affection for views, infatuation with views, thirst for views, passion for views, attachment to views, and craving for views do not lie within one in regard to views.
When one understands these things as they really are, then sensual lust, sensual delight, sensual affection, sensual infatuation, sensual thirst, sensual passion, sensual attachment, and sensual craving do not lie within one in regard to sensual pleasures.
When one who is undeluded, not overcome by delusion, with mind not obsessed by it, does not inflict suffering upon another under a false pretext … that too is wholesome.
When one without greed, not overcome by greed, with mind not obsessed by it, does not inflict suffering upon another under a false pretext—by killing, imprisonment, confiscation, censure, or banishment—thinking: ‘I am powerful, I want power,’ that too is wholesome.
When one without hate, not overcome by hatred, with mind not obsessed by it, does not inflict suffering upon another under a false pretext … that too is wholesome.
When one’s house is ablazethe vessel taken outis the one that will be useful to you,not the one that is burnt inside.
When people eat crops that ripen in season, they become long-lived, beautiful, strong, and healthy.”
When people eat crops that ripen irregularly, they become short-lived, ugly, weak, and sickly.
When people question virtuous monastics who come to their home, make inquiries about the teachings, and listen to the Dhamma, on that occasion that family is practicing the way conducive to great wisdom.
When people remove the stain of miserliness toward virtuous monastics who come to their home, on that occasion that family is practicing the way conducive to great influence.
When people rise, pay homage, and offer a seat to virtuous monastics who come to their home, on that occasion that family is practicing the way conducive to birth in high families.
When people see virtuous monastics come to their home and they arouse hearts of confidence, on that occasion that family is practicing the way conducive to heaven.
When rain does not fall, seed life and vegetation, medicinal plants, grasses, and giant trees of the forest wither and dry up and no longer exist.
When right view is assisted by these five factors, it has liberation of mind as its fruit, liberation of mind as its fruit and benefit; it has liberation by wisdom as its fruit, liberation by wisdom as its fruit and benefit.”
When sensual desire and ill will,dullness and drowsiness,restlessness, and doubt aretotally absent in a bhikkhu; when one like this possessesthe virtue and concentrationof one beyond training,and liberation and knowledge;possessing five factorsand having removed five factors,he is truly called a consummate onein this Dhamma and discipline.
When serenity is developed, what benefit does one experience?
When she does so, he has sexual intercourse with her without having given up the training and disclosed his weakness.
When she passes away from that state, if she comes back to this world, wherever she is reborn she is beautiful, attractive, and graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion; but she is poor, destitute, with little wealth; and lacking in influence.
When she passes away from that state, if she comes back to this world, wherever she is reborn she is beautiful, attractive, and graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion; rich, with great wealth and property; and influential.
When she passes away from that state, if she comes back to this world, wherever she is reborn she is ugly, ill formed, and unsightly; but she is rich, with great wealth and property; and influential.
When she passes away from that state, if she comes back to this world, wherever she is reborn she is ugly, ill formed, and unsightly; poor, destitute, and indigent; and lacking in influence.
When she possesses these three qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, a woman is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.”
When so struck, the firm and pithy trees would give off a dull sound, but those that are inwardly rotten, corrupt, and decayed would give off a hollow sound.
When spoken to contrary to fact, he does not make an effort to unravel what is said to him: ‘For such and such a reason this is untrue; for such and such a reason this is contrary to fact.’
Therefore such a person is called one who speaks at an improper time, who speaks falsely, who speaks what is unbeneficial, who speaks non-Dhamma, who speaks non-discipline.
When spoken to contrary to fact, he makes an effort to unravel what is said to him: ‘For such and such a reason this is untrue; for such and such a reason this is contrary to fact.’
Therefore such a person is called one who speaks at the proper time, who speaks in accordance with fact, who speaks what is beneficial, who speaks Dhamma, who speaks discipline.
When standing still … When sitting … When lying down … When in the village … When in the forest … When at the foot of a tree … When in an empty hut … When in the open air … When amid the bhikkhus, one does not find happiness or comfort.
When standing still … When sitting … When lying down … When in the village … When in the forest … When at the foot of a tree … When in an empty hut … When in the open air … When amid the bhikkhus, one finds happiness or comfort.
When such a person creates a trifling bad kamma, it leads him to hell.
When such a person creates exactly the same trifling bad kamma, it is to be experienced in this very life, without even a slight being seen, much less abundant.
When such a person creates trifling bad kamma, it leads him to hell.
When such a person has created exactly the same trifling bad kamma, it is to be experienced in this very life, without even a slight being seen, much less abundant.
When such a person has created exactly the same trifling bad kamma, it is to be experienced in this very life, without even a slight being seen, much less abundant.
When such a person has created exactly the same trifling bad kamma, it is to be experienced in this very life, without even a slight being seen, much less abundant.
When such a person has created trifling bad kamma, it leads him to hell.
When such kind of person has created a trifling bad kamma, it leads him to hell.
When sufficient rain does not fall, the crops ripen irregularly.
When sufficient rain falls, the crops ripen in season.
When swollen, too, a woman obsesses the mind of a man.
When that bhikkhunī saw the Venerable Ānanda coming in the distance, she covered herself from the head down and lay down on her bed.
When that has been removed and eliminated, only grains of gold remain.
When that has been removed and eliminated, there still remain middle-size defilements in the gold: fine grit and coarse sand.
When that has been removed and eliminated, there still remain subtle defilements in the gold: fine sand and black dust.
When that night has passed, he makes use of possessions that have not been given.
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, sits down or lies down next to him, and embraces him.
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, sits down or lies down next to him, and embraces him.
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, smiles at him, chats with him, laughs at him, and teases him.
When the bhikkhu hears that discourse on the Dhamma, his mind is liberated from the five lower fetters.
When the bhikkhu hears that discourse on the Dhamma, his mind is liberated from the five lower fetters.
When the bhikkhu hears that discourse on the Dhamma, his mind is liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of the acquisitions.
When the bhikkhu hears that discourse on the Dhamma, his mind is liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of the acquisitions.
When the Blessed One had finished eating and had put away his bowl, the Koliyan daughter Suppavāsā sat down to one side.
When the Blessed One had finished eating and had put away his bowl, Uggaha sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, these girls of mine will be going to their husbands’ families.
When the Blessed One had finished giving the Venerable Soṇa this exhortation, just as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, he disappeared in the Cool Grove and reappeared on Mount Vulture Peak.
When the Blessed One had walked for alms in Bārāṇasī, after his meal, when he had returned from his alms round, he addressed the bhikkhus:
When the Blessed One knew that my mind was pliant, softened, rid of hindrances, uplifted, and confident, he revealed that Dhamma teaching special to the Buddhas: suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
When the Blessed One knew that Sīha’s mind was pliant, softened, rid of hindrances, uplifted, and confident, he revealed that Dhamma teaching special to the Buddhas: suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
When the constellations and the stars proceed off course, day and night proceed off course … the months and fortnights proceed off course … the seasons and years proceed off course.
When the constellations and the stars proceed on course, day and night proceed on course … the months and fortnights proceed on course … the seasons and years proceed on course.
When the deities are not upset, sufficient rain falls.
When the deities are upset, sufficient rain does not fall.
When the descent takes place, there is name-and-form; with name-and-form as condition, there are the six sense bases; with the six sense bases as condition, there is contact; with contact as condition, there is feeling.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by a Tathāgata has been taught and understood, a person who practices in accordance with the Dhamma is rare in the world.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by a Tathāgata has been taught, a person who can understand it and practice in accordance with the Dhamma is rare in the world.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by a Tathāgata has been taught, a person who can understand it is rare in the world.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by a Tathāgata has been taught, a person who understands it is rare in the world.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata is being taught, one does not wish to listen; one does not lend an ear; one does not set one’s mind on understanding; one grasps the meaning wrongly; one discards the meaning; and one has adopted a conviction that is not in conformity.
When the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata is being taught, one wishes to listen; one lends an ear; one sets one’s mind on understanding; one grasps the meaning; one discards what is not the meaning; and one has adopted a conviction that is in conformity.
When the Dhamma is rightly expoundedthose people who practice accordinglyare the ones who will go beyondthe realm of Death so hard to cross.
When the Dhamma is rightly expoundedthose people who practice accordinglyare the ones who will go beyondthe realm of Death so hard to cross.
When the female lay follower Nandamātā had finished, she fell silent.
When the field is excellent,and the seed sown is excellent,and there is an excellent supply of rain,the yield of grain is excellent.
When the good persons in the world show compassion, they first show compassion to the person with faith, not so to the person without faith.
When the great conflagration has arisen, it burns up villages, towns, and cities.
When the great conflagration has arisen, it burns up villages, towns, and cities.
When the great deluge takes place, villages, towns, and cities are swept away.
When the great deluge takes place, villages, towns, and cities are swept away.
When the great rain cloud has arisen, a great deluge takes place.
When the great rain cloud has arisen, a great deluge takes place.
When the head of a family is endowed with faith, the people in the family who depend on him grow in these five ways.”
When the head of a family is endowed with faith, the people in the family who depend on him grow in these three ways.”
When the householder Dasama had completed his business at Pāṭaliputta, he went to the Venerable Ānanda at Beluvagāmaka near Vesālī.
When the mind is developed, what benefit does one experience?
When the night has passed, in the morning the bhikkhu dresses, takes his bowl and robe, and goes to the residence of that householder or householder’s son.
When the night has passed, in the morning the bhikkhu dresses, takes his bowl and robe, and goes to the residence of that householder or householder’s son.
When the night has passed, they offer excellent food of various kinds to brahmins.
When the night has passed, they offer excellent food of various kinds to brahmins.
When the one who hears the Dhamma experiences the meaning and the Dhamma.
When the one who teaches the Dhamma experiences the meaning and the Dhamma.
When the people of the towns and countryside are righteous, the sun and moon proceed on course.
When the people of the towns and countryside are unrighteous, the sun and moon proceed off course.
When the pāricchattaka coral tree has fully blossomed, a radiance suffuses the area fifty yojanas all around and a fragrance is carried along with the wind for a hundred yojanas.
When the royal vassals are righteous, brahmins and householders become righteous.
When the royal vassals are unrighteous, brahmins and householders become unrighteous.
When the Saṅgha is in concord, there are no mutual insults, no mutual reviling, no mutual disparagement, and no mutual rejection.
When the Saṅgha is in concord, there are no mutual insults, no mutual reviling, no mutual disparagement, and no mutual rejection.
When the seasons and years proceed off course, the winds blow off course and at random.
When the seasons and years proceed on course, the winds blow on course and dependably.
When the ship had still not caught sight of land they released the bird.
When the sun and moon proceed off course, the constellations and the stars proceed off course.
When the sun and moon proceed on course, the constellations and the stars proceed on course.
When the Tathāgata teaches the Dhamma to an assembly, this is his lion’s roar.
When the Tathāgata teaches the Dhamma to an assembly, this is his lion’s roar.
When the Venerable Girimānanda heard about these ten perceptions, his affliction immediately subsided.
When the Venerable Sāriputta had finished eating and had put away his bowl, she sat down to one side and the Venerable Sāriputta asked her:
When the winds blow off course and at random, the deities become upset.
When the winds blow on course and dependably, the deities do not become upset.
When the wise man is in the midst of fools,they do not know him if he does not speak.But they know him when he speaks,teaching the deathless state.
When the wise practice the wayproper for the layperson, they servethe virtuous monks of upright conductwith robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines: for them both by day and nightmerit always increases;having done excellent deeds,they pass on to a heavenly state.
When the words and phrases are badly set down, the meaning is badly interpreted.
When the words and phrases are badly set down, the meaning is badly interpreted.
When the words and phrases are badly set down, the meaning is badly interpreted.
When the words and phrases are well set down, the meaning is well interpreted.
When the words and phrases are well set down, the meaning is well interpreted.
When the words and phrases are well set down, the meaning is well interpreted.
When the world is dissolving, beings for the most part migrate to the devas of streaming radiance.
When the world is dissolving, the devas of streaming radiance rank as the foremost.
When the world was dissolving I fared on to the streaming radiance.
When the world was dissolving, he moved on to the streaming radiance.
When the world was evolving, he was reborn in an empty mansion of Brahmā.
When the world was evolving, I was reborn in an empty mansion of Brahmā.
When there is a sense of moral shame and moral dread … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.”
When there is a sense of moral shame and moral dread, for one possessing a sense of moral shame and moral dread, restraint of the sense faculties possesses its proximate cause.
When there is an excess of words, one becomes restless; when one is restless, one loses one’s restraint.
When there is contentious talk, an excess of words can be expected.
When there is disenchantment and dispassion, for one possessing disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is disenchantment and dispassion, for one possessing disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is disenchantment and dispassion, for one possessing disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is disenchantment and dispassion, for one possessing disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is disenchantment and dispassion, for one possessing disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is disenchantment, for one possessing disenchantment, dispassion possesses its proximate cause.
When there is dispassion, for one possessing dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
When there is dissatisfaction, this suffering is to be expected.
When there is dissatisfaction, this suffering is to be expected.
When there is enjoyment, this happiness is to be expected.”
When there is greed within you, do you know: ‘There is greed within me,’ and when there is no greed within you, do you know: ‘There is no greed within me’?”
When there is hatred within you … … delusion within you … … a bodily fault within you … … a verbal fault within you … … a mental fault within you, do you know: ‘There is a mental fault within me,’ and when there is no mental fault within you, do you know: ‘There is no mental fault within me’?”
When there is hatred within you … … delusion within you … … a state connected with greed within you … … a state connected with hatred within you … … a state connected with delusion within you, do you know: ‘There is a state connected with delusion within me,’ and when there is no state connected with delusion within you, do you know: ‘There is no state connected with delusion within me’?”
When there is joy, for one possessing joy, rapture possesses its proximate cause.
When there is joy, for one possessing joy, rapture possesses its proximate cause.
When there is lust within you, do you know: ‘There is lust within me,’ and when there is no lust within you, do you know: ‘There is no lust within me’?”
When there is no disenchantment and dispassion, for one deficient in disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment and dispassion, for one deficient in disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment and dispassion, for one deficient in disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment and dispassion, for one deficient in disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment and dispassion, for one deficient in disenchantment and dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment, for one deficient in disenchantment, dispassion lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no dispassion, for one deficient in dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no joy, for one deficient in joy, rapture lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no joy, for one deficient in joy, rapture lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion lack their proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion lack their proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion lack their proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion lack their proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion lack their proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no non-regret … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no non-regret … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no non-regret, for one deficient in non-regret, joy lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no non-regret, for one deficient in non-regret, joy lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no pleasure, for one deficient in pleasure, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no pleasure, for one deficient in pleasure, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no rapture, for one deficient in rapture, tranquility lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no rapture, for one deficient in rapture, tranquility lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no rebirth, this happiness is to be expected.”
When there is no restraint of the sense faculties … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no restraint of the sense faculties, for one deficient in restraint of the sense faculties, virtuous behavior lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no restraint of the sense faculties, for one deficient in restraint of the sense faculties, virtuous behavior lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no sense of moral shame and moral dread … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no sense of moral shame and moral dread, for one deficient in a sense of moral shame and moral dread, restraint of the sense faculties lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no tranquility, for one deficient in tranquility,  pleasure lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no tranquility, for one deficient in tranquility, pleasure lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no virtuous behavior … the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no virtuous behavior, for one deficient in virtuous behavior, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no virtuous behavior, for one deficient in virtuous behavior, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no virtuous behavior, for one deficient in virtuous behavior, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no ‘I am,’ there are no ‘I am thus’ … … ‘I shall be otherwise.’
It is in this way that a bhikkhu does not fume.
When there is no, ‘I am because of this,’ there are no: ‘I am thus because of this’ … ‘I shall be otherwise because of this.’
It is in this way that a bhikkhu does not blaze.
When there is non-regret … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.”
When there is non-regret … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.” 
When there is non-regret, for one possessing non-regret, joy possesses its proximate cause.
When there is non-regret, for one possessing non-regret, joy possesses its proximate cause.
When there is perilous turbulence in the wilderness, and the people of the countryside, mounted on their vehicles, are fleeing on all sides, the mother does not find her son and the son does not find his mother.
When there is perilous turbulence in the wilderness, and the people of the countryside, mounted on their vehicles, are fleeing on all sides, there is sometimes an occasion when the mother finds her son and the son finds his mother.
When there is pleasure, for one possessing pleasure, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
When there is pleasure, for one possessing pleasure, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
When there is rapture, for one possessing rapture, tranquility possesses its proximate cause.
When there is rapture, for one possessing rapture, tranquility possesses its proximate cause.
When there is rebirth, this suffering is to be expected.
When there is rebirth, this suffering is to be expected: cold, heat, hunger, thirst, defecation, and urination; being afflicted by fire, sticks, or knives; and relatives and friends get together and scold one.
When there is restraint of the sense faculties … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.” 
When there is restraint of the sense faculties, for one who exercises restraint of the sense faculties, virtuous behavior possesses its proximate cause.
When there is restraint of the sense faculties, for one who exercises restraint over the sense faculties, virtuous behavior possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.”
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion possess their proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion possess their proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion possess their proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion possess their proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment and dispassion possess their proximate cause.
When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment possesses its proximate cause.
When there is tranquility, for one possessing tranquility, pleasure possesses its proximate cause.
When there is tranquility, for one possessing tranquility, pleasure possesses its proximate cause.
When there is virtuous behavior … the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.” 
When there is virtuous behavior, for one whose behavior is virtuous, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
When there is virtuous behavior, for one whose behavior is virtuous, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
When there is virtuous behavior, for one whose behavior is virtuous, right concentration possesses its proximate cause.
When there is ‘I am,’ there are ‘I am thus,’ ‘I am just so,’ ‘I am otherwise,’ ‘I am lasting,’ ‘I am evanescent,’ ‘I may be,’ ‘I may be thus,’ ‘I may be just so,’ ‘I may be otherwise,’ ‘May I be,’ ‘May I be thus,’ ‘May I be just so,’ ‘May I be otherwise,’ ‘I shall be,’ ‘I shall be thus,’ ‘I shall be just so,’ ‘I shall be otherwise.’
It is in this way that a bhikkhu fumes.
When there is ‘I am,’ there are ‘I am thus,’ ‘I am just so,’ ‘I am otherwise,’ ‘I am lasting,’ ‘I am evanescent,’ ‘I may be,’ ‘I may be thus,’ ‘I may be just so,’ ‘I may be otherwise,’ ‘May I be,’ ‘May I be thus,’ ‘May I be just so,’ ‘May I be otherwise,’ ‘I shall be,’ ‘I shall be thus,’ ‘I shall be just so,’ ‘I shall be otherwise.’
These are the eighteen currents of craving related to the internal.
When there is, ‘I am because of this,’ there are: ‘I am thus because of this,’ ‘I am just so because of this,’ ‘I am otherwise because of this,’ ‘I am lasting because of this,’ ‘I am evanescent because of this,’ ‘I may be because of this,’ ‘I may be thus because of this,’ ‘I may be just so because of this,’ ‘I may be otherwise because of this,’ ‘May I be because of this,’ ‘May I be thus because of this,’ ‘May I be just so because of this,’ ‘May I be otherwise because of this,’ ‘I shall be because of this,’ ‘I shall be thus because of this,’ ‘I shall be just so because of this,’ ‘I shall be otherwise because of this.’
It is in this way that a bhikkhu blazes.
When there is, ‘I am because of this,’ there are: ‘I am thus because of this,’ ‘I am just so because of this,’ ‘I am otherwise because of this,’ ‘I am lasting because of this,’ ‘I am evanescent because of this,’ ‘I may be because of this,’ ‘I may be thus because of this,’ ‘I may be just so because of this,’ ‘I may be otherwise because of this,’ ‘May I be because of this,’ ‘May I be thus because of this,’ ‘May I be just so because of this,’ ‘May I be otherwise because of this,’ ‘I shall be because of this,’ ‘I shall be thus because of this,’ ‘I shall be just so because of this,’ ‘I shall be otherwise because of this.’
These are the eighteen currents of craving related to the external.
When these four wheels turn, those devas and humans who possess them soon attain greatness and abundance of wealth.
When these four wheels turn, those devas and humans who possess them soon attain greatness and abundance of wealth.”
When these seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated, they fulfill the three true knowledges.
When these three things are present, a clansman endowed with faith generates much merit.”
When they again become human beings, the generous one would surpass the other in these five ways.”
When they approach anyone, they first approach the person with faith, not so the person without faith.
When they are devoid of lust and hatred,devoid of delusion, without taints,self-controlled, living the spiritual life,the field for the offering is complete.
When they are ill he approaches them and arouses mindfulness in them, saying: ‘Let the honorable ones establish mindfulness on that which is worthy.’
When a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus has arrived, including bhikkhus from various states, he approaches laypeople and informs them: ‘Friends, a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus has arrived including bhikkhus from various states.
When they become intimate, lust finds an opening.
When they form such close bonds, it can be expected that they will engage in the use of various kinds of stored-up goods and give gross hints in regard to the ground and vegetation.
When they form such close bonds, it can be expected that they will live the spiritual life dissatisfied, commit a certain defiled offense, or give up the training and revert to the lower life.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and asked the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him: “Why is it, Master Kaccāna, that khattiyas fight with khattiyas, brahmins with brahmins, and householders with householders?”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: 
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: “What does Master Gotama assert, what does he declare?”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: “Why is it, Master Gotama, that some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell?”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One: “Why is it, Master Gotama, that some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell?”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Ānanda:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Ānanda:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said: “In what way, friend Sāriputta, is a bhikkhu one of quick apprehension concerning wholesome teachings, one who grasps well what he has learned, learns abundantly, and does not forget what he has learned?”
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side and said to him:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side and said to me:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side and said to the Venerable Sāriputta:
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, they sat down to one side.
When they had exchanged greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had exchanged greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to the Blessed One:
When they had exchanged greetings and cordial talk, the wanderer Potaliya sat down to one side, and the Blessed One then said to him:
When they had grown to the size of ripe belli fruits, they burst open, exuding pus and blood.
When they have become devas, would there be any distinction or difference between them?”
When they have excellent things, they give excellent things.
When they have excellent things, they give excellent things.
When they have much, they give much.
When they have much, they give much.
When they have passed away, the discourses are cut off at the root, left without anyone to preserve them.
When they have passed away, the discourses are cut off at the root, left without anyone to preserve them.
When they have passed away, the discourses are not cut off at the root for there are those who preserve them.
When they have passed away, the discourses are not cut off at the root, for there are those who preserve them.
When they receive alms, they first receive alms from the person with faith, not so from the person without faith.
When they saw him, they put down their strung bows, sent the dogs off to one side, and approached him.
When they teach the Dhamma, they first teach the Dhamma to the person with faith, not so to the person without faith.
When things to be given are available,for one needing and wanting meritan offering becomes vastif first given to the holy ones.
When this does not exist, that does not come to be; with the cessation of this, that ceases.
When this happens, he does not reflect thus: ‘I am not the only one for whom what is subject to loss is lost.
When this happens, he does not reflect thus: ‘I am not the only one for whom what is subject to old age grows old.
When this happens, he reflects thus: ‘I am not the only one for whom what is subject to loss is lost.
When this happens, he reflects thus: ‘I am not the only one for whom what is subject to old age grows old.
When this happens, sufficient rain does not fall.
When this happens, the yakkhas release wild spirits.
When this has been done, then there remain thoughts connected with the Dhamma.
When this has been done, there remain in him middling defilements: sensual thoughts, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of harming.
When this has been done, there remain in him subtle defilements: thoughts about his relations, thoughts about his country, and thoughts about his reputation.
When this is the case, is that act of going forth a meritorious practice that extends to one person or to many people?”
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, ignorance is abandoned … true knowledge arises … the conceit ‘I am’ is abandoned … the underlying tendencies are uprooted … the fetters are abandoned.”
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, penetration of the various elements occurs … penetration of the diversity of elements occurs … analytical knowledge of the various elements occurs.”
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, the body becomes tranquil … and all wholesome qualities that pertain to true knowledge reach fulfillment by development.”
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, unarisen unwholesome qualities do not arise and arisen unwholesome qualities are abandoned.”
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, unarisen wholesome qualities arise and arisen wholesome qualities increase and expand.”
When this venerable one speaks on the Dhamma, he is able to explain, teach, describe, establish, reveal, analyze, and explicate its meaning both briefly and in detail.
When this venerable one speaks on the Dhamma, he is not able to explain, teach, describe, establish, reveal, analyze, and explicate its meaning either briefly or in detail.
When this was asked, the Blessed One remained silent.
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu asked the Blessed One: “What, Bhante, is meant by ‘pollution’?
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “But, Bhante, who could be the king above a wheel-turning monarch, a righteous king who rules by the Dhamma?”
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “But, Bhante, who is the king above a wheel-turning monarch, a righteous king who rules by the Dhamma?”
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “How long, Bhante, is the life span in the red-lotus hell?”
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “Contact, friends, is one end; the arising of contact is the second end; the cessation of contact is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, a certain bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “Friends, we have each explained according to our own inspiration.
When this was said, a wanderer said to the householder Vajjiyamāhita: “Wait a moment, householder!
When this was said, another bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “Name, friends, is one end; form is the second end; consciousness is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, another bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “Personal existence, friends, is one end; the origin of personal existence is the second end; the cessation of personal existence is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, another bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “Pleasant feeling, friends, is one end; painful feeling is the second end; neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, another bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “The past, friends, is one end; the future is the second end; the present is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, another bhikkhu said to the elder bhikkhus: “The six internal bases, friends, are one end; the six external bases are the second end; consciousness is in the middle; and craving is the seamstress.
When this was said, Bhaddiya the Licchavi said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, Bhante!
When this was said, Bharaṇḍu the Kālāma said to Mahānāma: “Say the same, Mahānāma.”
But the Blessed One said to Mahānāma: “Say different, Mahānāma.”
When this was said, Cunda, the smith’s son, said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, Bhante!
When this was said, King Muṇḍa asked the Venerable Nārada: “Bhante, what is the name of this exposition of the Dhamma?”
When this was said, one bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I develop mindfulness of death.”
When this was said, one bhikkhu said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I develop mindfulness of death.”
When this was said, one bhikkhu told those elders: “Friends, after his meal, when an esteemed bhikkhu has returned from his alms round, washed his feet, and is sitting with his legs crossed, holding his body straight, having established mindfulness before him: that is the proper occasion for going to see him.”
When this was said, one wanderer said to the householder Anāthapiṇḍika: “‘The world is eternal; this alone is true, anything else is wrong’: such is my view, householder.”
Another wanderer said: “‘The world is non-eternal; this alone is true, anything else is wrong’: such is my view, householder.” – Still another said: “‘The world is finite’ … ‘The world is infinite’ … – ‘The soul and the body are the same’ … ‘The soul is one thing, the body another’ … – ‘The Tathāgata exists after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata does not exist after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata both exists and does not exist after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist after death’; this alone is true, anything else is wrong: such is my view, householder.”
When this was said, Queen Mallikā said to the Blessed One: “I suppose, Bhante, that in some earlier life I was prone to anger and often exasperated; that even when I was criticized slightly I lost my temper and became irritated, hostile, and stubborn, and displayed anger, hatred, and bitterness.
When this was said, Sīha the general said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I do not go by faith in the Blessed One concerning those four directly visible fruits of giving declared by him.
When this was said, Sīha the general said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, Bhante!
When this was said, the bhikkhus were silent.
When this was said, the Blessed One said to the Venerable Udāyī: “Do not say so, Udāyī!
When this was said, the Blessed One said to those bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, the bhikkhu who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just a night and a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching.
When this was said, the Blessed One said to those bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, the bhikkhu who develops mindfulness of death thus: ‘May I live just a night and a day so that I may attend to the Blessed One’s teaching.
When this was said, the brahmin Jāṇussoṇī said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, Master Gotama!
When this was said, the brahmin Kaṇḍarāyana rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, and bowed down with his head at the feet of the young bhikkhus,: “You elders stand at the stage of an elder; we youths stand at the stage of a youth.
When this was said, the brahmin Kāraṇapālī rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, and placing his right knee on the ground, he reverently saluted the Blessed One and uttered three times these inspired words:
When this was said, the brahmin of Verañjā said to the Blessed One: “Master Gotama is the eldest!
When this was said, the brahmin Uggatasarīra said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, Master Gotama!
When this was said, the brahmin Vassakāra said this to the Blessed One: “If, Master Gotama, the Vajjis were to observe even one among these principles of non-decline, only growth would be expected for them, not decline.
When this was said, the brahmin Ārāmadaṇḍa rose from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, lowered his right knee to the ground, reverently saluted in the direction of the Blessed One, and uttered this inspired utterance three times: “Homage to the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
When this was said, the householder Anāthapiṇḍika said to those wanderers: “Bhante, this venerable one said thus: ‘“The world is eternal; this alone is true, anything else is wrong”: such is my view, householder.’
This view of his has arisen because of his own careless attention or conditioned by someone else’s utterance.
When this was said, the householder Dasama of Aṭṭhakanagara said to the Venerable Ānanda: “Bhante Ānanda, just as if a man seeking one entrance to a hidden treasure all at once found eleven entrances to that treasure, so too, while I was seeking one door to the deathless, I have all at once gotten to hear eleven doors to the deathless.
When this was said, the Licchavi Paṇḍitakumāra said to the Licchavi Abhaya: “Why, friend Abhaya, don’t you thank the Venerable Ānanda for his well-stated words?”
When this was said, the male lay follower Vāseṭṭha said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, if my beloved relatives and family members would observe the uposatha complete in eight factors, that would lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
When this was said, the Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta’s bhikkhu friends said to the Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita: “Don’t disparage the Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta.
When this was said, the Venerable Mahākaccāna said to those elder bhikkhus: “Friends, in the presence of the Blessed One I heard and learned this:
When this was said, the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna said to the Blessed One: “Briefly, Bhante, how is a bhikkhu liberated in the extinction of craving, best among devas and humans: one who has reached the ultimate conclusion, won ultimate security from bondage, lived the ultimate spiritual life, and gained the ultimate consummation?”
When this was said, the Venerable Nandaka, feeling embarrassed, said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I did not know that the Blessed One was standing outside the door.
When this was said, the Venerable Sandha said to the Blessed One: “But how, Bhante, does an excellent thoroughbred person meditate?
When this was said, the Venerable Subhūti said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, these manifestations of faith in one endowed with faith that the Blessed One has spoken of are seen in this bhikkhu, and he does exhibit them.
When this was said, the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Blessed One:
When this was said, the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Blessed One:
When this was said, the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I understand in detail the meaning of this statement that the Blessed One has spoken in brief to be as follows.
When this was said, the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, I understand in detail thus the meaning of this statement that the Blessed One has spoken in brief.
When this was said, the Venerable Sāriputta said to the Blessed One: “It’s astounding and amazing, Bhante, how well that was said by the Blessed One.
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said this to the Venerable Ānanda: “Is it, friend Ānanda, while one is actually percipient or while one is non-percipient that one does not experience that base?”
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Blessed One: “Bhante, is it only when people see an elephant possessed of a large massive body that they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ or do people also say this when they see things possessed of a large massive body?”
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “But, friend Sāriputta, what happiness could there be here when nothing is felt here?”
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “This is impossible, friend Sāriputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made that transcend the company of devas that subsist on edible food, might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Sāriputta: “This is impossible, friend Sāriputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made transcending the company of devas that subsist on edible food, might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī said to the Venerable Ānanda: “What is it to you, friend Ānanda, that your Teacher is so powerful and mighty?”
When this was said, the Venerable Udāyī was silent.
When this was said, the Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One: “Is it possible, Bhante, to describe three other persons as the counterparts of those three?”
When this was said, the Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One: “It is my good fortune!
When this was said, the Venerable Ānanda said to the brahmin Saṅgārava: “Of these two practices, brahmin, which appeals to you more as being simpler and less harmful, and as being more fruitful and beneficial?”
When this was said, the Venerable Ānanda said to the brahmin Uggatasarīra: “Brahmin, Tathāgatas should not be asked thus: ‘I have heard, Master Gotama, that the kindling of the sacrificial fire and the raising of the sacrificial post are of great fruit and benefit.’
Tathāgatas should be asked: ‘Bhante, I want to kindle the sacrificial fire and raise the sacrificial post.
When this was said, those wanderers said to the householder Anāthapiṇḍika: “We have each explained our own views, householder.
When this was said, those wanderers sat silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless.
When this was said, those wanderers sat silenced, disconcerted, hunched over, downcast, glum, and speechless.
When this was said, Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, said to the Blessed One: “Suppose, Bhante, there was a man in quest of profit who raised horses for sale, but he would not gain a profit and instead would only reap weariness and distress.
When those beings perceive that light, then the Tathāgata projects his voice and makes them hear its sound.
When those bhikkhus had walked for alms in Rājagaha, after their meal, when they returned from their alms round, they approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
When those discourses spoken by the Tathāgata are being recited that are deep, deep in meaning, world-transcending, connected with emptiness, they will not want to listen to them, will not lend an ear to them, or apply their minds to understand them; they will not think those teachings should be studied and learned.
When those worthy of offerings are present, a clansman endowed with faith generates much merit.
When villages, towns, and cities are being swept away, the mother does not find her son and the son does not find his mother.
When villages, towns, and cities are being swept away, there is sometimes an occasion when the mother finds her son and the son finds his mother.
When villages, towns, and cities are burning up, the mother does not find her son and the son does not find his mother.
When villages, towns, and cities are burning up, there is sometimes an occasion when the mother finds her son and the son finds his mother.
When virtuous renunciants dwell in dependence on a village or a town, the people there generate much merit in these three ways.”
When walking, one does not find happiness or comfort.
When walking, one finds happiness and comfort.
When what has arisen does go under its control?’”
When what has arisen does go under its control?”
When what has been properly obtainedis properly offered, properly sacrificed,to those worthy of offerings,the sacrifice is vast and the deities are pleased.
When wisdom is developed, what benefit does one experience?
When you are alert and mindful, developing concentration that is measureless, these five kinds of knowledge arise that are personally yours.” 
When you assemble, Nandaka, you should do one of two things: either talk on the Dhamma or maintain noble silence.
When you awaken, you should get up quickly,: ‘I will not be intent on the pleasure of rest, the pleasure of sloth, the pleasure of sleep.’
It is in this way, Moggallāna, that you should train yourself.
When you constantly remove delusion, you will not do any action born of delusion, whether by body, speech, or mind.
When you constantly remove greed, you will not do any action born of greed, whether by body, speech, or mind.
When you constantly remove hatred, you will not do any action born of hatred, whether by body, speech, or mind.
When you constantly remove vehemence, you will not do any action born of vehemence, whether by body, speech, or mind.’”
When you give gifts to the Saṅgha, your mind will be confident.
When you have done so, what further should be done?
When you have peaceful sense faculties and peaceful minds, your bodily action will be peaceful, your verbal action will be peaceful, and your mental action will be peaceful.
When you smile rejoicing in the Dhamma, you may simply show a smile.”
When you were asked such questions, you answered well, but don’t become conceited because of that.”
When you were face to face with the Teacher you passed by the Blessed One, thinking to ask me about the meaning.
When you were face to face with the Teacher you passed by the Blessed One, thinking to ask me about the meaning.
When your mind is confident, with the breakup of the body, after death, you will be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
When, according to their means, people share what they have with virtuous monastics who come to their home, on that occasion that family is practicing the way conducive to great wealth.
When, alert and mindful, you develop concentration that is measureless, five kinds of knowledge arise that are personally yours.
When, bhikkhus, these three perceptions of an ascetic are developed and cultivated, they fulfill these seven things.”
When, by completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the cessation of perception and feeling, and having seen with wisdom, his taints are utterly destroyed, on that occasion he is called a bhikkhu who has blinded Māra, put out Māra’s eyes, gone beyond sight of the Evil One, and crossed over attachment to the world.” 
When, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception ….
When, by completely surmounting the base of the infinity of consciousness, ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of nothingness ….
When, however, its head comes forth, they know it as blighted barley, just chaff and trash among the barley.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, goes to hear the Tathāgata or a disciple of the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed hearing is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, goes to see the Tathāgata or a disciple of the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed sight is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, obtains faith in the Tathāgata or in a disciple of the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed gain is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, recollects the Tathāgata or a disciple of the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed recollection is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, serves the Tathāgata or a disciple of the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed service is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, one of settled faith, of settled devotion, decided, full of confidence, trains in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom in the Dhamma and discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata: this unsurpassed training is for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
When, however, the bhikkhus see his offense, they know him as a corruption among ascetics, just chaff and trash among ascetics.
When, however, the bhikkhus see his offense, they know him as a corruption among ascetics, just chaff and trash among ascetics.
When, however, they see his offense, they know him as a corruption among ascetics, just chaff and trash among ascetics.
When, however, they see his offense, they know him as a corruption among ascetics, just chaff and trash among ascetics.
When, Māluṅkyāputta, a bhikkhu has abandoned craving, cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, obliterated it so that it is no more subject to future arising, he is called a bhikkhu who has cut off craving, stripped off the fetter, and by completely breaking through conceit, has made an end of suffering.”
When, Puṇṇiya, one possesses these eight qualities, the Tathāgata is entirely disposed to teach the Dhamma.”
When, Puṇṇiya, one possesses these ten qualities, the Tathāgata is entirely disposed to teach the Dhamma.”
When, through direct knowledge,the Buddha, the teacher, the peerless personin this world with its devas,sets in motion the wheel of Dhamma, personal existence, its cessation,the origin of personal existence,and the noble eightfold paththat leads to the calming down of suffering.
Where have those elder disciples gone?”
Where have those elder disciples gone?”
Where is Anuruddha?
Where is Kakkaṭa?
Where is Kaṭa?
Where is Kaṭimbha?
Where is Kaṭissaṅga?
Where is Mahācunda?
Where is Mahākaccāyana?
Where is Mahākappina?
Where is Mahākassapa?
Where is Mahākoṭṭhita?
Where is Mahāmoggallāna?
Where is Revata?
Where is Upacāla?
Where is Ānanda?
Where shall I go?”
Wherever that kamma ripens, it is there that one experiences its result, either in this very life, or in the rebirth, or on some subsequent occasion.
Wherever that kamma ripens, it is there that one experiences its result, either in this very life, or in the rebirth, or on some subsequent occasion.
Wherever that kamma ripens, it is there that one experiences its result, either in this very life, or in the rebirth, or on some subsequent occasion.
Wherever that kamma ripens, it is there that one experiences its result, either in this very life, or in the rebirth, or on some subsequent occasion.
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmin householders of town and countryside will incline in the same direction.
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmin householders of town and countryside will incline in the same direction.
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmin householders of town and countryside will incline in the same direction.
Whether in the village or the forest,the unwise foolish person,not having gained peace for himself,goes around followed by flies.
Whether it is a layperson or one gone forth who is practicing rightly, because of right practice, they attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
Whether it is a layperson or one gone forth who is practicing wrongly, because of wrong practice, they do not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
Whether walking or standing,sitting or lying down,one who thinks bad thoughtsconnected with the household lifehas entered upon a dire path,infatuated by delusive things:such a bhikkhu cannot reachthe highest enlightenment.
Which is better, for a strong man to force open one’s mouth with a hot iron spike—burning, blazing, and glowing—and insert a hot copper ball—burning, blazing, and glowing—which burns one’s lips, mouth, tongue, throat, and stomach, and comes out from below taking along one’s entrails, or for one to consume almsfood given out of faith by affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, for a strong man to grab one by the head or shoulders and force one to sit or lie down on a hot iron bed or chair—burning, blazing, and glowing—or for one to use a bed and chair given out of faith by affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, for a strong man to grab one, turn one upside down, and throw one into a hot copper cauldron—burning, blazing, and glowing—and while one is boiling there in a swirl of froth, one sometimes rises, sometimes sinks, and sometimes is swept across, or for one to use a dwelling given out of faith by affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, for a strong man to strike one in the breast with a sharp spear smeared with oil, or for one to accept reverential salutations from affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, for a strong man to wrap a hot iron sheet—burning, blazing, and glowing—around one’s body, or for one to use a robe given out of faith by affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, for a strong man to wrap a tough horsehair rope around both one’s shins and tighten it so that it cuts through one’s outer skin, inner skin, flesh, sinews, and bone, until it reaches the marrow, or for one to accept the homage of affluent khattiyas, brahmins, or householders?”
Which is better, to embrace that great mass of fire, burning, blazing, and glowing, and sit down or lie down next to it, or to embrace a girl with soft and tender hands and feet—whether from a khattiya, brahmin, or householder clan—and sit down or lie down next to her?”
Which of these are you, Doṇa?”
Which of these are you, Doṇa?”
Which of these three kinds of persons do you consider the most excellent and sublime?”
Which of these three kinds of persons do you consider the most excellent and sublime?”
Which of these three kinds of persons do you consider the most excellent and sublime?”
Which one are you?”
Which person would acquire a good reputation: the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
Which person would approach any assembly—whether of khattiyas, brahmins, householders, or ascetics— confidently and composed: the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
Which three?
Which two?
Which two?
Which two?
Which two?
Which two?
Which two?
While engaged in talk pertaining to the Dhamma, in questions-and-answers, they will slide down into a dark Dhamma but will not recognize it.
While he is being brought to his relatives, he dies along the way even before he arrives.
While he is sitting in his seat, he attends to that talk at the beginning, in the middle, and at the end.
While he is sitting in his seat, he attends to that talk at the beginning, in the middle, and at the end.
While he is sitting in his seat, he does not attend to that talk at the beginning, in the middle, or at the end.
While he is walking along the path that encircles the city he would not see a cleft or an opening in the walls even big enough for a cat to slip through.
While he was instructing … and gladdening them, I became impatient and bitter, thinking: ‘This ascetic is too stringent.’
Then, having dwelled at Paṅkadhā as long as he wanted, the Blessed One set out on tour for Rājagaha.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by forms occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by pleasure equanimity occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by rapture occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by sensuality occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by the base of nothingness occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by the base of the infinity of consciousness occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by the base of the infinity of space occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While I was dwelling in this state, perception and attention accompanied by thought occurred in me and I felt it as an affliction.
While in other people’s homes slaves, workers, and servants are given broken rice together with sour gruel for their meals, in my father’s residence they were given choice hill rice, meat, and boiled rice.
While I’m working, my body will become tired.
While seeing things clearly, the wise oneknows both kinds of happiness.The other is not worth a sixteenth partof the bliss of blamelessness.
While sitting in his seat,he comprehends the phrasing,at the beginning, middle, and endof the talk.
While sitting in his seat,he grasps the phrasing of the talk,at its beginning, middle, and end.But after rising, he no longer understands,but forgets what he had learned.
While the Venerable Anuruddha was alone in seclusion, a course of thought arose in his mind thus:
While they were engaged in their discussion, the Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta repeatedly interrupted their talk.
While this conversation between the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna and Vappa the Sakyan was underway, in the evening the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the attendance hall.
While traveling along a highway he might hear the sound of a conch and he would not be at all perplexed or uncertain about the sound; rather, he would conclude: ‘That is the sound of a conch.’
So too, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma … The arising of his memory is sluggish, but then that being quickly reaches distinction.
While traveling along a highway he might hear the sound of a kettledrum and would not be at all perplexed or uncertain about the sound; rather, he would conclude: ‘That is the sound of a kettledrum.’
So too, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma … The arising of his memory is sluggish, but then that being quickly reaches distinction.
While traveling, it wasn’t possible for me to attend to the teaching of the Buddhas.
While traveling, it won’t be easy for me to attend to the teaching of the Buddhas.
While traveling, my body has become tired.
While traveling, my body will become tired.
While walking for alms near the cattle-yoking fig tree, I saw a dissatisfied bhikkhu gratification outwardly, muddle-minded, without clear comprehension, unconcentrated, with a wandering mind and loose sense faculties.
While walking for alms near the cattle-yoking fig tree, the Blessed One saw a dissatisfied bhikkhu, gratification outwardly, muddle-minded, without clear comprehension, unconcentrated, with a wandering mind and loose sense faculties.
While working, it wasn’t possible for me to attend to the teaching of the Buddhas.
While working, it won’t be easy for me to attend to the teaching of the Buddhas.
While you dwell within the Saṅgha you will be at ease.”
Who can obstruct the dispellerwho has discarded all kamma?Who is fit to blame one who is likea coin of refined gold?Even the devas praise such a one;by Brahmā too he is praised.
Who else, apart from Master Gotama, can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, such a celestial high and luxurious bed?
Who else, apart from Master Gotama, can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, such a high and luxurious bed?
Who else, apart from Master Gotama, can gain at will, without trouble or difficulty, such a noble high and luxurious bed?
Who in the world are practicing the good way?
Who in the world are the fortunate ones?”
Who is fit to blame him,standing in Dhamma,accomplished in virtuous behavior,a speaker of truth,possessing a sense of shame, like a coin of refined gold?Even the devas praise him;by Brahmā, too, he is praised.
Who is that one person?
Who is that one person?
Who is that one person?
Who is that one person?
Who is that one person?
Whoever, Ānanda, has developed and cultivated the four bases for psychic potency … and properly undertaken them could, if he so wished, live on for an eon or for the remainder of an eon.
Whoever, Ānanda, has developed and cultivated the four bases for psychic potency, made them a vehicle and basis, carried them out, consolidated them, and properly undertaken them could, if he so wished, live on for an eon or for the remainder of an eon.
Wholesome bodily action, wholesome verbal action, and wholesome mental action.
Wholesome bodily action, wholesome verbal action, and wholesome mental action.
Wholesome bodily action, wholesome verbal action, and wholesome mental action.
Whom would the arahants approach first: the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
Why doesn’t he couple with a woman out of season?
Why is it that for another the same kind of business does not fulfill his expectations?
Why is it that for still another the same kind of business fulfills his expectations?
Why is it that sometimes even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been so recited?”
Why is that so?”
Why is that so?”
Why not?
Why should another’s son vex you?
Why should I be afraid of a bad destination?
Why should I be afraid on account of my livelihood?
Why should one be inferior and the other superior?’
That of theirs will indeed lead to their harm and suffering for a long time.
Why should one be inferior and the other superior?’
That of theirs will indeed lead to their harm and suffering for a long time.
Why should one be inferior and the other superior?’
That of theirs will indeed lead to their harm and suffering for a long time.
Why should one be inferior and the other superior?’
That of theirs will indeed lead to their harm and suffering for a long time.
Why shouldn’t we do so too?’
Why so?
Why, so can I!’ Some time later, in dependence upon conceit, he abandons conceit.
Will that lead to his harm and suffering for a long time?”
Will that lead to his welfare and happiness for a long time?”
Willingness to listen and asking questions are nutriments for wisdom.
Wisdom is developed.
Wisdom is their supervisor.
Wisdom is their supervisor.
Wisdom is to be developed for abandoning delusion.
Wisdom shines in its manifestation.
With a sense of moral shame as the moat, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
With best intentions he then gives,this person with an undivided mind.He goes to an excellent statewhere, having gone, one does not sorrow.
With craving as companiona person wanders during this long time.Going from one state to another,he does not overcome saṃsāra.
With energy as his troops, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
With his mind invaded by lust, he burns bodily and mentally.
With his mind invaded by lust, he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
With his mind invaded by lust, he has sexual intercourse without having disclosed his weakness and given up the training.
With ignorance as condition, volitional activities; with volitional activities as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, name-and-form; with name-and-form as condition, the six sense bases; with the six sense bases as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging; with clinging as condition, existence; with existence as condition, birth; with birth as condition, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, dejection, and anguish come to be.
With learning as his weaponry, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
With measureless, well-developed concentration, whatever state realizable by direct knowledge he inclines his mind toward to realize by direct knowledge, he is capable of realizing it, there being a suitable basis.
With mindfulness as his gatekeeper, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
With moral dread as the patrol path, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
With respect to what five things should he examine himself?
With safeguarding as the foundation originate the taking up of rods and weapons, quarrels, contentions, and disputes, accusations, divisive speech, and false speech, and many bad unwholesome things.
With the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion, he did nothing unwholesome and did not resort to anything bad.
With the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion, you will do nothing unwholesome or resort to anything bad.”
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the abandoning of the conditioned, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of these causal activities, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this basis, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this cause, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this condition, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.” 
With the abandoning of this consciousness, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this feeling, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this form, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this perception, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the abandoning of this source, these bad unwholesome qualities do not occur.”
With the appearance of the fifth sun, the water left in the great ocean is not enough even to reach the joints of one’s fingers.
With the appearance of the fifth sun, the waters in the great ocean sink by a hundred yojanas, two hundred yojanas … three hundred yojanas … seven hundred yojanas.
With the appearance of the fourth sun, the great lakes from which those great rivers originate—Anotatta, Sīhapapāta, Rathakāra, Kaṇṇamuṇḍa, Kuṇāla, Chaddanta, and Mandākinī—dry up and evaporate and no longer exist.
With the appearance of the second sun, the small rivers and lakes dry up and evaporate and no longer exist.
With the appearance of the seventh sun, this great earth and Sineru, the king of mountains, burst into flames, blaze up brightly, and become one mass of flame.
With the appearance of the sixth sun, this great earth and Sineru, the king of mountains, smoke, fume, and smolder.
With the appearance of the third sun, the great rivers—the Ganges, the Yamunā, the Aciravatī, the Sarabhū, and the Mahī—dry up and evaporate and no longer exist.
With the breakup of the body after death, he will be reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.”
With the breakup of the body, after death, a donor, a munificent giver, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
With the breakup of the body, after death, a donor, a munificent giver, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
With the breakup of the body, after death, a person with faith is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for deterioration, not for distinction; he is one going to deterioration, not to distinction.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he heads for distinction, not for deterioration; he is one going to distinction, not to deterioration.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn among humans in a favorable condition.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn among humans in an unfavorable condition.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in a certain order of devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in a certain order of devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in a certain order of devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with affluent khattiyas, affluent brahmins, or affluent householders—and that is for one who is virtuous, I say, not for one who is immoral.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with elephants.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with horses … cattle … dogs.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with human beings.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with human beings.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas of Brahmā’s company—and that is for one who is virtuous, I say, not for one who is immoral; for one without lust, not for one with lust.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas of the pure abodes.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas of the pure abodes.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas of the pure abodes.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas of the pure abodes.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas the four great kings.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas the four great kings—and that is for one who is virtuous, I say, not for one who is immoral.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas who control what is created by others.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas who control what is created by others—and that is for one who is virtuous, I say, not for one who is immoral.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas who delight in creation.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the Tusita devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the Tāvatiṃsa devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in companionship with the Yāma devas.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the animal realm.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the sphere of afflicted spirits.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he will be reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.’
In this way, Ānanda, the Tathāgata knows a person by encompassing his mind with his own mind.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he will be reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.’
Suppose, Ānanda, seeds that are broken, spoiled, damaged by wind and the sun’s heat, were deposited in well-prepared soil in a good field.
With the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
With the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
With the breakup of the body, after death, one is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell.
With the breakup of the body, after death, they would both be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
With the breakup of the body, after death, which person would be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world: the one without faith who is miserly, mean, and abusive, or the one endowed with faith, a munificent giver who delights in charity?”
With the cessation of contact there is cessation of feelings.
With the cessation of contact there is cessation of kamma.
With the cessation of contact there is cessation of perceptions.
With the cessation of contact there is cessation of sensual pleasures.
With the cessation of craving there is cessation of suffering.
With the cessation of ignorance there is cessation of the taints.
With the destruction of delusion, a source of kamma is extinguished.”
With the destruction of greed, a source of kamma is extinguished.
With the destruction of hatred, a source of kamma is extinguished.
With the destruction of the fetters of existence,for the stable one, rightly liberated,the knowledge occurs:“My liberation is unshakable.”
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge … the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom … he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge … the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom … he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge … the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom … he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.” 
With the destruction of the taints, he realizes for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he realizes for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, he realizes for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
With the destruction of the taints, I have realized for myself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, I dwell in it.
With the destruction of the taints, I have realized for myself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, I dwell in it.
With the destruction of the taints, I have realized for myself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, I dwell in it.”
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human … … he understands how beings fare in accordance with their kamma.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings fare in accordance with their kamma thus: ‘These beings who engaged in misconduct by body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong view, and undertook kamma based on wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but these beings who engaged in good conduct by body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right view, and undertook kamma based on right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’
Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings fare in accordance with their kamma.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I saw beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and I understood how beings fare in accordance with their kamma thus: ‘These beings who engaged in misconduct by body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong view, and undertook kamma based on wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the lower world, in hell; but these beings who engaged in good conduct by body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right view, and undertook kamma based on right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a good destination, in the heavenly world.’
Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I saw beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and I understood how beings fare in accordance with their kamma.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, the Blessed One saw the female lay follower Veḷukaṇṭakī Nandamātā preparing this offering and he then addressed the bhikkhus:
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, the Blessed One saw the Venerable Mahāmoggallāna sitting and dozing.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, the Blessed One saw those bhikkhus asleep, snoring away until sunrise.
With the fading away as well of rapture … he enters and dwells in the third jhāna….
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
This subject of recollection, developed and cultivated in this way, leads to a happy dwelling in this very life.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences pleasure with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, he enters and dwells in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, I dwell equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, I experience pleasure with the body; I enter and dwell in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, I enter and dwell in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away as well of rapture, I dwell equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, I experience pleasure with the body; I enter and dwell in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, I enter and dwell in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.”
With the fading away as well of rapture, I dwelled equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, I experienced pleasure with the body; I entered and dwelled in the third jhāna of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and dejection, I entered and dwelled in the fourth jhāna, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
With the fading away of ignorance and the arising of true knowledge, those taints, distressing and feverish, that arise with ignorance as condition no longer occur.
With the mind malleable and wieldy, his concentration becomes measureless and well developed.
With the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional activities; with the cessation of volitional activities, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of name-andform; with the cessation of name-and-form, cessation of the six sense bases; with the cessation of the six sense bases, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, dejection, and anguish cease.
With the remainderless fading away and cessation of the six bases for contact there is the cessation of proliferation, the subsiding of proliferation.”
With the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, he dwells compassionate toward all living beings.
With the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, he dwells compassionate toward all living beings.
With the rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious and kindly, he dwells compassionate toward all living beings.
With the simile of the piece of meat … with the simile of the grass torch … with the simile of the charcoal pit … with the simile of the dream … with the simile of the borrowed goods … with the simile of fruits on a tree … with the simile of the butcher’s knife and block … with the simile of the sword stake … with the simile of the snake’s head, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
With the simile of the skeleton the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
With the simile of the skeleton … … with the simile of the snake’s head, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, I enter and dwell in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, I enter and dwell in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the subsiding of thought and examination, I entered and dwelled in the second jhāna, which has internal placidity and unification of mind and consists of rapture and pleasure born of concentration, without thought and examination.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna through exertion.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna upon landing.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes an attainer of nibbāna without exertion.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes an attainer of nibbāna through exertion.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes an attainer of nibbāna upon landing.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes an attainer of nibbāna without exertion.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he becomes one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he is one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm … an attainer of nibbāna through exertion … an attainer of nibbāna without exertion … an attainer of nibbāna upon landing … an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, he is one of spontaneous birth, due to attain final nibbāna there without returning from that world.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, this person is an attainer of nibbāna in the interval.
With the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, this person is an attainer of nibbāna upon landing … an attainer of nibbāna without exertion … an attainer of nibbāna through exertion … one bound upstream, heading toward the Akaniṭṭha realm.
With the utter destruction of three fetters and with the diminishing of greed, hatred, and delusion, he is a once-returner who, after coming back to this world only one more time, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters and with the diminishing of greed, hatred, and delusion, he is a once-returner who, after coming back to this world only one more time, will make an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters and with the diminishing of greed, hatred, and delusion, this person is a once-returner who, after coming back to this world only one more time, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, he is a family-to-family attainer who, after roaming and wandering on among good families two or three times, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, he is a one-seed attainer who, after being reborn once more in human existence, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, he is a seven-times-at-most attainer who, after roaming and wandering on among devas and humans seven times at most, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, he is a stream-enterer, no longer subject to the lower world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, this person is a family-to-family attainer who, after roaming and wandering on among good families two or three times, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, this person is a one-seed attainer who, after being reborn once more as a human being, makes an end of suffering.
With the utter destruction of three fetters, this person is a seventimes-at-most attainer who, after roaming and wandering on among devas and humans seven times at most, makes an end of suffering.
With their minds in the grip of lust, without having given up the training and declared their weakness, they engaged in sexual intercourse.
With wisdom as his coat of plaster, the noble disciple abandons the unwholesome and develops the wholesome, abandons what is blameworthy and develops what is blameless, and maintains himself in purity.
Without applauding it, without rejecting it, they rose from their seats and left,: “We shall find out what the Blessed One has to say about this statement.”
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without approving or rejecting it, you should thoroughly learn those words and phrases and then check for them in the discourses and seek them in the discipline.
Without fulfilling right view, it is impossible for him to fulfill right concentration.
Without fulfilling the aggregate of concentration, it is impossible for him to fulfill the aggregate of wisdom.
Without fulfilling the aggregate of virtuous behavior, it is impossible for him to fulfill the aggregate of concentration.
Without fulfilling the factor of a trainee, it is impossible for him to fulfill the aggregate of virtuous behavior.
Without fulfilling the factor of a trainee, it is impossible for him to fulfill virtuous behavior.
Without fulfilling the factor of proper conduct, it is impossible for him to fulfill the factor of a trainee.
Without fulfilling virtuous behavior, it is impossible for him to fulfill right view.
Without having abandoned lust, hatred, and delusion, one is incapable of abandoning birth, old age, and death.
Without having abandoned the fetters, it is impossible that one will realize nibbāna.
Without having abandoned these five perils and enmities, one is called immoral and is reborn in hell.
Without having abandoned these five things, one is incapable of entering and dwelling in the first jhāna.
Without having abandoned these five things, one is incapable of entering and dwelling in the first jhāna.
Without having abandoned these five things, one is incapable of realizing the fruit of arahantship.
Without having abandoned these five things, one is incapable of realizing the fruit of arahantship.
Without having abandoned these nine things, one is incapable of realizing arahantship.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of contemplating phenomena in phenomena both internally and externally.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of contemplating the body in the body.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of entering and dwelling in the first jhāna.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of entering and dwelling in the first jhāna.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of realizing accomplishment in view.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of realizing any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of realizing arahantship.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of realizing arahantship.
Without having abandoned these six things, one is incapable of realizing the fruit of non-returning.
Without having abandoned these ten things, one is incapable of realizing arahantship.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning birth, old age, and death.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning careless attention, following a wrong path, and mental sluggishness.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning disrespect, being difficult to correct, and bad friendship.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning lack of desire to see the noble ones, lack of desire to hear the noble Dhamma, and a mind bent on criticism.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning lack of faith, uncharitableness, and laziness.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning lust, hatred, and delusion.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning muddle-mindedness, lack of clear comprehension, and mental distraction.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning personal-existence view, doubt, and wrong grasp of behavior and observances.
Without having abandoned these three things, one is incapable of abandoning restlessness, non-restraint, and immorality.
Without having fulfilled the duty of a trainee, it is impossible that he will fulfill virtuous behavior.
Without having fulfilled the duty of proper conduct, it is impossible that he will fulfill the duty of a trainee.
Without having fulfilled virtuous behavior, it is impossible that he will abandon sensual lust, lust for form, or lust for the formless.
Without having obtained the permission of the Nigaṇṭhas, let me go see that Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.”
Without hurrying, enter the porch, clear your throat, and tap on the bolt.
Without hurrying, he entered the porch, cleared his throat, and tapped on the bolt.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he believes a matter that merits suspicion.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he believes a matter that merits suspicion.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he believes a matter that merits suspicion.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he is suspicious about a matter that merits belief.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he is suspicious about a matter that merits belief.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he is suspicious about a matter that merits belief.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, he speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, one believes a matter that merits suspicion.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, one is suspicious about a matter that merits belief.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, one speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, one speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she believes a matter that merits suspicion.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she is suspicious about a matter that merits belief.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks dispraise of one who deserves praise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Without investigating and scrutinizing, she speaks praise of one who deserves dispraise.
Women die unsatisfied and discontent in these two things.”
Women flourish when concealed, not when exposed.
Worldly happiness and spiritual happiness.
Would that lump of salt make the river Ganges become salty and undrinkable?”
Would that lump of salt make the small quantity of water in the bowl salty and undrinkable?”
Would that suffice for calling him a clever and enterprising man?”
Would that suffice for calling him a clever and enterprising man?”
Would that suffice for calling him a clever and enterprising man?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘Darkness has disappeared and light has appeared’?
Wouldn’t you know: ‘Darkness will disappear and light will appear’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘Light has disappeared and darkness has appeared’?
Wouldn’t you know: ‘Light will disappear and darkness will appear’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These coals will grow, increase, and spread’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These coals will not grow, increase, and spread’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These coals will not grow, increase, and spread’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These seeds will grow, increase, and mature’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These seeds will not grow, increase, and mature’?”
Wouldn’t you know: ‘These seeds will not grow, increase, and mature’?”
Wrong action is the near shore, right action the far shore.
Wrong concentration is the near shore, right concentration the far shore.
Wrong effort is the near shore, right effort the far shore.
Wrong intention is the near shore, right intention the far shore.
Wrong knowledge is the near shore, right knowledge the far shore.
Wrong liberation is the near shore, right liberation the far shore.
Wrong livelihood is the near shore, right livelihood the far shore.
Wrong mindfulness is the near shore, right mindfulness the far shore.
Wrong practice is an obstruction to the heavens.
Wrong speech is the near shore, right speech the far shore.
Wrong view is the near shore, right view the far shore.
Wrong view is the near shore, right view the far shore.
Wrong view is the worst of things that are blameworthy.”
Wrong view … and wrong liberation.
Wrong view … and wrong liberation.
Wrong view … and wrong liberation.
Wrong view, bhikkhus, is the near shore, right view the far shore … Wrong liberation is the near shore, right liberation the far shore.
Wrong view, I say, is also threefold: caused by greed, caused by hatred, and caused by delusion.
Wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration, wrong knowledge, and wrong liberation.
Wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration, wrong knowledge, and wrong liberation.
Wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration, wrong knowledge, and wrong liberation.
Wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration, wrong knowledge, and wrong liberation.
Yet because of this the deity does not become displeased or discontent.
Yet he does not extol himself or disparage others because of this.
Yet he does not extol himself or disparage others because of this.
Yet he does not extol himself or disparage others because of this.
Yet he does not extol himself or disparage others because of this.
Yet he follows right behind a herd of cattle,: ‘I’m a cow too, I’m a cow too.’
Yet he follows right behind the Saṅgha of bhikkhus,: ‘I’m a bhikkhu too, I’m a bhikkhu too.’
Yet he says, ‘Then I kill him.’”
Yet I did not associate with those deities, converse with them, and engage in a discussion with them.
Yet I did not know about those deities: ‘These deities are from this or that order of devas.’ 
Yet I say that without having reached the end of the world there is no making an end of suffering.
Yet my mind is still not liberated from the taints through non-clinging.”
Yet the Blessed One outshone them all with his beauty and glory.
Yet the Blessed One says thus: ‘Yes, prince, I slept well.
Yet the hollow man Makkhali contradicts me: ‘There is no kamma, no deed, no energy.’
Yet the hollow man Makkhali contradicts them: ‘There is no kamma, no deed, no energy.’
Yet the hollow man Makkhali contradicts them: ‘There is no kamma, no deed, no energy.’
Yet the Venerable Mahākaccāna is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his wise fellow monks.
Yet the Venerable Ānanda is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his wise fellow monks.
Yet this emetic sometimes succeeds and sometimes fails.
Yet this person cannot graspanything from the talk,at its beginning, middle, and end,for he utterly lacks wisdom.
Yet this purgative sometimes succeeds and sometimes fails.
Yet this ‘Washing’ is low, common, for worldlings, ignoble, unbeneficial; it does not lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to nibbāna.
Yet you think you have to speak up!”
You are practicing for the abandoning of lust, hatred, and delusion, so you are practicing the good way in the world.
You can consume, eat, taste, and drink what is allowable, not what is unallowable.
You cannot live in communion with the bhikkhus.”
A third time that person remained silent.
You cannot live in communion with the bhikkhus.”
When this was said, that person remained silent.
You did not have a sense of moral shame in wholesome qualities.
You did not have energy in wholesome qualities.
You did not have moral dread in wholesome qualities.
You did not have wisdom in wholesome qualities.’
Any bhikkhu or bhikkhunī who gives up the training and reverts to the lower life incurs these five reasonable criticisms and grounds for censure in this very life.
You have abandoned lust, hatred, and delusion, cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them so that they are no more subject to future arising, so you are the fortunate ones in the world.
You have had a sense of moral shame in wholesome qualities.
You have had energy in wholesome qualities.
You have had moral dread in wholesome qualities.
You have had wisdom in wholesome qualities.’
Any bhikkhu or bhikkhunī who lives the complete and pure spiritual life, even with pain and dejection, weeping with a tearful face, gains these five reasonable grounds for praise in this very life.”
You know, householder, and so do I, that for the last sixteen years we have led the layperson’s celibate life.
You may consume, eat, taste, and drink within the proper time, not outside the proper time.’
He thinks: ‘Formerly, when I was a layman, I consumed whatever I wanted to consume and did not consume anything I did not wish to consume.
You may go at your own convenience.”
You may go at your own convenience.”
You may go at your own convenience.”
You may go at your own convenience.”
You reproved him falsely, not truthfully; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
You reproved him gently, not harshly; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You reproved him harshly, not gently; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
You reproved him in a beneficial way, not in a harmful way; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You reproved him in a harmful way, not in a beneficial way; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
You reproved him truthfully, not falsely; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You reproved him while harboring hatred, not with a mind of loving-kindness; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.’
When a bhikkhu reproves in a way contrary to the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
You reproved him with a mind of loving-kindness, not while harboring hatred; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.’
When a bhikkhu reproves in accordance with the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
You should answer as you see fit.
You should answer as you see fit.
You should answer as you see fit.
You should answer as you see fit.”
You should constantly remove delusion.
You should constantly remove hatred.
You should constantly remove vehemence.
You should develop it while engaged in work and while living at home in a house full of children.
You should develop it while engaged in work and while living at home in a house full of children.”
You should develop it with rapture; you should develop it without rapture; you should develop it accompanied by comfort; and you should develop it accompanied by equanimity.
You should develop it with rapture; you should develop it without rapture; you should develop it accompanied by comfort; and you should develop it accompanied by equanimity.
You should develop it with rapture; you should develop it without rapture; you should develop it accompanied by comfort; and you should develop it accompanied by equanimity.
You should develop it with rapture; you should develop it without rapture; you should develop it accompanied by comfort; and you should develop it accompanied by equanimity.
You should dwell without leakages,guarded, ever-mindful in the restraintstaught by the One with Vision,the Kinsman of the Sun.
You should have retained it in mind as he would have explained it to you.”
You should have retained it in mind as he would have explained it to you.”
You should not be content merely with this much,: ‘We have presented robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicines and provisions for the sick to the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.’
Therefore, householders, you should train yourselves thus: ‘How can we from time to time enter and dwell in the rapture of solitude?’
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.”
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.”
You should remember Hatthaka of Āḷavī as one who possesses these eight astounding and amazing qualities.”
You should remember Hatthaka of Āḷavī as one who possesses these seven astounding and amazing qualities.”
This is what the Blessed One said.
You should remember the householder Ugga of Hatthigāma as one who possesses these eight astounding and amazing qualities.”
You should remember the householder Ugga of Vesālī as one who possesses these eight astounding and amazing qualities.”
You should retain it in mind as the Blessed One explains it to you.”
You should retain it in mind as the Blessed One explains it to you.”
You should serve them and dedicate the offering to me.
You were reproved by one harboring hatred, not by one with a mind of loving-kindness; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.’
When a bhikkhu is reproved in a way contrary to the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
You were reproved by one with a mind of loving-kindness, not by one harboring hatred; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.’
When a bhikkhu is reproved in accordance with the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
You were reproved falsely, not truthfully; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You were reproved gently, not harshly; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
You were reproved harshly, not gently; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You were reproved in a beneficial way, not in a harmful way; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
You were reproved in a harmful way, not in a beneficial way; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.
You were reproved truthfully, not falsely; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.
Young devas come to me even from a distance,: ‘We will hear the Dhamma from the young deva Hatthaka.’
Your acumen is excellent.
Your acumen is excellent.
Your acumen is excellent.
Your acumen is excellent.
Your discernment is excellent.
Your discernment is excellent.
Your discernment is excellent.
Your discernment is excellent.
Your inquiry is a good one.
Your inquiry is a good one.
Your inquiry is a good one.
Your inquiry is a good one.
You’ve stayed here long enough.”
You’ve stayed here long enough.”
Ānanda has great wisdom.
Ānanda is wise.
Ānanda, the Tathāgata can convey his voice as far as he wants in a thousand-to-the-third-power great world system.”
– Here, one kind of excellent thoroughbred horse … … possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
– Here, one kind of excellent thoroughbred person … … possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
– Here, one kind of good horse … … possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
– Here, one person who is like a good horse … … possesses speed, beauty, and the right proportions.
– I do not say of every observance that it should be undertaken; nor do I say of every observance that it should not be undertaken.
– I do not say that one should attain every kind of liberation; nor do I say that one should not attain any kind of liberation.
– I do not say that one should make every kind of relinquishment; nor do I say that one should not make any kind of relinquishment.
– I do not say that one should strive in every way; nor do I say that one should not strive in any way.
– It is because the Tathāgata is released, detached, and emancipated from birth … old age … death … suffering … defilements that he dwells with a mind free from boundaries.
– It is because the Tathāgata is released, detached, and emancipated from feeling … perception … volitional activities … consciousness that he dwells with a mind free from boundaries.
– “Again, a bhikkhu is devoid of lust for the body, devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it….
– “Again, a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for the body, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it ….
– “Again, a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for the body, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it….
– “Again, a bhikkhu is not perplexed about the Dhamma … not perplexed about the Saṅgha … not perplexed about the training … is not irritated by his fellow monks, is pleased with them, not aggressive toward them, well disposed toward them.
– “Again, a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Dhamma … perplexed about the Saṅgha … perplexed about the training … is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, aggressive toward them, ill disposed toward them.
– “Again, a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Dhamma … perplexed about the Saṅgha … perplexed about the training … is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, aggressive toward them, ill disposed toward them.
– “Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has developed and well developed the four bases for psychic potency … the five spiritual faculties … the seven factors of enlightenment … the noble eightfold path.
– “Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has developed and well developed the four right strivings … the four bases for psychic potency … the five spiritual faculties … the five powers … the seven factors of enlightenment … the noble eightfold path.
– “Again, a noble disciple, having abandoned the taking of what is not given, abstains from taking what is not given … abstains from sexual misconduct … abstains from false speech … abstains from liquor, wine, and intoxicants, the basis for heedlessness.
– “Again, by completely surmounting the base of the infinity of space, ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of consciousness ….
– “Again, friend, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space … the base of the infinity of consciousness … the base of nothingness … the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
– “Again, friend, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space … the base of the infinity of consciousness … the base of nothingness … the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
– “Again, friend, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space … the base of the infinity of consciousness … the base of nothingness … the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception; and he understands it with wisdom.
– “Again, friend, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna … and he understands it with wisdom.
– “Again, friend, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna ….
– “Again, friend, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna ….
– “Again, some person fulfills virtuous behavior and concentration but cultivates wisdom only to a moderate extent.
– “Again, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna ….
– “And how, bhikkhus, does a person who is like a good horse … possess speed, beauty, and the right proportions?
– “And how, bhikkhus, does an excellent thoroughbred person … possess speed, beauty, and the right proportions?
– “And how, bhikkhus, is there a threefold corruption and failure of bodily kamma … a fourfold corruption and failure of verbal kamma … … a threefold corruption and failure of mental kamma?
– “And how, bhikkhus, is there a threefold success of bodily kamma … a fourfold success of verbal kamma … … a threefold success of mental kamma?
– “And why should the fire of hatred … the fire of delusion be abandoned and avoided and not be cultivated?
– “Bhikkhus, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, no volition need be exerted: ‘Let non-regret arise in me.’
It is natural that non-regret arises in a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous.
– “Bhikkhus, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, no volition need be exerted: ‘Let non-regret arise in me.’
It is natural that non-regret arises in one who is virtuous, one whose behavior is virtuous.
– “By completely surmounting the base of the infinity of space, ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of consciousness ….
– “For one of right intention, wrong intention is ejected … For one of right speech, wrong speech is ejected … For one of right action, wrong action is ejected … For one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is ejected … For one of right effort, wrong effort is ejected … For one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is ejected … For one of right concentration, wrong concentration is ejected … For one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is ejected – “For one of right intention, wrong intention is purged … For one of right speech, wrong speech is purged … For one of right action, wrong action is purged … For one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is purged … For one of right effort, wrong effort is purged … For one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is purged … For one of right concentration, wrong concentration is purged … For one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is purged – “For one of right intention, wrong intention is vomited up … For one of right speech, wrong speech is vomited up … For one of right action, wrong action is vomited up … For one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is vomited up … For one of right effort, wrong effort is vomited up … For one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is vomited up … For one of right concentration, wrong concentration is vomited up … For one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is vomited up – “For one of right intention, wrong intention is washed away … For one of right speech, wrong speech is washed away … For one of right action, wrong action is washed away … For one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is washed away … For one of right effort, wrong effort is washed away … For one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is washed away … For one of right concentration, wrong concentration is washed away … For one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is washed away – “Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhāna ….
– “Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhāna ….
– “Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhāna ….
– “Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhāna ….
– “Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhāna ….
– “How is it then, Master Gotama, is the world finite?
– “I do not say, householder, of every kind of austerity that it should be practiced; nor do I say of every kind of austerity that it should not be practiced.
– “If he so wished, friends, a bhikkhu possessing psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind might focus on that block of wood as beautiful … as unattractive.
– “If he so wished, friends, a bhikkhu possessing psychic potency who has attained mastery of mind might focus on that block of wood as water … as fire … as air.
– “If, householder, when one attains a particular liberation, unwholesome qualities increase and wholesome qualities decline, then, I say, one should not attain such a liberation.
– “If, householder, when one practices a particular austerity, unwholesome qualities increase and wholesome qualities decline, then, I say, one should not practice such austerity.
– “If, householder, when one relinquishes something, unwholesome qualities increase and wholesome qualities decline, then, I say, one should not make such a relinquishment.
– “If, householder, when one strives in a particular way, unwholesome qualities increase and wholesome qualities decline, then, I say, one should not strive in such a way.
– “If, householder, when one undertakes a particular observance, unwholesome qualities increase and wholesome qualities decline, then, I say, one should not undertake such an observance.
– “Just as, bhikkhus, in this Jambudīpa delightful parks, groves, landscapes, and lotus ponds are few, while more numerous are the hills and slopes, rivers that are hard to cross, places with stumps and thorns, and rugged mountains, so too those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among human beings.
– “Someone else gives a gift to an ascetic or a brahmin: food and drink … and lighting.
– “Then I recall, bhikkhus, approaching an assembly consisting of many hundreds of brahmins … an assembly consisting of many hundreds of householders … an assembly consisting of many hundreds of ascetics … an assembly consisting of many hundreds of the devas the four great kings … an assembly consisting of many hundreds of the Tāvatiṃsa devas … an assembly consisting of many hundreds under Māra … an assembly consisting of many hundreds under Brahmā.
– “There are, brahmin, these three fires that should be abandoned and avoided and should not be cultivated.
– “There are, brahmin, these three fires that should be properly and happily maintained, having honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated them.
– “Thus, bhikkhus, there is penetration to final knowledge as far as meditative attainments accompanied by perception reach.
– “When it was said by the Blessed One: ‘A question about five, a concise statement about five, an explanation of five,’ with reference to what was this said?
– “When it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, I say that the destruction of the taints also occurs in dependence on the base of the infinity of consciousness … the base of nothingness,’ for what reason was this said?
– “When it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, I say that the destruction of the taints also occurs in dependence on the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna – “When, bhikkhu, this concentration has been developed and well developed by you in this way, then you should train yourself thus: ‘I will develop and cultivate the liberation of the mind by compassion … the liberation of the mind by altruistic joy … the liberation of the mind by equanimity, make it a vehicle and basis, carry it out, consolidate it, and properly undertake it.’
Thus should you train yourself.
– “When, bhikkhu, this concentration has been developed and well developed by you in this way, then you should train yourself thus: ‘I will dwell contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed longing and dejection in regard to the world.’
Thus should you train yourself.
– “When, bhikkhus, by completely surmounting the base of the infinity of space, ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of consciousness ….
– “When, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna … on that occasion it occurs to the bhikkhu: ‘Now I am secure from danger and Māra cannot do anything to me.’
It also occurs to Māra the Evil One: ‘Now the bhikkhu is secure from danger and I cannot do anything to him.’
– “With the subsiding of thought and examination, he enters and dwells in the second jhāna … the third jhāna … the fourth jhāna ….
– “Wrong intention is non-Dhamma; right intention is the Dhamma … Wrong speech is non-Dhamma; right speech is the Dhamma … Wrong action is non-Dhamma; right action is the Dhamma … Wrong livelihood is non-Dhamma; right livelihood is the Dhamma … Wrong effort is non-Dhamma; right effort is the Dhamma … Wrong mindfulness is non-Dhamma; right mindfulness is the Dhamma … Wrong concentration is non-Dhamma; right concentration is the Dhamma … Wrong knowledge is non-Dhamma; right knowledge is the Dhamma – “… Here some person dwells contemplating impermanence in the form aggregate … the feeling aggregate … the perception aggregate … the volitional activities aggregate … the consciousness aggregate … dwells contemplating suffering … dwells contemplating non-self … dwells contemplating destruction … dwells contemplating vanishing … dwells contemplating fading away … dwells contemplating cessation … dwells contemplating relinquishment …” 
– “… in craving for forms … craving for sounds … craving for odors … craving for tastes … craving for tactile objects … craving for mental phenomena – “… in examination of forms … examination of sounds … examination of odors … examination of tastes … examination of tactile objects … examination of mental phenomena – “… in eye-consciousness … ear-consciousness … nose-consciousness … tongue-consciousness … body-consciousness … mind-consciousness – “… in eye-contact … ear-contact … nosecontact … tongue-contact … body-contact … mind-contact – “… in feeling born of eye-contact … feeling born of ear-contact … feeling born of nose-contact … feeling born of tongue-contact … feeling born of body-contact … feeling born of mind-contact – “… in perception of forms … perception of sounds … perception of odors … perception of tastes … perception of tactile objects … perception of mental phenomena – “… in thought about forms … thought about sounds … thought about odors … thought about tastes … thought about tactile objects … thought about mental phenomena – “… in volition regarding forms … volition regarding sounds … volition regarding odors … volition regarding tastes … volition regarding tactile objects … volition regarding mental phenomena – “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn among human beings.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn among the devas.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among the devas.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn among human beings.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn among the devas.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn among human beings.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn among the devas.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from the sphere of afflicted spirits, are reborn among human beings.
– “… so too those beings are few who, when they pass away from the sphere of afflicted spirits, are reborn among the devas.
– “…Here some person dwells contemplating impermanence in the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … the mind … in forms … sounds … odors … tastes … tactile objects … mental phenomena ‘ I will speak at a proper time, not at an improper time; I will speak truthfully, not falsely; I will speak gently, not harshly; I will speak in a beneficial way, not in a harmful way; I will speak with a mind of loving-kindness, not while harboring hatred.’
These are the five things that he should establish in himself.
‘A boil’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘A dart’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘A morally shameless person’ … ‘A morally reckless person’ … ‘A lazy person’ … ‘An unwise person’ … ‘An angry person’ … ‘A hostile person’ … ‘A person of evil desires’ … ‘A person with bad friends’ … ‘A person who holds wrong view’: this is a case of decline.
‘A person with a sense of moral shame’ … ‘A person with moral dread’ … ‘An energetic person’ … ‘A wise person’ … ‘A person without anger’ … ‘A person without hostility’ … ‘A person without evil desires’ … ‘A person with good friends’ … ‘A person who holds right view’: this is a case of non-decline.”
‘A swamp’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘A tie’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘A womb’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘All conditioned phenomena will appear to me as unlasting.
‘Bhikkhus, Hatthaka of Āḷavī is endowed with faith.
‘Boil’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘Brahmin’ is a designation for the Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
‘Disease’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘Disease’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘First deities’ is a designation for mother and father.
‘First teachers’ is a designation for mother and father.
‘First teachers’ is a designation for mother and father.
‘Further, for the donor too it is not fruitless.’”
‘Gift-worthy’ is a designation for mother and father.
‘Giftworthy’ is a designation for mother and father.
‘Greed,’ bhikkhus, is a designation for the five objects of sensual pleasure.
‘Greed,’ bhikkhus, is a designation for the five objects of sensual pleasure.
‘Greed,’ friends, is a designation for the five objects of sensual pleasure.
‘Greed,’ friends, is a designation for the five objects of sensual pleasure.
‘Having been supported by us, he will support us.
‘He might insult me, revile me, and do me harm.’
Therefore such a person is to be looked upon with equanimity, not to be associated with, followed, and served.
‘Healer’ … ‘Master of knowledge’ … ‘One unstained’ … ‘Stainless one’ … ‘Knower’ … ‘Liberated one’ is a designation for the Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.”
‘I am one who gains the first jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus … he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
‘I am one who gains the first jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male and female lay followers, kings and royal ministers, sectarian teachers and their disciples.
‘I am one who gains the fourth jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus … he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
‘I am one who gains the fourth jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male and female lay followers, kings and royal ministers, sectarian teachers and their disciples.
‘I am one who gains the markless mental concentration,’ he bonds with bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male and female lay followers, kings and royal ministers, sectarian teachers and their disciples.
‘I am one who gains the second jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus … he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
‘I am one who gains the second jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male and female lay followers, kings and royal ministers, sectarian teachers and their disciples.
‘I am one who gains the third jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus … he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
‘I am one who gains the third jhāna,’ he bonds with bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male and female lay followers, kings and royal ministers, sectarian teachers and their disciples.
‘I will be without identification in the entire world.
‘In such a way I will fulfill the aggregate of virtuous behavior that I have not yet fulfilled or assist with wisdom in various respects the aggregate of virtuous behavior that I have fulfilled.
‘Let me not cause harm to small creatures that might cross my track.’
‘Let my training not be lost.’
‘Let no hatred arise in me toward things provocative of hatred!’: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive.
‘Let no hatred arise in me toward things provocative of hatred, and no lust toward things provocative of lust!’: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in both the repulsive and the unrepulsive.
‘Let no lust arise in me toward things provocative of lust!’: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive.
‘Let no lust arise in me toward things provocative of lust, and no hatred toward things provocative of hatred!’: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the repulsive in both the unrepulsive and the repulsive.
‘Let no lust at all arise in me anywhere in any way regarding things provocative of lust!
‘May we not speak falsely, and may we not misrepresent another with what is contrary to fact.’
For these two reasons fauns do not utter human speech.” 
‘May what is subject to death not die!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to death not die!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to destruction not be destroyed!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to destruction not be destroyed!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to illness not fall ill!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to illness not fall ill!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic … or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to loss not be lost!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic or a brahmin, by a deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to loss not be lost!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic or a brahmin, by a deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or by anyone in the world….
‘May what is subject to old age not grow old!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic or a brahmin, by a deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or by anyone in the world.
‘May what is subject to old age not grow old!’: this is a situation that is unobtainable by an ascetic or a brahmin, by a deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or by anyone in the world.
‘My secret deliberations shouldn’t spread to others!’ It is in this way that a master thief moves alone.
‘Since we are similar with regard to virtuous behavior, we will have a discussion on virtuous behavior, and it will flow on smoothly between us, and we will feel at ease.
‘Suffering’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘Suffering’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘Swamp’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘The perception of disenchantment will be established in me toward all conditioned phenomena, as toward a murderer with uplifted dagger.
‘The peril of crocodiles’ is a designation for gluttony.
‘The peril of fierce fish’ is a designation for women.
‘The peril of waves’ is a designation for anger and irritation.
‘The peril of whirlpools’ is a designation for the five objects of sensual pleasure.
‘The result of taking what is not given … … sexual misconduct … … false speech … … divisive speech … … harsh speech … … idle chatter … … longing … … ill will … … wrong view is bad both in this present life and in future lives.’
Having reflected thus, he abandons wrong view; he descends from wrong view.
‘The result of wrong intention … … wrong speech … … wrong action … … wrong livelihood … … wrong effort … … wrong mindfulness … … wrong concentration … … wrong knowledge … … wrong liberation is bad both in this present life and in future lives.’
Having reflected thus, he abandons wrong liberation; he descends from wrong liberation.
‘The world is finite’ … ‘The world is infinite’ … ‘The soul and the body are the same’ … ‘The soul is one thing, the body another’ … ‘The Tathāgata exists after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata does not exist after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata both exists and does not exist after death’ … ‘The Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist after death; this alone is true, anything else is wrong’: this is a speculative view.
‘The world is not eternal; this alone is true, anything else is wrong’: this is a speculative view.
‘These are the six bases for contact’ … ‘These are the eighteen mental examinations’ … ‘These are the four noble truths’: this, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma taught by me that is unrefuted, undefiled, irreproachable, and uncensured by wise ascetics and brahmins.
‘This bhikkhu has truly learned much … and penetrated well by view,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu is truly easy to correct and possesses qualities that make him easy to correct; he is patient and receives instruction respectfully,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu is truly skillful and diligent … in order to carry out and arrange them properly,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu is truly virtuous….
‘This bhikkhu truly has aroused energy … … not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu truly has good friends, good companions, good comrades,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu truly is content with any kind of robe, almsfood, lodging, and medicines and provisions for the sick,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu truly is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and alertness, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu truly is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This bhikkhu truly loves the Dhamma and is pleasing in his assertions, filled with a lofty joy pertaining to the Dhamma and discipline,’ the elder bhikkhus, those of middle standing, and the junior bhikkhus think he should be corrected and instructed.
‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’ is what one has not known, seen, attained, realized, and penetrated, and it is for the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, and penetrating this that one lives the spiritual life under the Blessed One.
‘Tie’ is a designation for sensual pleasures.
‘We will offer only peaceful service to our fellow monks,’ it is in such a way, Sāriputta, that you should train yourselves.
‘You did not have faith in wholesome qualities.
‘You have had faith in wholesome qualities.
“ An elder is of long standing and has long gone forth.
“ An elder is of long standing and has long gone forth.
“ Because he has given a gift out of faith, wherever the result of that gift is produced, he becomes rich, with great wealth and property, and he is handsome, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
“ Because he was overcome and obsessed by gain, Devadatta is bound for the plane of misery, bound for hell, and he will remain there for an eon, unredeemable.
“ Bhante, in what way can a bhikkhu dwell at ease while living in the Saṅgha?”
“ Bhikkhus, it is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive.
“ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is irreverent and undeferential, and his behavior is uncongenial to his fellow monks, it is impossible for him to fulfill the factor of proper conduct.
“ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is irreverent and undeferential, and his behavior is uncongenial to his fellow monks, it is impossible for him to fulfill the factor of proper conduct.
“ Bhikkhus, when an uninstructed worldling meets with gain, he does not reflect thus: ‘This gain that I have met is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change.’
He does not understand it as it really is.
“ But, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is reverential and deferential, and his behavior is congenial to his fellow monks, it is possible for him to fulfill the duty of proper conduct.
“ But, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is reverential and deferential, and his behavior is congenial to his fellow monks, it is possible for him to fulfill the factor of proper conduct.
“ He knows what is an offense.
“ He knows what is an offense.
“ He knows what is an offense.
“ He knows what is an offense.
“ Here, a bhikkhu develops the basis for psychic potency that possesses concentration due to desire and activities of striving.
“ Here, a bhikkhu is virtuous; he dwells restrained by the Pātimokkha, possessed of good conduct and resort, seeing danger in minute faults.
“ Here, a head-anointed khattiya king is well born on both his maternal and paternal sides, of pure descent, unassailable and impeccable with respect to birth as far back as the seventh paternal generation.
“ Here, bhikkhus, some person has not abandoned the lower fetters, the fetters for obtaining rebirth, or the fetters for obtaining existence.
“ Here, Kimbila, after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna, the bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male lay followers, and female lay followers dwell with reverence and deference toward the Teacher.
“ Here, Kimbila, after a Tathāgata has attained final nibbāna, the bhikkhus, bhikkhunīs, male lay followers, and female lay followers dwell without reverence and deference toward the Teacher.
“ I developed the basis for psychic potency that possesses concentration due to desire and activities of striving.
“ In whatever way, friend, one sees such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs: this is the foremost sight.
“ Removal by presence may be applied; removal by memory may be applied; removal on account of past insanity may be applied; the acknowledgment of an offense may be applied; the majority opinion may be applied; a charge of aggravated misconduct may be applied; and covering over with grass may be applied.
“ The perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of unattractiveness, the perception of danger, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation, the perception of non-delight in the entire world, the perception of impermanence in all conditioned phenomena, and mindfulness of breathing.
“ There is, friend, Brahmā, the vanquisher, the unvanquished, the universal seer, the wielder of power.
“ Udāyī, when people see an elephant possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ When people see a horse possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ When people see a bull possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ When people see a serpent possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ When people see a tree possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ When people see a human being possessed of a large massive body, they say: ‘A nāga, truly a nāga!’ But, Udāyī, in the world with its devas, Māra, and Brahmā, in this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, I call one a nāga who does no evil by body, speech, and mind.”
“ understands: ‘Whatever bad deed I did here in the past with this deed-born body is all to be experienced here.
“ understands: ‘Whatever bad deed I did here in the past with this deed-born body is all to be experienced here.
“ When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using a robe, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
“ When a bhikkhu enters and dwells in a measureless concentration of mind while using a robe, one acquires a measureless stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, a nutriment of happiness … that leads … to one’s welfare and happiness.
“ ‘Am I often given to longing or without longing?
“ ‘Am I often without longing?
“ ‘An uninstructed worldling, though himself subject to death, not exempt from death, feels repelled, humiliated, and disgusted when he sees another who has died, overlooking his own situation.
“ ‘An uninstructed worldling, though himself subject to illness, not exempt from illness, feels repelled, humiliated, and disgusted when he sees another who is ill, overlooking his own situation.
“ ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion arises and arisen delusion increases and expands?’
You should answer: ‘Careless attention.
“ ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen delusion does not arise and arisen delusion is abandoned?’
You should answer: ‘Careful attention.
“ ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred arises and arisen hatred increases and expands?’
You should answer: ‘A repulsive object.
“ ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen hatred does not arise and arisen hatred is abandoned?’
You should answer: ‘The liberation of the mind by loving-kindness.
“ ‘But what, friends, is the reason unarisen lust does not arise and arisen lust is abandoned?’
You should answer: ‘An unattractive object.
“ ‘But, friends, what is the reason unarisen lust arises and arisen lust increases and expands?’
You should answer: ‘An attractive object.
“ ‘The wheel that took six days to finish, lord, has a rim that is crooked, faulty, and defective; spokes that are crooked, faulty, and defective; and a nave that is crooked, faulty, and defective.
“ ‘Why is it, friend chariotmaker, that the wheel that took six days to finish rolled as far as the impetus carried it, and then wobbled and fell to the ground, while the wheel that took six months less six days to finish rolled as far as the impetus carried it and then stood still as if fixed on an axle?’
“ ‘Yes, sir, in matters pertaining to tasks and administrative duties, to edicts and proclamations, King Eḷeyya is wise and more astute even than those who are very astute.’
“ … ‘The result of wrong intention is bad both in this present life and in future lives.’
Having reflected thus, he abandons wrong intention; he descends from wrong intention.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith and virtuous but he does not gain internal serenity of mind; thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith and virtuous, and he may gain internal serenity of mind, but he does not gain the higher wisdom of insight into phenomena; thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith and virtuous, but he is not learned … … learned, but not a speaker on the Dhamma … … a speaker on the Dhamma, but not one who frequents assemblies … … one who frequents assemblies, but not one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly … … one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly, but not an expert on the discipline … … an expert on the discipline, but not a forest-dweller who resorts to remote lodgings … … a forest-dweller who resorts to remote lodgings, but not one who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life … … one who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life, but not one who, with the destruction of the taints, has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwells in it.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith and virtuous, but he is not learned; thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith and virtuous, but he is not learned; thus he is incomplete with respect to that factor.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith, virtuous, and learned, but he is not a speaker on the Dhamma … … a speaker on the Dhamma, but not one who frequents assemblies … … one who frequents assemblies, but not one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly … … one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly, but he is not one who contacts with the body and dwells in those peaceful emancipations, transcending forms, that are formless … … one who contacts with the body and dwells in those peaceful emancipations, transcending forms, that are formless, but not one who, with the destruction of the taints, has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwells in it.
“A bhikkhu may be endowed with faith, virtuous, and learned, but he is not a speaker on the Dhamma … … a speaker on the Dhamma, but not one who frequents assemblies … … one who frequents assemblies, but not one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly … … one who confidently teaches the Dhamma to an assembly, but not one who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life … … one who gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life, but not one who, with the destruction of the taints, has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwells in it.
“A bhikkhu should possess these eight qualities to be agreed upon as an exhorter of bhikkhunīs.”
“A bhikkhu thus perfectly liberated in mind, Vappa, achieves six constant dwellings.
“A bhikkhu who is competent, disciplined, self-confident, learned, an expert on the Dhamma, practicing in accordance with the Dhamma, adorns the Saṅgha.
“A bhikkhu who possesses ten qualities, Upāli, may be agreed upon to adjudicate.
“A bhikkhu who possesses ten qualities, Upāli, may be attended upon by a novice.
“A bhikkhu who possesses ten qualities, Upāli, may give dependence.
“A bhikkhu who possesses ten qualities, Upāli, may give full ordination.
“A bhikkhu who possesses these eight qualities is one who inspires confidence in all respects and who is complete in all aspects.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these eight qualities is one who inspires confidence in all respects and who is complete in all aspects.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these four qualities is incapable of decline and is in the vicinity of nibbāna.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these ten qualities is one who inspires confidence in all respects and who is complete in all aspects.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these ten qualities is one who inspires confidence in all respects and who is complete in all aspects.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these ten qualities is one who inspires confidence in all respects and who is complete in all aspects.” 
“A bhikkhu who possesses these ten qualities may be attended upon by a novice.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these ten qualities may give dependence.”
“A bhikkhu who possesses these three qualities is practicing the unmistaken way and has laid the groundwork for the destruction of the taints.”
“A bhikkhunī must in no way insult or revile a bhikkhu.
“A bhikkhunī should not enter upon the rains in a place where there are no bhikkhus.
“A bhikkhunī who has been ordained for a hundred years should pay homage to a bhikkhu who has been ordained that same day, should rise up for him, reverentially salute him, and behave courteously toward him.
“A bhikkhunī who has been ordained for a hundred years should pay homage to a bhikkhu who has been ordained that same day, should rise up for him, reverentially salute him, and behave properly toward him.
“A bhikkhunī who has committed a grave offense should observe a half-month’s penalty period before both Saṅghas.
“A donor, Sīha, a munificent giver, is dear and agreeable to many people.
“A great fire all ablazesettles down when deprived of fuel,and when all the coals have gone out,it is said to be extinguished.
“A half-month after my full ordination I realized the analytical knowledge of discernment by way of its divisions and formulation.
“A half-month after my full ordination I realized the analytical knowledge of language by way of its divisions and formulation.
“A half-month after my full ordination I realized the analytical knowledge of the Dhamma by way of its divisions and formulation.
“A half-month, friends, after my full ordination I realized the analytical knowledge of meaning by way of its divisions and formulation.
“A householder or householder’s son or one born in some other clan hears this Dhamma.
“A householder or householder’s son or one born in some other clan hears this Dhamma.
“A human being who is fully enlightened,self-tamed and concentrated,traveling on the path of brahmā,he takes delight in peace of mind.
“A man, bhikkhus, attends internally to his masculine faculty, his masculine comportment, his masculine appearance, his masculine aspect, his masculine desire, his masculine voice, his masculine ornamentation.
“A man, bhikkhus, does not attend internally to his masculine faculty … his masculine ornamentation.
“A man, brahmin, is the aim of women; their quest is for adornments; sons are their support; they are intent on being without a rival; and their final goal is authority.”
“A man, Sujātā, might have these seven kinds of wives.
“A master of the threefold knowledge in the Noble One’s discipline, Master Gotama, is quite different from a master of the threefold knowledge according to the brahmins.
“A mind defiled by lust is not liberated, and wisdom defiled by ignorance is not developed.
“A probationer who has completed two years of training in the six principles should seek full ordination from both Saṅghas.
“A rag-robe is a trifle among robes, easily gained and blameless.
“A talk is wrongly addressed when, having weighed one type of person against another, it is addressed to these five types of persons.
“A thousand times the world in which the sun and moon revolve and light up the quarters with their brightness is called a thousandfold minor world system.
“A woman or a man should develop this liberation of mind by equanimity.
“A woman or a man should develop this liberation of mind by loving-kindness.
“A woman, bhikkhus, attends internally to her feminine faculty, her feminine comportment, her feminine appearance, her feminine aspect, her feminine desire, her feminine voice, her feminine ornamentation.
“A woman, bhikkhus, does not attend internally to her feminine faculty … to her feminine ornamentation.
“A world that is a thousand times a thousandfold minor world system is called a thousand-to-the-second-power middling world system.
“Abandon bodily misconduct and develop bodily good conduct; do not be heedless in this.
“Abhaya, these three kinds of wearing-away purification have been properly expounded by the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One who knows and sees, for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and dejection, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of nibbāna.
“After his meal, on returning from his alms round, he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, straightening his body, and establishing mindfulness in front of him.
“After the asuras had entered their city, it occurred to them: ‘Now we’re secure from danger and the devas cannot do anything to us.’
It also occurred to the devas: ‘Now the asuras are secure from danger and we cannot do anything to them.’
“After the devas had entered their city, it occurred to them: ‘Now we’re secure from danger and the asuras cannot do anything to us.’
It also occurred to the asuras: ‘Now the devas are secure from danger and we cannot do anything to them.’
“Afterward, when he departs from two states, longing and ill will, then, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters and dwells in the first jhāna, which consists of rapture and pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by thought and examination.
“Again, a bad person discloses his own virtues even when not asked about them, how much more then when asked.
“Again, a bad person does not disclose his own faults even when asked about them, how much less then when not asked.
“Again, a bad person does not disclose the virtues of others even when asked about them, how much less then when not asked.
“Again, a bad report circulates about an immoral person deficient in virtuous behavior.
“Again, a bhikkhu desires training and he speaks in praise of undertaking the training.
“Again, a bhikkhu develops serenity and insight in conjunction.
“Again, a bhikkhu develops serenity preceded by insight.
“Again, a bhikkhu does not desire training and he does not speak in praise of undertaking the training.
“Again, a bhikkhu does not show hospitality to his fellow monks and he does not speak in praise of one who shows hospitality.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both openly and privately possessing in common with his fellow monks a view that is noble and emancipating, which leads out, for one who acts upon it, to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both openly and privately possessing in common with his fellow monks a view that is noble and emancipating, which leads out, for one who acts upon it, to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both openly and privately possessing in common with his fellow monks virtuous behavior that is unbroken, flawless, unblemished, unblotched, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both openly and privately possessing in common with his fellow monks virtuous behavior that is unbroken, flawless, unblemished, unblotched, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
“Again, a bhikkhu finds delight in development, is delighted with development, finds delight in abandoning, is delighted with abandoning.
“Again, a bhikkhu gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life.
“Again, a bhikkhu gets to hear at will, without trouble or difficulty, talk concerned with the austere life that is conducive to opening up the heart, that is, talk on fewness of desires, on contentment, on solitude, on not getting bound up, on arousing energy, on virtuous behavior, on concentration, on wisdom, on liberation, on the knowledge and vision of liberation.
“Again, a bhikkhu has aroused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong, firm in exertion, not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities.
“Again, a bhikkhu has aroused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong, firm in exertion, not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities.
“Again, a bhikkhu has aroused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong, firm in exertion, not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities.
“Again, a bhikkhu has aroused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong, firm in exertion, not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities.
“Again, a bhikkhu has aroused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong, firm in exertion, not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities.
“Again, a bhikkhu has done some work.
“Again, a bhikkhu has done some work.
“Again, a bhikkhu has evil desires and he does not speak in praise of the removal of desire.
“Again, a bhikkhu has few desires and he speaks in praise of the removal of desire.
“Again, a bhikkhu has good friends, good companions, good comrades.
“Again, a bhikkhu has good friends, good companions, good comrades.
“Again, a bhikkhu has good friends, good companions, good comrades.
“Again, a bhikkhu has good friends, good companions, good comrades.
“Again, a bhikkhu has grasped well the object of reviewing, attended to it well, sustained it well, and penetrated it well with wisdom.
“Again, a bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned.
“Again, a bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned.
“Again, a bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned.
“Again, a bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and accumulates what he has learned.
“Again, a bhikkhu has made a trip.
“Again, a bhikkhu has made a trip.
“Again, a bhikkhu has recovered from illness.
“Again, a bhikkhu has recovered from illness.
“Again, a bhikkhu has to make a trip.
“Again, a bhikkhu has to make a trip.
“Again, a bhikkhu has walked for alms in a village or town and has gotten as much food as he needs, whether coarse or excellent.
“Again, a bhikkhu has walked for alms in a village or town and has gotten as much food as he needs, whether coarse or excellent.
“Again, a bhikkhu has walked for alms in a village or town but has not gotten as much food as he needs, whether coarse or excellent.
“Again, a bhikkhu has walked for alms in a village or town but has not gotten as much food as he needs, whether coarse or excellent.
“Again, a bhikkhu is a denigrator and insolent … … envious and miserly … … crafty and hypocritical … … one who has evil desires and wrong view … … one who adheres to his own views, holds to them tenaciously, and relinquishes them with difficulty.
“Again, a bhikkhu is a little ill.
“Again, a bhikkhu is a little ill.
“Again, a bhikkhu is content with any kind of almsfood, and he speaks in praise of contentment with any kind of almsfood, and he does not engage in a wrong search, in what is improper, for the sake of almsfood.
“Again, a bhikkhu is content with any kind of lodging, and he speaks in praise of contentment with any kind of lodging, and he does not engage in a wrong search, in what is improper, for the sake of lodging.
“Again, a bhikkhu is content with any kind of robe, almsfood, lodging, and medicines and provisions for the sick.
“Again, a bhikkhu is content with any kind of robe, almsfood, lodging, and medicines and provisions for the sick.
“Again, a bhikkhu is content with any kind of robe, almsfood, lodging, and medicines and provisions for the sick.
“Again, a bhikkhu is crafty and he does not speak in praise of the removal of craftiness.
“Again, a bhikkhu is deceitful and he does not speak in praise of the removal of deceitfulness.
“Again, a bhikkhu is easy to correct and possesses qualities that make him easy to correct; he is patient and receives instruction respectfully.
“Again, a bhikkhu is easy to correct and possesses qualities that make him easy to correct; he is patient and receives instruction respectfully.
“Again, a bhikkhu is easy to correct and possesses qualities that make him easy to correct; he is patient and receives instruction respectfully.
“Again, a bhikkhu is easy to correct and possesses qualities that make him easy to correct; he is patient and receives instruction respectfully.
“Again, a bhikkhu is ill, overcome by illness.
“Again, a bhikkhu is inclined to attend to teachings and he speaks in praise of attending to teachings.
“Again, a bhikkhu is inclined to seclusion and he speaks in praise of seclusion.
“Again, a bhikkhu is irritated by his fellow monks, displeased with them, resentful toward them, ill disposed toward them.
“Again, a bhikkhu is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and alertness, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
“Again, a bhikkhu is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and alertness, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
“Again, a bhikkhu is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and alertness, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not crafty and he speaks in praise of the removal of craftiness.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not deceitful and he speaks in praise of the removal of deceitfulness.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for form, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not devoid of lust for the body, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not inclined to pay attention to teachings and he does not speak in praise of paying attention to teachings.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not inclined to seclusion and he does not speak in praise of seclusion.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not one who denigrates and he speaks in praise of the removal of denigration.
“Again, a bhikkhu is not prone to anger and he speaks in praise of the removal of anger.
“Again, a bhikkhu is one who denigrates and he does not speak in praise of the removal of denigration.
“Again, a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Dhamma, doubts it, is not convinced about it and does not place confidence in it.
“Again, a bhikkhu is perplexed about the Saṅgha, doubts it, is not convinced about it, and does not place confidence in it.
“Again, a bhikkhu is perplexed about the training, doubts it, is not convinced about it, and does not place confidence in it.
“Again, a bhikkhu is prone to anger and he does not speak in praise of the removal of anger.
“Again, a bhikkhu is seldom ill or afflicted, possessing an even digestion that is neither too cool nor too hot but moderate and suitable for striving.
“Again, a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent in attending to the diverse chores that are to be done for his fellow monks; he possesses appropriate investigation there, and he is able to carry out and arrange everything properly.
“Again, a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent in attending to the diverse chores that are to be done for his fellow monks; he possesses sound judgment about them in order to carry out and arrange them properly.
“Again, a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent in attending to the diverse chores that are to be done for his fellow monks; he possesses sound judgment about them in order to carry out and arrange them properly.
“Again, a bhikkhu is skillful and diligent in attending to the diverse chores that are to be done for his fellow monks; he possesses sound judgment about them in order to carry out and arrange them properly.
“Again, a bhikkhu is virtuous; he dwells restrained by the Pātimokkha, possessed of good conduct and resort, seeing danger in minute faults.
“Again, a bhikkhu is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Again, a bhikkhu lives the spiritual life aspiring for a certain order of devas, thinking: ‘By this virtuous behavior, observance, austerity, or spiritual life I will be a deva or one of the devas.’
When he lives the spiritual life aspiring for a certain order of devas … his mind does not incline to ardor, effort, perseverance, and striving.
“Again, a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma and is pleasing in his assertions, filled with a lofty joy in regard to the Dhamma and discipline.
“Again, a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma and is pleasing in his assertions, filled with a lofty joy pertaining to the Dhamma and discipline.
“Again, a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma and is pleasing in his assertions, filled with a lofty joy pertaining to the Dhamma and discipline.
“Again, a bhikkhu loves the Dhamma and is pleasing in his assertions, filled with a lofty joy pertaining to the Dhamma and discipline.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains mental acts of loving-kindness toward his fellow monks both openly and privately.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains mental acts of loving-kindness toward his fellow monks both openly and privately.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains verbal acts of loving-kindness toward his fellow monks both openly and privately.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains verbal acts of loving-kindness toward his fellow monks both openly and privately.
“Again, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma: discourses … and questions-and-answers.
“Again, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma: discourses … and questions-and-answers.
“Again, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma: discourses … and questions-and-answers.
“Again, a bhikkhu ponders, examines, and mentally inspects the Dhamma as he has heard it and learned it, but he does not go further and understand its meaning with wisdom.
“Again, a bhikkhu ponders, examines, and mentally inspects the Dhamma as he has heard it and learned it.
“Again, a bhikkhu recites the Dhamma in detail as he has heard it and learned it, but he does not go further and understand its meaning with wisdom.
“Again, a bhikkhu recites the Dhamma in detail as he has heard it and learned it.
“Again, a bhikkhu recollects his manifold past abodes … … Thus he recollects his manifold past abodes with their aspects and details.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘Food is now plentiful; there has been a good harvest and almsfood is abundant, so that one can easily subsist by means of gleaning.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘I am now seldom ill or afflicted; I possess an even digestion that is neither too cool nor too hot but moderate and suitable for striving.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘People are now dwelling in concord, harmoniously, without disputes, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with eyes of affection.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘The Saṅgha is now dwelling at ease—in concord, harmoniously, without disputes, with a single recitation.
“Again, a bhikkhu shares without reservation any righteous gains that have been righteously obtained, including even the contents of his alms bowl, and uses such things in common with his virtuous fellow monks.
“Again, a bhikkhu shares without reservation any righteous gains that have been righteously obtained, including even the contents of his alms bowl, and uses such things in common with his virtuous fellow monks.
“Again, a bhikkhu shows hospitality to his fellow monks and he speaks in praise of one who shows hospitality.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the bhikkhus the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals the spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the bhikkhus the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals the spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the bhikkhus the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals the spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the bhikkhus the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals the spiritual life that is perfectly complete and pure.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the Dhamma to others in detail as he has heard and learned it, but he does not go further and understand its meaning with wisdom.
“Again, a bhikkhu teaches the Dhamma to others in detail as he has heard and learned it.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee bonds closely with householders and monastics, socializing in an unfitting manner typical of laypeople, so he neglects seclusion and does not devote himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee does not bond closely with householders and monastics, socializing in an unfitting manner typical of laypeople, so he does not neglect seclusion but devotes himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee does not enter a village too early or return too late in the day, so he does not neglect seclusion but devotes himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee does not get to hear at will, without trouble or difficulty, talk concerned with the austere life that is conducive to opening up the heart, that is, talk on fewness of desires, on contentment, on solitude, on not getting bound up, on arousing energy, on virtuous behavior, on concentration, on wisdom, on liberation, on the knowledge and vision of liberation; so he neglects seclusion and does not devote himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee does not spend the day on some trifling work, so he does not neglect seclusion but devotes himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee enters a village too early and returns too late in the day, so he neglects seclusion and does not devote himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee gets to hear at will, without trouble or difficulty, talk concerned with the austere life that is conducive to opening up the heart, that is, talk on fewness of desires … on the knowledge and vision of liberation; so he does not neglect seclusion but devotes himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who is a trainee spends the day on some trifling work, so he neglects seclusion and does not devote himself to internal serenity of mind.
“Again, a bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should examine himself thus: ‘Am I learned, and do I retain and preserve what I have learned?
“Again, a bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should examine himself thus: ‘Have both Pātimokkhas been well transmitted to me in detail, well analyzed, well mastered, well determined in terms of the rules and their detailed explication?
“Again, a bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should examine himself thus: ‘Have I established a mind of loving-kindness without resentment toward my fellow monks?
“Again, a bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should examine himself thus: ‘Is my verbal behavior pure?
“Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has clearly seen sensual pleasures as they really are with correct wisdom as similar to a charcoal pit.
“Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has clearly seen sensual pleasures as they really are with correct wisdom as similar to a charcoal pit.
“Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has developed and well developed the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Again, a bhikkhu with taints destroyed has developed and well developed the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Again, a bhikkhu’s mind is liberated from the five lower fetters but not yet liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of the acquisitions.
“Again, a bhikkhu’s mind is liberated from the five lower fetters but not yet liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of the acquisitions.
“Again, a bhikkhu’s mind is not yet liberated from the five lower fetters.
“Again, a bhikkhu’s mind is not yet liberated from the five lower fetters.
“Again, a bhikkhu’s mind is seized by restlessness about the Dhamma.
